 


Thursday


June 2, 1994





Part II


Department of Labor





Occupational Safety and Health Administration





29 CFR Parts 1910, 1917, and 1918
Longshoring and Marine Terminals; Proposed Rule








Federal Register

/Vol. 59, No. 105/Thursday, June 2, 1994/Proposed Rules 






<USDEPT>DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</USDEPT>


<USDEPT>Occupational Safety and Health Administration</USDEPT>


<USDEPT>29 CFR Parts 1910, 1917, and 1918</USDEPT>




<RINDOCK>[Docket No. S025]</RINDOCK>


Longshoring and Marine Terminals 



<AGENCY>
AGENCY

: Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA).


</AGENCY>
<ACTION>
ACTION

: Proposed rule; Notice of informal public hearings.




</ACTION>
<SUMMARY>
SUMMARY

: The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) proposes to revise its Safety and Health Regulations
for Longshoring and, to a far lesser extent, to amend its Safety and Health Regulations for Marine Terminals. The proposed
rule covers cargo handling and related activities conducted aboard vessels and at Marine Terminals. The proposed
amendments to the Marine Terminals standard are intended primarily to provide regulatory consistency with the proposed
Longshoring ship-board rules. The proposed rules would be ``vertical'' standards which apply to longshoring and
marine terminal activities only, except for those general industry provisions referenced within this proposed
rule.


This proposal contains requirements for longshoring and marine terminal operations; the testing and certification
of specific types of cargo lifting appliances and associated auxiliary gear; other cargo handling equipment such
as conveyors and industrial trucks; access to vessels; working surfaces; and personal protective equipment. Additionally,
specialized longshoring operations such as containerized cargo, roll-on roll-off (Ro-Ro) and menhaden are specifically
addressed.
The principal hazards addressed by this proposal are injuries and accidents associated with cargo lifting gear,
vehicular cargo transferral, manual cargo handling, hazardous atmospheres and materials, and finally, those hazards
posed by the more modern and sophisticated cargo handling methods brought about by intermodalism.
This provides notice of OSHA's intent to schedule informal public hearings on OSHA's proposed rulemaking on Longshoring
and the related Marine Terminal provisions.


</SUMMARY>
<DATE>
DATES:

 Written comments on the standard must be postmarked on or before September 23, 1994. Notices of intention to appear
at the informal public hearings must be postmarked by August 24, 1994.Written comments, testimony, and all evidence
which will be offered into the hearing record must be postmarked by 21 days prior to the date of the hearing to be attended.
The hearings will begin at 9:30 a.m. and be held in the following cities, beginning on the following dates: 



Charleston, South Carolina on September 20, 1994;
Seattle, Washington on October 19, 1994; and
New Orleans, Louisiana on November 15, 1994.
Requests for public hearings in locations other than the above must be received by July 11, 1994.
Parties who request more than 10 minutes for their presentation at the informal public hearing and parties who will
submit documentary evidence at the hearing must submit the full text of their testimony and all documentary evidence,
postmarked on or before 21 days prior the date of the hearing to be attended.


</DATE>
<ADDRESS>
ADDRESSES:

 Written comments and requests for additional hearings should be submitted to the Docket Office, Docket S025,
Room N2625, U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, 200 Constitution Avenue,
N.W., Washington, D.C. 20210. Telephone: (202) 219-7894. Comments of 10 pages or less may be faxed to the Docket Office,
if followed by a hard copy. The OSHA Docket Office fax number is (202) 2195046.


Notice of intention to appear, testimony and documentary evidence to be submitted at the hearing are to be sent to Mr.
Tom Hall, OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs, Docket No. S025, Room N3647, U.S. Department of Labor,
200 Constitution Avenue N.W., Washington, DC 20210, telephone (202) 2198615.
Actual addresses for the locations of the regional hearings in Charleston, South Carolina, Seattle, Washington,
and New Orleans, Louisiana will be announced in a later Federal Register document.


</ADDRESS>
<FURTHER>
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:

 Mr. James F. Foster, Director, Office of Information and Consumer Affairs, OSHA, U.S. Department of Labor, Room N3647,
200 Constitution Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20210. Telephone (202) 2198148.


</FURTHER>
<SUPPLEM>
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION


I. Background


As a result of the high number and serious nature of accidents occurring to port workers in the United States, Congress,
in 1958, amended the Longshore and Harborworker's Compensation Act (LHWCA) (33 U.S.C. 901 

et seq.

) to provide a large segment of port based employees with a safer work environment. The amendments (P.L. 85742,
72 Stat. 835) significantly strengthened Section 41 of the LHWCA (33 U.S.C. 941) by requiring employers covered by
that Act to ``furnish, maintain and use'' equipment, and to establish safe working conditions in accordance with
regulations promulgated by the Secretary of Labor. Two years later, the Labor Standards Bureau (LSB) of the Department
of Labor issued the first set of safety and health regulations for longshoring activities as 29 CFR part 9 (25 FR 1565).
These standards were amended on several occasions between 1960 and 1971. Since 1971, there have been no substantive
changes to these provisions.
The Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (the Act) (29 U.S.C. 650 

et seq

.), which established the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), directed the Secretary of Labor
to adopt, under the authority conferred by section 6(a) of the Act, ``Any established Federal standard'' as an OSHA
standard during the first 2 years of the Act. The Longshoring standards, then codified as 29 CFR part 1504, were adopted
by OSHA under section 6(a) in 1971, and were recodified as 29 CFR part 1918. The longshoring industry has changed dramatically
since 1971. The methods of cargo handling and the equipment associated with those methods have undergone significant
modification. Vessels designed specifically for the carriage of intermodal containers, vehicular rolling stock,
and even barges, are now the most common types of ships calling at U.S. ports. By contrast, the established Longshoring
standard was designed largely for activities being conducted using methods and equipment that have been overshadowed
or replaced by more modern methods of cargo handling. The proposal being published today will seek to modernize OSHA's
regulatory approach to deal with these changes in the industry. It is important to consider, however, that some of
the older, more conventional vessel configurations, equipped with features and aspects that are addressed in the
current standard, continue to call at U.S. ports. For that reason, the Agency will retain in this proposal a number
of provisions whose utility, although diminished, will continue to be necessary. Nevertheless, the Agency requests
the public to comment on certain provisions that it considers obsolete and no longer in use. For example, the Agency
is considering deleting the provisions that address the manually lowering or topping of booms based on a determination
that these operations are no longer performed as a part of longshoring work.
On July 5, 1983, OSHA published its final rule for Marine Terminals (48 FR 30886)(Ex. 1101). These rules were
designed to address the shoreside segment of marine cargo handling. Since the Marine Terminal standards currently
address equipment and situations (i.e., powered industrial trucks; conveyors; passage between levels and across
openings; etc.) that have shipboard counterparts, appropriate provisions from those standards are incorporated
into this proposal for shipboard cargo handling, as well. Accordingly, the Agency will rely upon background material
and data used to substantiate OSHA's rule for Marine Terminals, and incorporates the docket (S506) developed
in that rulemaking.
This proposal seeks to provide a practical continuity as it addresses the more conventional and time proven methods
of cargo handling along with those more modern and revolutionary. The Agency welcomes all suggestions on how to better
meet this goal.


Longshoring Hazards


Traditionally, the longshore industry has been notable in terms of its accident experience. The work environment
found in the marine cargo handling sector exposes workers to a greater risk of injury than is true for most other industries.
In fact, in the last calendar year for which industrial illnesses and accidents are fully tabulated, this industrial
sector had one of the highest rate of lost workdays in the nation. The following tables found in BLS reports (Exs. 1109,
1110, 1111, 1112, and
1113) are useful in making a comparative assessment:



<TABLE>


Table A 

1Total of lost workdays (rate per 100 full time employees) 
11985
11986
11987
11988
11989
11990
11991
 

Private sector
64.9
65.8
69.9
76.1
78.7
84.0
86.5 
Construction 
129
134
136
142
143
148
148 
SIC 446 (449)
350
405
422
436
343
284
329 

Note: These 1988 to 1991 figures are based on SIC Code 449, which includes water transportation. It should be noted
that the SIC Code for water transportation was changed from 446 to 499 in 1987.

</TABLE>
 
 

<TABLE>


Table B 

1Total cases (rate per 100 full-time employees) 

11985
11986
11987
11988
11989
11990
11991
 


Private sector
7.9
7.9
8.3
8.6
8.6
8.8
8.4 
Construction Trades
15.2
15.2
14.7
14.6
14.3
14.2
13.0 
SIC 446 (449)
16.3
18.0
17.0
14.5
14.7
13.5
13.9 

Note: These 1988 to 1991 figures are based on SIC Code 449, which includes water transportation. It should be noted
that the SIC Code for water transportation was changed from 446 to 449 in 1987.

</TABLE>
 


In 1985, OSHA requested the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) to initiate a survey that could be used to develop common
aspects of accidents occurring within the current longshore sector (Ex. 173). This survey helped to point
out that in spite of the increases in automation that have occurred in the industry, injuries and lost workday cases
continue to remain high and the break bulk type of operation still accounts for a major portion of the injuries that
occur aboard ship.
OSHA sought to validate even further the conclusions it could draw, both from this survey and from regularly published
BLS occupational safety and health statistics. In so doing, the Agency reviewed data published in 

Seafarer

 magazine (April 1987). In an article entitled ``WGMA reports safety statistics for 8586 contract year'' (Ex.
114), that periodical listed a number of pertinent figures that serve to corroborate the other accident information
OSHA has secured. The West Gulf Report, prepared by Mr. Hal Draper, Director of Safety; Health and Training for the
West Gulf Maritime Association, addressed the accident experience of several ports from Lake Charles, Louisiana
to Brownsville, Texas. Quoting directly from the article:




West Gulf Report. Draper's report on West Gulf longshore accidents during the 198586 contract year covered
a total of 1,192 incidents.

According to his analysis, 70% of the accidents occurred on board ships; the remaining 30% on the dock or in the warehouse/terminal.
Cargo was involved in 30% of the accidents, 64% of which involved sacks/bags, and 12% steel/pipe. Two hundred and forty
of the incidents (20%) involved the individual being struck by a moving object; 221 (19%) resulted from lifting, pushing,
pulling or bodily reaction; 208 (17%) from falls from the same level-slip or trip; 142 (12%) from striking against,
or stepping/jumping on an object; 130 (11%) from being struck by a falling object; and 109 (9%) from being caught in,
under, or between objects. Thirteen percent of all accidents involved stevedore gear/equipment.




Another way the Agency attempted to identify the major sources of longshoring accidents for rulemaking purposes
was to examine a number of fatal or near fatal accidents reported to OSHA from this industry sector during the period
July 1972March 1992. In conducting this analysis, OSHA examined these case files to determine the precise
cause of the accident. A brief summary of a few of the more than 250 such accidents reviewed is provided below.


Boston, Massachusetts

_August 1974. A longshoreman, seriously injured while working in the hold of a bulk cargo vessel, was placed aboard
a stokes basket stretcher to be transported ashore by the vessel's cargo hoisting gear. The stokes basket had no effective
means to secure the injured worker to the stretcher. While in transit, the injured worker fell out of the litter, back
into the hold (Ex. 190).


Port Elizabeth, New Jersey

_June 1978. One employee was killed and one seriously injured when an intermodal container lifting beam, being lowered
to hoist the container both men were standing on, suddenly fell. The device, weighing in excess of 4 tons, crushed both
employees. Compliance with proposed 1918.81(k) would have prevented this accident (Ex. 187).


Port Newark, New Jersey

_August 1976. An employee aboard an elevator Ro-Ro ship, while in the process of discharging automobiles, drove into
what was thought to be an available elevator to gain access to the ramp or discharge deck. The elevator was actually
at a higher deck. The employee and vehicle fell into the shaft and down three decks. Barricading of the open deck spaces
could have prevented this accident (Ex. 188).


San Juan, Puerto Rico

_August 1978. An employee aboard a seagoing, multi-deck Ro-Ro barge was run over and killed by a tractor trailer while
the trailer was being maneuvered into its stowage position. No signalman was provided to protect employees from the
hazard that ultimately killed this lasher (an employee engaged in securing cargo). Additionally, illumination
was severely lacking within the confines of the vessel's below deck cargo spaces. The use of proper illumination and
a signaller for this operation could have prevented the fatality (Ex. 189).


Port Elizabeth, New Jersey

_August 1984. Two workers, while driving in a vehicle within a large Ro-Ro vessel, fell from the end of an elevated internal
ramp back down to deck level. These employees thought the ramp could take them to the next higher deck, however, the
ramp was not so positioned. The car they were operating landed on its roof. One employee was killed, the other was injured.
Barricading of the ramp could have prevented this accident (Ex. 186).


Houston, Texas

_July 1987. Two longshoremen were killed while positioned atop a deck stowed intermodal container. As they were performing
their work, an empty forty foot container being passed over their heads became disengaged from the lifting gear and
fell on them. These fatalities could have been prevented if the employees had stayed clear of the overhead drafts (Ex.
174).


Port of Los Angeles, California

_March, 1992. One longshoreman was killed while working on top of a stack of containers on the deck of a container vessel.
A container top safety device was available, but the longshoreman was not attached to it. The safety device, which
was attached to the container crane spreader bar, moved and became hung up. When it released, it catapulted the longshoreman
off of the stack of containers and onto the dock. This incident could have been prevented if the employee had not been
working on the top of the container, or had been using fall protection if it were necessary to be working there (Ex. 1108).

Based on the BLS data, the West Gulf Maritime Association's accident analysis, and OSHA's own analysis of fatal or
near fatal accidents in the cargo handling industry , OSHA concludes that regulatory action is necessary in order
to meet its mandate under the Act. See Section III, Statutory Considerations, below, for a complete discussion of
OSHA's ``significant risk'' findings.


II. General Format of the Standard


A. Vertical vs. Horizontal Standards


This proposed Longshoring standard has been drafted in a manner that will allow it to stand by itself, i.e., to be a ``vertical''
standard. Vertical standards are those that apply specifically to a given industry, in lieu of any other OSHA standard.
In several areas of coverage specified in the proposal's scope section, OSHA's General Industry standards are incorporated
by reference. This approach follows OSHA's other marine cargo handling standard, Marine Terminals, 29 CFR part 1917
(48 FR 30886). Vertical standards can encourage voluntary compliance because they are directed to the particular
problems of the industry, and because they only contain provisions that are appropriate to the industry in question.
On the other hand, since many industries covered by OSHA do in fact use the same or similar equipment and processes,
and therefore have employees who are exposed to the same hazards, it is usually a more efficient use of the Agency's
resources to develop ``horizontal'' standards (those applying across industry lines). It is also more efficient
to train field personnel in general safety programs tailored to the horizontal General Industry standards than to
train field staff in individual programs designed for specific industries.
In 1983, OSHA promulgated a vertical standard for the shoreside aspect of marine cargo handling (48 FR 30886)_OSHA's
rules for Marine Terminals. As was the case in that rulemaking, the Agency is proposing the inclusion of a list of applicable
General Industry standards which will supplement the specific provisions in part 1918. This provides coverage for
hazards for which the marine cargo handling industry is neither unique nor different from other industries. As an
example, OSHA proposes to adopt by reference 1910.95, titled ``occupational noise exposure.'' The detrimental
effects of prolonged high levels of noise is the same whether the exposure takes place aboard a vessel or in a factory.
The exposure may not be as constant or the workforce may not be subjected to the same type of noise day after day, however
the potential for overexposure is there. OSHA does not feel it is necessary to write a ``vertical'' standard that covers
exposure to noise when the General Industry standard will suffice. This is entirely consistent with the current coverage
provided by OSHA rules for Marine Terminals (part 1917).
The majority of this proposed Longshore standard is a ``vertical'' standard. The work environment aboard ship is
unique in many respects. Longshore workers must continually work in the harsh environment of the waterfront, which
requires exposure both to work-related hazards, such as falling cargo, and to environmental hazards, such as drowning
and working around machinery in bad weather. Longshore workers perform some of the same high-hazard tasks, and confront
many of the same heavy-industry hazards, as those typically associated with the construction industry. Examples
of such hazards include falls, and crushing and caught-in injuries. Cargo handling and construction work are also
both weather-dependent and have a high proportion of part-time and transient employees. The extremely high occupational
injury and illness incidence rates for the marine cargo handling industry, mentioned in the previous section, testify
to the hazardous nature of the longshoring industry. 
OSHA has decided to continue a vertical standard for many aspects of this high-hazard industry, supplemented by general
industry standards where necessary and appropriate. The Agency believes that this approach is necessary to adequately
address the unique hazards and working conditions of this industry. OSHA also has a vertical standard for the construction
industry (29 CFR part 1926), another hazardous industry with a large workforce.
OSHA solicits comments both as to the merits and the limitations of a vertical standard for longshoring operations.


B. Performance vs. Specification


The format and substance of this standard reflect OSHA's effort to eliminate unnecessary regulations and to simplify
and update others. To achieve these goals, the Agency has adopted a performance approach to writing new rules and revising
existing ones. A performance-based standard identifies a hazard and the level of control required to protect against
the hazard, without specifying the precise means of achieving such control, while a specification standard stipulates
design and construction criteria to be met to achieve a particular safety objective. The lack of flexibility in many
specification standards fails to take into account the adequacy of many existing operations and work practices and
discourages innovation. In keeping with OSHA's commitment to clarity, flexibility, and in order to encourage employers
to comply with the standards, this longshore industry proposal has adopted the performance approach except in those
cases in which employee safety would be enhanced by more specific requirements. The Agency is interested in receiving
comments from persons who feel that certain of the proposed provisions would benefit from a greater degree of specification
or from a more goal-oriented approach.


III. Statutory Considerations


A. 

Introduction. 

Throughout this proposal, OSHA describes the hazards confronted by employees who are engaged in longshoring activities
and the measures required to protect affected employees from those hazards. The Agency is providing the following
discussion of the statutory mandate for OSHA rulemaking activity to explain the legal basis for its determination
that the Longshoring standard, as proposed, is reasonably necessary to protect affected employees from significant
risks of injury and death.
Section 2(b)(3) of the Occupational Safety and Health Act authorizes ``the Secretary of Labor to set mandatory occupational
safety and health standards applicable to businesses affecting interstate commerce'', and section 5(a)(2) provides
that ``each employer shall comply with occupational safety and health standards promulgated under this Act'' (emphasis
added). Section 3(8) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C.  652(8)) provides that:




. . . the term `occupational safety and health standard' means a standard which requires conditions, or the adoption
or use of one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes, reasonably necessary or appropriate to
provide safe or healthful employment and places of employment.




In two recent cases, reviewing courts have expressed concern that OSHA's interpretation of these provisions of the
OSH Act, particularly of section 3(8) as it pertains to safety rulemaking, could lead to overly costly or under-protective
safety standards. In 

International Union, UAW v. OSHA

, 938 F.2d 1310 (D.C. Cir. 1991), the District of Columbia Circuit rejected substantive challenges to OSHA's lockout/tagout
standard and denied a request that enforcement of that standard be stayed, but it also expressed concern that OSHA's
interpretation of the OSH Act could lead to safety standards that are very costly and only minimally protective. In


National Grain  Feed Association v. OSHA

, 866 F.2d 717 (5th Cir. 1989), the Fifth Circuit concluded that Congress gave OSHA considerable discretion in structuring
the costs and benefits of safety standards but, concerned that the grain dust standard might be under-protective,
directed OSHA to consider adding a provision that might further reduce significant risk of fire and explosion. OSHA
rulemakings involve a significant degree of agency expertise and policy-making discretion to which reviewing courts
must defer. (See for example, 

Building  Constr. Trades Dept

. AFL-CIO v. Brock, 838 F.2d 1258, 1266 (D.C. Cir. 1988); 

Industrial Union Dept. AFL-CIO v. American Petroleum Inst.

, 448 U.S. 607, 655 n. 62 (1980).) At the same time, the Agency's technical expertise and policy-making authority must
be exercised within discernable parameters. The lockout/tagout and grain handling standard decisions sought from
OSHA more clarification on the agency's view of the scope of those parameters. In light of those decisions, OSHA believes
it would be useful to include in the preamble to this proposed safety standard a statement of its view of the limits of
its safety rulemaking authority and to explain why it is confident that its interpretive views have in the past avoided
regulatory extremes and continue to do so in this rule.
Stated briefly, the OSH Act requires that, before promulgating any occupational safety standard, OSHA demonstrate
based on substantial evidence in the record as a whole that: (1) the proposed standard will substantially reduce a
significant risk of material harm; (2) compliance is technologically feasible in the sense that the protective measures
being required already exist, can be brought into existence with available technology, or can be created with technology
that can reasonably be developed; (3) compliance is economically feasible in the sense that industry can absorb or
pass on the costs without major dislocation or threat of instability; and (4) the standard is cost effective in that
it employs the least expensive protective measures capable of reducing or eliminating significant risk. Additionally,
proposed safety standards must be compatible with prior agency action, must be responsive to significant comment
in the record, and, to the extent allowed by statute, must be consistent with applicable Executive Orders. These elements
limit OSHA's regulatory discretion for safety rulemaking and provide a decision-making framework for developing
a rule within their parameters.



B. Congress concluded that OSHA regulations are necessary to protect workers from occupational hazards and that
employers should be required to reduce or eliminate significant workplace health and safety threats. At section
2(a) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C.  651(a)), Congress announced its determination that occupational injury and illness
should be eliminated as much as possible: ``The Congress finds that occupational injury and illness arising out of
work situations impose a substantial burden upon, and are a hindrance to, interstate commerce in terms of lost production,
wage loss, medical expenses, and disability compensation payments.'' Congress therefore declared ``it to be its
purpose and policy ... to assure so far as possible every working man and woman in the Nation safe ... working conditions
[29 U.S.C.  651(b)].''
To that end, Congress instructed the Secretary of Labor to adopt existing Federal and consensus standards during
the first two years after the OSH Act became effective and, in the event of conflict among any such standards, to ``promulgate
the standard which assures the greatest protection of the safety or health of the affected employees [29 U.S.C.  655(a)].''
Congress also directed the Secretary to set mandatory occupational safety standards [29 U.S.C.  651(b)(3)], based
on a rulemaking record and substantial evidence [29 U.S.C.  655(b)(2)], that are ``reasonably necessary or appropriate
to provide safe ... employment and places of employment.'' When promulgating permanent safety or health standards
that differ from existing national consensus standards, the Secretary must explain ``why the rule as adopted will
better effectuate the purposes of this Act than the national consensus standard [29 U.S.C.  655(b)(8)].'' Correspondingly,
every employer must comply with OSHA standards and, in addition, ``furnish to each of his employees employment and
a place of employment which are free from recognized hazards that are causing or are likely to cause death or serious
physical harm to his employees [29 U.S.C.  654(a)].''
``Congress understood that the Act would create substantial costs for employers, yet intended to impose such costs
when necessary to create a safe and healthful working environment. Congress viewed the costs of health and safety
as a cost of doing business.... Indeed, Congress thought that the financial costs of health and safety problems in
the workplace were as large as or larger than the financial costs of eliminating these problems [

American Textile Mfrs. Inst. Inc. v. Donovan

, 452 U.S. 490, 519522 (1981) (ATMI); emphasis was supplied in original].'' ``[T]he fundamental objective
of the Act [is] to prevent occupational deaths and serious injuries [

Whirlpool Corp. v. Marshall

, 445 U.S. 1, 11 (1980)].'' ``We know the costs would be put into consumer goods but that is the price we should pay for
the 80 million workers in America [S. Rep. No. 911282, 91st Cong., 2d Sess. (1970); H.R. Rep. No. 911291,
91st Cong., 2d Sess. (1970), reprinted in Senate Committee on Labor and Public Welfare, Legislative History of the
Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, (Committee Print 1971) (`Leg. Hist.') at 444 (Senator Yarborough)].''
``Of course, it will cost a little more per item to produce a washing machine. Those of us who use washing machines will
pay for the increased cost, but it is worth it, to stop the terrible death and injury rate in this country [

Id

. at 324; see also 510511, 517].''



[T]he vitality of the Nation's economy will be enhanced by the greater productivity realized through saved lives
and useful years of labor. When one man is injured or disabled by an industrial accident or disease, it is he and his family
who suffer the most immediate and personal loss. However, that tragic loss also affects each of us. As a result of occupational
accidents and disease, over $1.5 billion in wages is lost each year [1970 dollars], and the annual loss to the gross
national product is estimated to be over $8 billion. Vast resources that could be available for productive use are
siphoned off to pay workmen's compensation and medical expenses....Only through a comprehensive approach can we
hope to effect a significant reduction in these job death and casualty figures. [Id. at 51819 (Senator Cranston)]
Congress considered uniform enforcement crucial because it would reduce or eliminate the disadvantage that a conscientious
employer might experience where inter-industry or intra-industry competition is present. Moreover, ``many employers_particularly
smaller ones_simply cannot make the necessary investment in health and safety, and survive competitively, unless
all are compelled to do so [Leg. Hist. at 144, 854, 1188, 1201].''




Thus, the statutory text and legislative history make clear that Congress conclusively determined that OSHA regulation
is necessary to protect workers from occupational hazards and that employers should be required to reduce or eliminate
significant workplace health and safety threats.



C. As construed by the courts and by OSHA, the OSH Act sets a threshold and a ceiling for safety rulemaking that provide
clear and reasonable parameters for agency action. OSHA has long followed the teaching that section 3(8) of the OSH
Act requires that, before it promulgates ``any permanent health or safety standard, [it must] make a threshold finding
that a place of employment is unsafe_in the sense that significant risks are present and can be eliminated or lessened
by a change in practices [

Industrial Union Dept., AFL-CIO v. American Petroleum Inst

, 448 U.S. 607, 642 (1980) (plurality) (Benzene); emphasis was supplied in original].'' When, as frequently happens
in safety rulemaking, OSHA promulgates standards that differ from existing national consensus standards, it must
explain ``why the rule as adopted will better effectuate the purposes of this Act than the national consensus standard
[29 U.S.C.  655(b)(8)].'' Thus, national consensus and existing federal standards that Congress instructed OSHA
to adopt summarily within two years of the OSH Act's inception provide reference points concerning the least an OSHA
standard should achieve (29 U.S.C.  655(a)).
As a result, OSHA is precluded from regulating insignificant safety risks or from issuing safety standards that do
not at least lessen risk in a significant way.
The OSH Act also limits OSHA's discretion to issue overly burdensome rules, as the agency also has long recognized
that ``any standard that was not economically or technologically feasible would 

a fortiori

 not be `reasonably necessary or appropriate' under the Act. See 

Industrial Union Dept., v. Hodgson

, [499 F.2d 467, 478 (D.C. Cir. 1974)] (`Congress does not appear to have intended to protect employees by putting their
employers out of business.') [American Textile Mfrs. Inst. Inc., 452 U.S. at 513 n. 31 (a standard is economically
feasible even if it portends `disaster for some marginal firms,' but it is economically infeasible if it `threaten[s]
massive dislocation to, or imperil[s] the existence of, the industry')].'' By stating the test in terms of ``threat''
and ``peril,'' the Supreme Court made clear in ATMI that economic infeasibility begins short of industry-wide bankruptcy.
OSHA itself has placed the line considerably below this level. (See for example, 

ATMI

, 452 U.S. at 527 n. 50; 43 FR 27360 (June 23, 1978). Proposed 200 &mu;g/m3 PEL for cotton dust did not raise serious possibility
of industry-wide bankruptcy, but impact on weaving sector would be severe, possibly requiring reconstruction of
90 percent of all weave rooms. OSHA concluded that the 200 &mu;g/m3 level was not feasible for weaving and that 750 &mu;g/m3
was all that could reasonably be required). See also 54 FR 29245246 (July 11, 1989); American Iron  Steel
Institute, 939 F.2d at 1003. OSHA raised engineering control level for lead in small nonferrous foundries to avoid
the possibility of bankruptcy for about half of small foundries even though the industry as a whole could have survived
the loss of small firms.) Although the cotton dust and lead rulemakings involved health standards, the economic feasibility
ceiling established therein applies equally to safety standards. Indeed, because feasibility is a necessary element
of a ``reasonably necessary or appropriate'' standard, this ceiling boundary is the same for health and safety rulemaking
since it comes from section 3(8), which governs all permanent OSHA standards.
All OSHA standards must also be cost-effective in the sense that the protective measures being required must be the
least expensive measures capable of achieving the desired end (ATMI, at 514 n. 32; 

Building and Const. Trades Dept., AFL-CIO v. Brock

, 838 F.2d 1258, 1269 (D.C. Cir. 1988)). OSHA gives additional consideration to financial impact in setting the period
of time that should be allowed for compliance, allowing as much as ten years for compliance phase-in. (See 

United Steelworkers of America v. Marshall

, 647 F.2d 1189, 1278 (D.C. Cir. 1980), 

cert. denied

, 453 U.S. 913 (1981).) Additionally, OSHA's enforcement policy takes account of financial hardship on an individualized
basis. OSHA's Field Operations Manual provides that, based on an employer's economic situation, OSHA may extend
the period within which a violation must be corrected after issuance of a citation (CPL. 2.45B, Chapter III, paragraph
E6d(3)(a), Dec. 31, 1990).
To reach the necessary findings and conclusions that a safety standard substantially reduces a significant risk
of harm, is both technologically and economically feasible, and is cost effective, OSHA must conduct rulemaking
in accord with the requirements of section 6 of the OSH Act. The regulatory proceeding allows it to determine the qualitative
and, if possible, the quantitative nature of the risk with and without regulation, the technological feasibility
of compliance, the availability of capital to the industry and the extent to which that capital is required for other
purposes, the industry's profit history, the industry's ability to absorb costs or pass them on to the consumer, the
impact of higher costs on demand, and the impact on competition with substitutes and imports. (See ATMI at 25012503;
American Iron  Steel Institute generally.) Section 6(f) of the OSH Act further provides that, if the validity
of a standard is challenged, OSHA must support its conclusions with ``substantial evidence in the record considered
as a whole,'' a standard that courts have determined requires fairly close scrutiny of agency action and the explanation
of that action. (See 

Steelworkers

, 647 F.2d at 12061207.)
OSHA's powers are further circumscribed by the independent Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission, which
provides a neutral forum for employer contests of citations issued by OSHA for noncompliance with health and safety
standards (29 U.S.C.  659661; noted as an additional constraint in Benzene at 652 n. 59). OSHA must also respond
rationally to similarities and differences among industries or industry sectors. (See 

Building and Construction Trades Dept., AFL-CIO v. Brock

, 838 F.2d 1258, 127273 (D.C. Cir. 1988).)
OSHA safety rulemaking is thus constrained first by the need to demonstrate that the standard will substantially
reduce a significant risk of material harm, and then by the requirement that compliance is technologically capable
of being done and not so expensive as to threaten economic instability or dislocation for the industry. Within these
parameters, further constraints such as the need to find cost-effective measures and to respond rationally to all
meaningful comment militate against regulatory extremes.



D. The proposed revisions of the Longshoring and Marine Terminal standards comply with the statutory criteria described
above and are not subject to the additional constraints applicable to section 6(b)(5) standards. 
Standards that regulate hazards that are frequently undetectable because they are subtle or develop slowly or after
long latency periods, are frequently referred to as ``health'' standards. Standards that regulate hazards, like
explosions or electrocution, that cause immediately noticeable physical harm, are called ``safety'' standards.
(See 

National Grain  Feed Assn., v. OSHA (NGFA II)

, 866 F.2d 717, 731, 733 (5th Cir. 1989). As noted above, section 3(8) provides that all OSHA standards must be ``reasonably
necessary or appropriate.'' In addition, section 6(b)(5) requires that OSHA set health standards which limit significant
risk ``to the extent feasible.'' OSHA has determined that the proposed revisions of the Longshore and Marine Terminal
standards are safety standards, because these standards address hazards, such as falling, falling objects and crushing,
that are immediately dangerous to life or health, not the longer term, less obvious hazards subject to section 6(b)(5).
The OSH Act and its legislative history clearly indicate that Congress intended for OSHA to distinguish between safety
standards and health standards. For example in section 2(b)(6) of the OSH Act, Congress declared that the goal of assuring
safe and healthful working conditions and preserving human resources would be achieved, in part: 


... by exploring ways to discover latent diseases, establishing causal connections between diseases and work in
environmental conditions, and conducting other research relating to health problems, in recognition of the fact
that occupational health standards present problems often different from those involved in occupational safety.
The legislative history makes this distinction even clearer:

[The Secretary] should take into account that anyone working in toxic agents and physical agents which might be harmful
may be subjected to such conditions for the rest of his working life, so that we can get at something which might not be
toxic now, if he works in it a short time, but if he works in it the rest of his life might be very dangerous; and we want to
make sure that such things are taken into consideration in establishing standards. [Leg. Hist. at 502503 (Sen.
Dominick), quoted in 

Benzene

 at 64849]. Additionally, Representative Daniels distinguished between ``insidious `silent killers' such
as toxic fumes, bases, acids, and chemicals'' and ``violent physical injury causing immediate visible physical
harm'' (Leg. Hist. at 1003), and Representative Udall contrasted insidious hazards like carcinogens with ``the
more visible and well-known question of industrial accidents and on-the-job injury'' (Leg. Hist. at 1004). (See
also, for example, S.Rep. No. 1282, 91st Cong., 2d Sess 23 (1970), U.S. Code Cong.  Admin. News 1970, pp.
5177, 5179, reprinted in Leg. Hist. at 14243, discussing 1967 Surgeon General study that found that 65 percent
of employees in industrial plants ``were potentially exposed to harmful physical agents, 

such as severe noise or vibration

, or to toxic materials''; Leg.Hist at 412; 

id.

 at 446; 

id.

 at 516; 

id.

 at 845; International Union, UAW at 1315.)




In reviewing OSHA rulemaking activity, the Supreme Court has held that section 6(b)(5) requires OSHA to set ``the
most protective standard consistent with feasibility'' (Benzene at 643 n. 48). As Justice Stevens observed:



The reason that Congress drafted a special section for these substances ... was because Congress recognized that
there were special problems in regulating health risks as opposed to safety risks. In the latter case, the risks are
generally immediate and obvious, while in the former, the risks may not be evident until a worker has been exposed for
long periods of time to particular substances. [Benzene, at 649 n. 54.] Challenges to the grain dust and lockout/tagout
standards included assertions that grain dust in explosive quantities and uncontrolled energy releases that could
expose employees to crushing, cutting, burning or explosion hazards were harmful physical agents so that OSHA was
required to apply the criteria of section 6(b)(5) when determining how to protect employees from those hazards. Reviewing
courts have uniformly rejected such assertions. For example, the Court in 

International Union, UAW v. OSHA

, 938 F.2d 1310 (D.C. Cir. 1991) rejected the view that section 6(b)(5) provided the statutory criteria for regulation
of uncontrolled energy, holding that such a ``reading would obliterate a distinction that Congress drew between
'health' and 'safety' risks.'' The Court also noted that the language of the OSH Act and the legislative history supported
the OSHA position (International Union, UAW at 1314). Additionally, the Court stated: ``We accord considerable
weight to an agency's construction of a statutory scheme it is entrusted to administer, rejecting it only if unreasonable''
(International Union, UAW at 1313, citing Chevron U.S.A., Inc. v. NRDC, 467 U.S. 837, 843 (1984)).



The Court reviewing the grain dust standard also deferred to OSHA's reasonable view that the Agency was not subject
to the feasibility mandate of section 6(b)(5) in regulating explosive quantities of grain dust (

National Grain  Feed Association v. OSHA

 (NGFA II), 866 F.2d 717, 733 (5th Cir. 1989)). It therefore applied the criteria of section 3(8), requiring the Agency
to establish that the standard is ``reasonably necessary or appropriate'' to protect section 3(8), requiring the
Agency to establish that the standard is ``reasonably necessary or appropriate'' to protect employee safety.
As explained in Section I, Background, above, and Section V, Summary and Explanation of the Proposal and in Section
VIII, Preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis, below, OSHA has determined
that marine cargo handling activities pose significant risks to employees (18 fatalities and 7,593 injuries annually)
and that the provisions of the proposed rule are reasonably necessary to protect affected employees from those risks.
The Agency estimates that compliance with the proposed revisions of the Longshoring and Marine Terminal standards
will cost $4.7 million the first year and $1.8 million annually thereafter and will reduce the risk of the identified
hazards (preventing 3 fatalities and 1,262 injuries annually). This constitutes a substantial reduction of significant
risk of material harm for the population at risk of approximately 93,000 employees. The Agency believes that compliance
is technologically feasible because all of the provisions of the proposed standard can be met by using currently available
equipment, facilities, supplies, and work practices. Additionally, OSHA believes that compliance is economically
feasible, because, as documented in the Regulatory Impact Analysis, all regulated sectors can readily absorb or
pass on compliance costs during the standard's first five years, and economic benefits will exceed compliance costs
thereafter.
As detailed in Section VIII, Preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis and Table
1, below, the standard's costs, benefits, and compliance requirements are consistent with those of other OSHA safety
standards, such as the Hazardous Waste Operations and Emergency Response (HAZWOPER) standard.
 


<TABLE>




1Standard (CFR cite) 

1Final rule date (FR cite) 

1Number of deaths prevented annually 

1Number of injuries prevented annually 

1Annual cost first five yrs (mill) 

1Annual cost next five yrs (mill) 
 


Grain handling (1910.272)

l123187 (52 FR 49622)
18
394
5.9 to 33.4
5.9 to 33.4 
HAZWOPER (1910.120)

l3689 (54 FR 9311)
32
18,700
153
153 
Excavations (Subpt P)

l103189 (54 FR 45,954)
74
800
306
306 
Process Safety Mgmt (1910.119)

l22492 57 FR 6356
330 
1,917
880.7
470.8 
Permit-Required Confined Spaces (1910.146)

l11493 58 FR 4462
54
5,041
202.4
202.4 

</TABLE>
 


OSHA assessed employee risk by evaluating exposure to marine cargo handling hazards. The Agency acknowledges that
some industries covered by the proposed revisions of the Longshoring and Marine Terminal standards have more documented
marine cargo handling injuries or fatalities than do others. OSHA does not believe that the risk associated with exposure
to marine cargo handling related hazards varies according to the number of incidents documented for a particular
SIC code. OSHA has set the scope of the proposed revisions of the Longshoring and Marine Terminal standards to address
those situations where employees are exposed to marine cargo handling hazards, regardless of the relative frequency
of incidents. The Agency believes, based on analysis of the elements of the hazards identified, there is sufficient
information for OSHA to determine that employees in the covered sectors face significant risks marine cargo handling
activities. Therefore, the Agency has determined that all employees within the scope of the proposed standard face
a significant risk of material harm and that compliance with the proposed revisions of the Longshoring and Marine
Terminal standards is reasonably necessary to protect affected employees from that risk.


IV. Review of General Industry Standards for Longshoring Operations Applicability


Of all the work environments OSHA regulates, the shipboard workplace ranks high among those that do not track easily
with many of the regulations that comprise 29 CFR part 1910 (General Industry standards). For instance, subjects
such as scaffolding; powered platforms; power presses; wood working machinery; abrasive wheels; forging machines;
pulp and paper mills; bakery equipment; laundry machinery; sawmills; logging; telecommunications; and spray painting,
all of which receive comprehensive discussion within the text of part 1910, are virtually non-existent concerns
in shipboard longshoring operations. Essentially longshoring is a transport industry and, as such, is free from
many of the hazards found in general industry. Accordingly, these provisions are not included in this proposed rule.
In some areas where there is current coverage in part 1918, there is similar coverage in part 1910. OSHA's primary concern
is to make sure that the 1910 provisions needed to supplement the 1918 coverage are included in the proposal. For instance,
subjects such as ladders; slings; conveyors; industrial trucks; cranes and personal protective equipment, which
are fully addressed within part 1910, are presently addressed with a specific regard for the maritime workplace,
within OSHA's current Longshoring rules. This proposal seeks to update and revise the existing part 1918 and in some
instances has relied in substantial measure upon part 1910 language. In other instances, such as when addressing
container and roll on/roll off operations, entirely new concepts have been developed to take account of the sometimes
unique operational aspects of the modern stevedoring community.
Where the hazards present in shipside cargo handling are directly parallel to those encountered in the shoreside
aspect of marine cargo handling, such as in sanitation considerations, OSHA is proposing that the language of provisions
designed to address such shoreside hazards be the same as in the Marine Terminal standards in 29 CFR part 1917.
Interested parties are requested to submit any information related to the coverage of this proposed revision of the
Longshoring rules. For example, are specific hazards adequately addressed in this proposal? Are longshore worker
exposed to safety and health hazards which this proposal does not adequately address? Have unnecessary provisions
been included in the proposal? Are there any areas of general industry coverage that have not been included in the proposal
that should be? OSHA would particularly appreciate information on these issues.


V. Summary and Explanation of the Proposal


Subpart A_Scope and Definitions


Section 1918.1 

Scope and applicability

. Proposed 1918.1 describes the scope and applicability of the Longshoring standard. The Longshoring rules apply
from the foot of the gangway up, to include all cargo handling related activities aboard a given vessel. It is important
to remember, however, that in ship to shore/shore to ship cargo transfer operations using shore based material handling
devices, all lifting device specific aspects of such transfers will be covered by the part 1917 rules. When cargo transfer
is accomplished using ship's cargo gear, the part 1918 rules shall apply.
In keeping with the concept outlined in the foregoing section of this preamble (II. General Format of the Standard),
certain selected provisions currently found in OSHA's part 1910 standards have been identified to have application
to shipboard longshoring operations. Sections 1918.1(b)(1) through (4), (b)(6) through (8), and (b)(10) through
(12) provide coverage for hazards for which the marine cargo handling industry is neither unique nor different from
other industries. These hazards are not otherwise addressed by existing maritime standards. The hazards addressed
by 1918.1(b)(5) (Tools) and (b)(9) (Machine Guarding), on the other hand, are addressed by existing maritime standards
but do not receive the comprehensive treatment afforded by part 1910, subpart P, (Hand and Portable Powered Tools
and Other Hand-Held Equipment) and subpart O, (Machinery and Machine Guarding).
OSHA is proposing to delete the current requirements for hand tools, 1918.72, titled Tools, and replace it with Subpart
P of 29 CFR part 1910, titled Hand and Portable Powered Tools and Other Hand-Held Equipment. OSHA believes that the
general Industry Subpart P regulations are more comprehensive and afford better protection. OSHA proposes to do
the same in the Marine Terminal regulations by replacing the paragraphs under the sections heading Hand tools, 1917.51
and replacing them with 29 CFR 1910 subpart P.
For the same reasons, OSHA is also proposing to remove the requirements under 1917.151 titled Machine guarding, and
replace them with Subpart O of the General Industry standards, part 1910, titled Machinery and Machine Guarding.
OSHA is also proposing to include Subpart O, Machinery and machine guarding, to the Scope and Applicability section
of part 1918. 
OSHA promulgated the hazardous waste operations and emergency response (HAZWOPER) standard on March 6, 1989 (54
FR 9294). OSHA'S decision to cover all emergency response was based upon the high risk associated with emergency response
by untrained and unprotected employees and the need for proper training and equipment to be provided for emergency
response to hazardous substance releases. This standard currently applies in its entirety to shipboard longshoring
operations. 
HAZWOPER divides emergency response into three separate areas: (1) Response at uncontrolled hazardous waste sites
(1910.120(l)); (2) response at Resource, Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (RCRA), as amended, facilities (42
U.S.C. 6901 et seq.) 1910.120(p)(8); and (3) response to emergency hazardous substance releases not covered by the
previously noted paragraphs 1910.120(q). Since the activities described in the first two areas of the HAZWOPER standard
do not represent marine cargo handling activities within the scope of part 1917 or part 1918, OSHA is proposing to only
apply 1910.120(q) to longshore (part 1918) and marine terminal operations (part 1917). 
Paragraph (q) covers employees engaged in toxic substance emergency response no matter where it occurs. This paragraph,
essentially, requires employers to develop and implement an emergency response plan to handle anticipated toxic
substance emergencies prior to the commencement of emergency response operations. If employers decide to evacuate
their employees from the danger area when an emergency occurs and do not permit their employees to assist in handling
the emergency, they are exempt from the requirements of this paragraph if they provide an emergency action plan and
meet other requirements in accordance with 1910.38(a) which states: 


The emergency action plan shall be in writing *** and shall cover those designated actions employers
and employees must take to ensure employee safety from fire and other emergencies.




Simply stated, if an employer decides ``not to fight a fire'' (i.e., not to respond to an emergency), then 1910.120(q)
does not apply but 1910.38(a) does.
OSHA is proposing to delete the current requirements for hand tools, 1918.72, titled Tools, and replace it with subpart
P of 29 CFR Part 1910, titled Hand and Portable Powered Tools and Other Hand-Held Equipment. OSHA believes that the
general Industry subpart P regulations are more comprehensive and afford better protection. OSHA proposes to do
the same in the Marine Terminal regulations by replacing the paragraphs under the sections heading Hand tools, 1917.51
and replacing with 29 CFR part 1910 subpart P.
For the same reasons, OSHA is also proposing to remove the requirements under 1917.51 titled Machine guarding, and
replace them with subpart O of the General Industry Standards, part 1910, titled Machinery and Machine Guarding.
Proposed 1918.2 carries over many of the definitions from the current Longshoring regulations. However, there are
some new definitions or some modifications to existing definitions that reflect changes in current custom and practice
in the Longshore industry.
For example, the term ``designated person'', which is not used in the current longshore regulation, is used in this
proposal. The term is used to identify a person who has a special skill in a particular area and has been so noted by the
employer. Because of this skill, this employee is assigned to perform specific tasks in this area of expertise. While
the concept of ``designated person'' is found throughout the current requirements, it is expressed in many different
ways. This proposal tightens up the use of this concept by its consistent use of the term ``designated person'' throughout
the standard. Some examples of the use of the term are: 1918.51(b) requires that a designated representative, in lieu
of the employer, shall inspect vessel's cargo gear before use and at intervals during use; and 1918.55 (c)(7) where
a designated person is one with knowledge in crane operations, specifically when using two or more cranes to hoist
in unison, along with knowledge in rigging.
In addition, the current references to the ``Federal maritime jurisdiction'' and ``navigable waters'' in the definitions
of ``employee'' in paragraph (e) and ``employer'' in paragraph (f) are being dropped. The current rules were originally
promulgated under the Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 941) for which the navigable waters
was a jurisdictional prerequisite. With the promulgation of the OSH Act, which applies to private sector employment
in workplaces in a covered jurisdiction, however, such a prerequisite was no longer necessary. Therefore, OSHA is
proposing to update these rules by eliminating the reference to navigable waters in this definition. Additionally,
several new or substantially revised definitions are found in paragraphs (d), (g), (h), (j), (k), and (n) of this section.
The definitions for enclosed space and fumigant are added to this section for clarity since these terms are used in
the standard. In addition, they are virtually identical, with the exception of the examples, to those found in the
Marine Terminal standards. The term ``hazardous cargo'' has been expanded to reflect the Marine Terminal's definition
of ``hazardous cargo, materials, substance or atmosphere.'' This definition goes beyond the current part 1918 definition
by including references to subpart Z as well as oxygen-deficient atmospheres. Additionally, it is, in turn, consistent
with the Hazardous Communication standard found at 29 CFR 1910.1200. Another new definition is integral to the major
impetus for revising part 1918, as discussed above: ``intermodal container.'' The definition for ``intermodal
container'' reflects both the definition found in the International Labor Organization (ILO) Code of Practice for
Safety and Health in Dock Work, (Ex. 1135) and the definition found in International Standards Organization
(ISO) Standard 830, Freight Containers-Terminology, (Ex. 1134). This definition is also being proposed
to replace the current definition for ``intermodal container'' found in the Marine Terminal standard, 1917.2(u).
The definitions of ``dockboards'' and ``ramps'', currently found in the Marine Terminal standard, are being proposed
for Longshoring, as well, with minor modification.
Certain definitions currently in part 1918 would be deleted. Existing definitions referring to the existing 1918.13,
certification of shore-based material handling devices were deleted because they were superseded by the Marine
Terminal standard. The existing definition of the term ``shall'' is being deleted as unnecessary.


Subpart B_Gear Certification


A. 

Section 1918.11 Gear certification

. Since 1960, safety and health regulations designed to protect U.S. dockworkers (with particular regard to vessel's
cargo handling gear) have relied upon the documentary proofs of tests and examinations mandated by International
Labor Organization (ILO) Convention 32 (Ex. 134). In Article 9 of that Convention, units and articles comprising
ship's cargo handling gear are enumerated and assigned an annual/quadrennial schedule of tests/examinations that
must be attended and attested to by individuals judged to be ``competent'' by the national authorities of the vessel's
registry. Although not a signatory to that Convention, the United States has conformed to this Convention via regulation
promulgated by: (1) the U.S. Coast Guard, with regard to inspected U.S. flag vessels; and (2) OSHA, with regard to foreign
flag vessels (1918.12). The Coast Guard has promulgated cargo gear regulations that exceed those found in Convention
32, namely 46 CFR part 91, that promote safe and unencumbered operations for U.S. flag vessels trading at foreign ports.
On foreign flag vessels trading at U.S. ports, however, OSHA has sole responsibility for regulating and enforcing
rules that address the cargo gear U.S. longshore workers utilize.
Under Convention 32, proof load testing
<FOOTCITE>1</FOOTCITE>
 was only required initially before being taken into service. Thereafter, components such as derricks, goosenecks,
mast bands, derrick bands and any other difficult to disassemble fixed gear, were to be ``thoroughly examined'' every
four years and ``inspected'' every 12 months. Other hoisting machinery, such as cranes, winches, blocks, shackles,
and any other accessory gear, were to be ``thoroughly examined'' every 12 months.


<FOOTNOTE>
1Proof load testing, as used here, means lifting an known weight that is in excess of the safe working load (SWL) of the
lifting appliance being tested.
</FOOTNOTE>


Under Convention 32, the vessel's cargo handling gear was proof load tested initially, and then perhaps never again.
After that initial test, such gear received various degrees of visual scrutiny, complemented on some occasions by
non-destructive testing, i.e., a hammer test.
Convention 152, adopted June 25, 1979, requires that such proof load testing is to occur at least every five years,
and applies to all ship's lifting appliances. Within Article 3 of the new Convention, the term ``lifting appliance''
is defined as follows:



Lifting appliance covers all stationary or mobile cargo-handling appliances, including shore-based power-operated
ramps, used on shore or on board ship for suspending, raising or lowering loads or moving from one position to another
while suspended or supported. (Ex. 15, pg.2)




Thus, the extent of cargo handling equipment found aboard ship requiring testing and certification, heretofore
restricted to specific assemblies and components (i.e., derricks, cranes, winches, etc.) is being expanded in this
proposal to include all ``lifting appliances'' under the terms of the newer ILO Convention. This would include forklifts
and other powered industrial equipment used to handle cargo that might be carried by a Ro-Ro vessel; and elevators
found on Ro-Ro vessels used to move cargo from one deck level to another_in addition to vessel cranes and derricks.
Under this proposal in 1918.11, all this equipment would be required to be tested and thoroughly examined initially
before being put into use; retested and thoroughly examined every five years; and thoroughly examined every 12 months.
In those situations where one container is used to lift another container, using twist locks, then the upper container
and twist locks become, in effect, a lifting appliance and must be certified as such.


International Aspects


As is the case with all Federal agencies whose regulations impact international trade, OSHA has developed this proposal
in light of international considerations. Through both law and policy, the United States has decided that standards-related
activities shall not unnecessarily be a barrier to trade. The Trade Agreements Act of 1979 (19 U.S.C. 2501 

et seq

). addresses technical barriers to trade with regard to federal regulation. This Act states in Title 19 of the U.S.
Code as follows:





2532. Federal standards-related activities

No Federal Agency may engage any standards related activity that creates unnecessary obstacles to the foreign commerce
of the United States, * * *.
(1) Nondiscriminatory treatment. * * *


 * * * * * * *


(2) Use of international standards._


(A) In general. * * * each Federal agency, in developing standards, shall take into consideration International standards
and shall, if appropriate, base the standards on International standards.




Additionally, and consonant with this country's position on barriers to international trade, the United States
is a signatory to the Multilateral Convention on the Facilitation of International Maritime Traffic (1965) (Ex.
13). As a contracting government, the United States has agreed to:



*** Undertake to cooperate in securing the highest practicable degree of uniformity in formalities,
documentary requirements and procedures in all matters in which such uniformity will facilitate and improve international
maritime traffic and keep to a minimum any alterations informalities, documentary requirements and procedures
necessary to meet special requirements of a domestic nature. (Article 3)




Mindful of these international aspects, OSHA sought to formulate an acceptable approach to the vessel's cargo handling
gear issue, and to other issues. The Agency requested the Department of State (Ex. 17) to present OSHA's tentative
approach to all foreign nations whose flags may enter U.S. ports. This exercise was conducted in hope of ascertaining
global acceptance. Reports back from responding foreign nations (Ex. 16) indicated overwhelming support
for the Agency's approach to these issues, and OSHA has incorporated it in this proposal. Most nations, although stipulating
that they had not as yet ratified the more recent ILO Convention, indicated that national laws recently ratified or
those currently in the legislative process were at least as strong, and in some cases more stringent, than Convention
152. In consideration of this widespread international acceptance of ILO Convention 152's approach to testing and
certification of cargo gear, OSHA has decided to propose it in this revision of the Longshoring standards. The Agency
is interested in any additional comment on this issue that interested parties may be in a position to offer.


Subpart C_Means of Access 



Section 1918.21 Gangways and other means of access

. This proposed section joins together two similar sections (1918.11_Gangways and 1918.21_Gangways and Other Means
of Access) of OSHA's current Longshoring rules. Clarity is improved in that rules addressing the same specific issue
will no longer be situated in two different subparts of part 1918. As is the case in the current rules, gangway dimensions
and characteristics are set out in proposed paragraph (a) to provide the safe access to vessels necessary for longshore
workers. By using a blend of specification with performance based alternatives, the proposal lends the flexibility
needed in accommodating foreign vessels. Language has been added that allows the use of materials that have been developed
since the current rule was written, as long as the material has a strength equivalent to those that are listed.
Proposed paragraph (b) carries over language from the current rules, as well as the term ``trimmed'' found in the Joint
Maritime Safety Code of the New York Shipping Association/ International Longshoremen's Association (NYSA/ILA
Safety Code) (Ex. 12) part M, paragraph 1), and requires that despite changing conditions brought about by
tides, cargo operations, etc., the gangway and its components must be wholly serviceable.
Proposed paragraphs (c) through (k) are similar to the language found in the current rules. Some paragraphs have been
modified to address some problems associated with the current language. Paragraph (d) has been modified to require
a safety net or suitable protection when the gangway overhangs the water in such a manner that there is a danger of employees
falling between the ship and the dock. The net is required to prevent an employee from falling to a lower level. This
is consistent with ILO'S ``Safety and Health in Dock Work,'' (Ex. 1138). A new paragraph (i) has been added to
address the hazard associated with slippery handrails and walking surfaces on gangways. Paragraph (j) references
1918.92 for illumination requirements on a gangway. In summary, these paragraphs address the requirement for a safe
passage from the dock to the deck.
Proposed paragraph (l) recognizes the U.S. Coast Guard's authority relating to jurisdictional matters aboard vessels
having a current and valid certificate of inspection. Notwithstanding, for the purpose of this rule, if access is
attained other than by the vessel's regular gangway, that access shall conform to the entirety of this section.
Proposed 1918.22 carries over language from the current rules. Both paragraphs of this section contain the standard
universal criteria for rope ladders, also known as ``Jacob's ladders'', namely, that such ladders be either double-runged
or flat-treaded, so as to provide a more substantial tread surface; that they be well maintained and properly secured
to available fittings; and that they not be permitted to hang from their lashing points with slack in them.
It is often the case that such ladders are provided by the vessel when a more traditional means of access cannot be utilized.
Notwithstanding, under these proposed rules the employer (who is often a contractor rendering a service to the vessel)
must comply with this proposed section before employees are permitted to use these ladders.
Proposed 1918.23 also carries over language from the current rules. Paragraph (a) sets out criteria for ramps used
to gain vehicular access to or between barges. Of primary importance is that such ramps be of sufficient strength for
the intended load. These ramps must be equipped with sideboards that will prevent vehicles from falling. They must
also be well maintained and properly secured during use.
Paragraph (b) addresses employee passage to and from certain floating craft. Under favorable conditions, it is sometimes
possible to pass to and from such vessels without the aid of any device. In other than favorable conditions, however,
this paragraph sets forth the criteria to provide safe passage. Of significant importance is the exception included
at the end of the paragraph. That exception recognizes practical difficulties encountered on the Mississippi River
system in providing traditional means of access on all occasions. When originally promulgated in 1960, the longshore
rules (Ex. 139) took no cognizance of these special difficulties. In 1965, the Labor Standards Bureau published
the following proposed clarification, (Ex. 140):



In order to provide practical solutions in cases where current requirements cannot be met, because of local river
and bank conditions (this section) should be amended by the addition of a provision. (p.7609)




A provision to that effect was published in the Federal register in final form on May 21, 1966 (Ex. 141). Historically
(Ex. 198), this exception has been based on tidal and current conditions on the Mississippi system (see definition
at proposed 1918.2(s)). OSHA's experience has thus far concluded that such exceptional conditions prevail only
on this inland system; however, the Agency solicits comments from interested individuals with other information
on this issue.
A sentence has been added to proposed 1924.23(c) that requires no more than two Jacob's ladders for any single barge,
raft, or log boom being worked. This proposal is consistent with the requirements in 1918.25(a) which requires a maximum
of two access ladders in a hatch. The term ``gang'' is used here and several other places in this proposal. It refers
to a group of longshore persons that are assigned to a particular hold, deck, etc. on a ship for the purpose of loading
or discharging cargo.
A new paragraph (e) has been added to this section to address the problem associated with the lower rungs of a Jacob's
ladder being crushed between the barge and another structure by requiring that a spacer or equivalent means be used
to prevent it from occurring. If the lower rungs are crushed, this could cause an employee to fall between the barge
and other structure. Another new paragraph (f) has been added to this section. This paragraph requires the a net or
equivalent protection if there is a space between the vessel, barge or other structure when using a Jacob's ladder
to prevent an employee from falling into the water.
Proposed 1918.24 combines the current language of the existing longshore provisions for bridge plates and ramps
with the terms that apply to similar shoreside equipment within 29 CFR part 1917 (Marine Terminals, 1917.124).
In the adoption of such parallel rules, OSHA hopes to enhance the uniformity of regulation that is critical to safety
performance both shipboard and shoreside. Throughout this proposal, the Agency has attempted to foster such uniformity
and requests comments as to how this goal can be better achieved.
Paragraphs (a)(1)(iv) and (b)(1)(v) would be revised to require sideboards that are at least 6 inches (.16 m) high.
This height is the same as found for bull rails that were in place at the time of the effective date of the Marine Terminal
standard, found in 1917.112. OSHA believes that specifying the height of the sideboards will provide the necessary
protection to prevent vehicles and equipment from accidently falling off the edge. OSHA requests comment from the
public concerning appropriateness of the height of the sideboards. OSHA is also proposing to require the same 6 inch
(.16 m) sideboards for dockboards and ramps that are in the Marine Terminal standard, 1917.124.
Proposed 1918.25 combines the current requirements for portable ladders contained in the existing Longshoring
rules with the similar rules of 1917.119. For fixed ladders, however, there is a distinction between the proposed
and current Longshore standard which has to do with clearance in back of the ladder rungs. The existing requirement
is 4 inches (.11 m), but the proposed clearance is 6 inches (.16 m), which reflects the current ILO Standard.
Consistent with ILO's Guide to Safety and Health in Dock Work, (Ex. 1129), OSHA is proposing that vessels built
after December 5, 1981, (the date when ILO Convention 152, Occupational Safety and Health in Dock Work was put into
effect), have a 6-inch (15 cm) clearance between the ladder and the surface to which it is fastened. Vessels built prior
to December 5, 1981, however, may have a 4 inch (10 cm) clearance between the ladder and the surface to which it is fastened.
OSHA encourages comment on this issue. (It should be noted where a fixed ladder has inadequate clearance, a suitable
portable ladder could be used.)
Generally, proposed 1918.25 includes much of the current language for ladders with some modifications. Provisions
have been added that reference ANSI standards for manufactured portable ladders. There are also proposed provisions
for ladder maintenance and usage that are similar to what is in the Marine Terminals standard, but are new to Longshoring.
In paragraphs 1918.25(c) and (e) the phrase ``positively secured against shifting or slipping'' has been changed
to ``positively secured or held against shifting or slipping while in use''. This change acknowledges that a worker(s)
may hold a portable ladder in place while another worker is climbing the ladder in situations where the ladder cannot
be secured and is consistent with the PMA-ILWU Safety Code, Rule 1506 (Ex. 1145). In addition, for the purpose
of clarifying paragraph (e), where the employer can demonstrate that employees can safely use the cargo itself to
climb in and out of the hold (often referred to as ``safe cargo steps''), a straight ladder is not necessary.
Paragraph (j)(8) on, ladder usage, acknowledges that while some ladders may not have slip-resistant bases, they
can be readily secured by lashing them in place to prevent slipping or shifting when being used.


Subpart D_Working surfaces


OSHA clearly understands that many of the falling hazards addressed in part by this and other subparts, represent
working environments and physical characteristics no longer observed with the type of frequency that was the case
when the current Longshoring rules were last revised. Nonetheless, conventional cargo handling methods together
with more traditional vessel designs are still encountered at U.S. ports. For this reason, OSHA proposes to retain
current provisions that still have application.
As an example, proposed 1918.31(c) prohibits employers from allowing work to be conducted on surfaces comprised
of missing, broken or poorly fitting hatch covers. Currently, it is relatively rare to experience a vessel trading
at U.S. ports, fitted with the type of removable hatch covers this provision addresses. Despite that rarity, such
situations do arise.
Proposed 1918.31(d) prohibits the placing of poorly fitting hatch covers and hatch beams that would constitute a
work surface. As a practical matter, it is rare to see vessels at U.S. ports fitted out with hatch beams. In those instances,
however, identifying marks are usually permanently fixed to such equipment. Those marks correspond to marks found
on receptacle fittings on the vessel proper. In all cases, notwithstanding the presence of corresponding marks,
the employer must make sure that all hatch beams and covers are seated securely, providing a strong and stable work
surface. 
Proposed 1918.32(a) carries over language from the current Longshoring rule. Frequently cargo must be landed on
temporary surfaces, generally presented by other cargo stows, prior to its ultimate place of rest. When this is so,
it is important that employees have enough available space to work in safety upon such a surface, and that the temporary
table is strong enough to safely support the loads being imposed. There are obviously many strength and size possibilities,
which will be dictated by the size and weight of the drafts being landed.
Proposed 1918.32(b) has been revised to address changes that have occurred in technology and work practices. Employees
working on the tops of containers are now covered by 1918.85(j), Container top safety. (For a full discussion see the
preamble to 1918.85(j) below). When employees working in cargo holds, are exposed to falls of more than 8 feet (2.4
m), the edge of the working surface must be guarded by a safety net, or must be otherwise rendered safe (such as by providing
guardrails or fall arrest systems) to prevent employee injury. It should be noted that proposed 1918.32(b) does not
include employees working on the top of intermodal containers in a hold as this is also covered under 1918.85(j).
Of prime importance is that the intent of this provision is satisfied, rather than providing just the appearance of
compliance. Many times, particularly when safety nets have been rigged, they have been allowed to become very slack,
and have sometimes been secured only at their top ends. The improper rigging of safety nets compromises or even removes
the protection provided to falling employees. In these very critical fall hazard situations, this provision insists
that fully considered precautions are taken. The Pacific Coast Marine Safety Code (PCMSC) Rule 1016 (Ex. 1145)
is very similar in construction.
This paragraph has also been revised to distinguish between the purpose and use of vertical safety nets, which rise
at right angles at the perimeter of a work surface thus preventing employees from falling, and trapeze nets, which
are designed to be placed horizontally below a raised work surface to prevent falling employees from striking the
surface below. Additionally, this section requires that any nets used for purposes of fall protection meet the applicable
requirements.
Proposed 1918.33(a) and (b) are carried over from the current Longshoring rules. As the heading of this section indicates,
these provisions address the safe performance of work on or around deck loads. Provisions for work performed by employees
atop deck-stowed intermodal containers will be found at proposed 1918.85(j). 
OSHA is proposing to change the title and text of 1918.34. The current title of this section is ``Skeleton decks.''
OSHA has consulted, without success, numerous individuals from the maritime community and researched several maritime
publications, textbooks, etc. in an effort to define the terms ``skeleton deck'' and ``mechano deck.'' OSHA feels
that the use of these terms and the practice of working cargo on these particular types of decks are obsolete. Since
the hazards remain even though these terms do not, OSHA is proposing to change the title of the section to ``Other decks''
in order to group unique or uncommon decks; using generic language to address the hazards associated with landing
cargo on such decks that are not designed for such use. OSHA encourages the public to comment on whether the terms ``skeleton
deck'' and ``mechano deck'' should be kept in the text of the standard and on whether these provisions are necessary.
Proposed 1918.35 addresses hazards longshore workers face when conducting operations around open weather deck
hatchways. Vessels calling at U.S. ports are of varied designs and capabilities. Some vessels have coamings, which
are the vertical structure that surrounds the hatch opening on a ship, that are substantially higher than the proposed
section's minimum acceptable range (36 to 42 inches) (.92 to 1.07 m) other vessels may have no hatch coamings at all,
but rather flush decks or decks with an abbreviated sill, which present substantial fall hazards to longshore workers.
On such vessels, when workers work around the perimeter of open hatchways, appropriate guarding must be provided.
This proposal stipulates that taut lines or guardrails attaining the acceptable range be erected on all but the working
side of the hatch. This proposal mandates that stanchions or uprights used in their construction be supported or secured
in a manner that will prevent them from coming accidentally loose.
Proposed 1918.37 addresses the fall hazards associated with working on the decks of lighters and barges. Proposed
paragraph (a) retains language from the current rule. It prohibits the use of marginal (less than 3 feet (.92 m) wide)
deck space along the sides of covered lighters or barges on all such vessels having coamings over 5 feet (1.5 m) high.
Alternately, an employer must provide a taut handline or, as is most often the case, the vessel must be fitted with a
serviceable grab rail.
Proposed paragraph (b), also retains language from the current rule. It prohibits working or walking on unsound surfaces.
This can be a particularly important consideration on barges, in that powered industrial trucks are often brought
aboard to assist in operations. The proposed rule requires a visual check of such decks before loading operations
begin. If during the course of discharge operations an unsafe surface is discovered, work must be discontinued until
protective measures are taken (such as bridging the unsafe surface with steel plate or barricading a deck section
deemed unsafe).
Proposed 1918.38, as well as 1918.88 titled ``log operations'' are entirely new sections addressing log loading
operations and reflect current industry practice. Section 1918.38 is based on Rules 640 and 641 of the PCMSC (Ex. 1145);
on a report on log operations submitted to OSHA's Maritime Safety Standards Office by Region X (Ex. 1146); and
a training video on log operations produced by the PMA and ILWU (Ex. 1147). Loading logs from water presents
very serious falling and drowning hazards. Thus, safe walking working surfaces are extremely important to longshore
workers who are positioned offshore during log loading operations. Sound footing is essential during access to and
while working on log rafts, which are in fact the cargo. The proposed requirements provide for safe access to the worksite
and a safe working surface area. The working surface must be wide enough to allow for stable footing, securely fastened
together, and substantial enough to support the weight of the employees on it. OSHA has concluded that the basic requirements
for providing such safe surfaces should be included in this rulemaking, and seeks comment on their completeness.


Subpart E_Opening and closing hatches


Proposed 1918.41 addresses coaming clearances and provides requirements to protect longshore workers from fall
hazards and from being struck by falling cargo during the process of opening up and closing hatches. Proposed paragraph
(a) addresses weather deck clearances. When a smooth-sided deck load is stowed within 3 feet (.92 m) of the hatch coaming,
and the available coaming height is &lt;24 inches, a taut handline shall be provided so that employees are able to safely
remove or replace hatch beams and covers. Similar language covering such situations is found in the NYSA/ILA Joint
Maritime Safety Code_part C/Rule 38 (Ex. 12) and the PCMSC_Rule 1007 (Ex. 1145).
Throughout this proposal, OSHA has specified that ``taut'' lines or ``taut'' handrails or guardrails be provided
in certain situations where available walking or working space is compromised because of inevitable stowage or vessel
design considerations. In using the term taut, as with other terms commonly encountered in maritime safety codes,
OSHA is using language which is familiar in the industry under current practices. Where necessary, OSHA is proposing
definitions for various terms used in the proposed standards, to ensure that these terms are uniformly understood.
To be as clear as possible with regard to its intention in utilizing the term ``taut'' in connection with the subject
lines, handrails and guardrails, the Agency states that ``taut'' connotes tightly and securely drawn, and as length
and distance may warrant, securely fastened at intervals. The idea behind providing these taut lines, etc., is to
allow an employee to rely on these objects in maintaining or regaining a stable balance in a constrained work area.
Generally, guardrails successfully serve their purpose when their height can stay within a serviceable range (42
to 36 inches) (1.07 m to .92 m). ``Taut'' handrails and ``taut'' lines, however, are sometimes required to be fitted
to objects and structures of varying dimensions (such as deck cargo and the sides of covered lighters) for the purpose
of enabling an employee to maintain balance and footing.
Proposed paragraph (b)(1) addresses intermediate deck hatchway clearance, and requires that a 3 foot (.91 m) clear
work area be provided between stowed cargo and hatch coaming at both sides and one end of hatches with athwartship beams,
and at both ends of hatches with fore and aft beams, while employees are engaged in opening or closing the hatchway.
Proposed paragraph (b)(2) makes it clear that the 3-foot (.91 m) working surface under proposed paragraph (b)(1),
is not required when a fall hazard is not present. Proposed paragraph (b)(3) recognizes that fitted grating over-decking,
such as the type used in some perishables trades, can be considered part of the actual deck or working space (for the
purposes of assessing compliance with proposed paragraph (b)(1)), if they are properly placed within the 3-foot
clearance area and if they are in good condition (flush fitting and presenting a level work surface). OSHA has dropped
the reference to ``banana'' gratings because OSHA feels it is an unnecessary reference.
Proposed paragraph (c) would require grab rails or taut hand lines to be provided where, because of wing-space structures
or spare parts storage, coaming clearance is minimized. Proposed paragraph (d) advises that this proposed section
is inapplicable in situations that permit the opening and closing of hatches without employees having to place or
remove individual sections manually. It cautions, however, that whenever the 3-foot clearance is lacking, cargo
which is likely to shift or fall must be blocked or otherwise restrained.
Proposed 1918.42, similar to 1918.41, is carried over substantively in its entirety from the current longshore rules,
although some editing has been done for clarity. Provisions in this section addresses the hazards associated with
handling hatch beams and pontoons, such as falling into the hatch or being struck by these removable items. Equivalent
rules can be found on section 2 of the PCMSC (Ex. 1145) and parts C and O of the NYSA/ILA Joint Maritime Safety Code
(Ex. 12). In summary, it is proposed that hatch beam and pontoon bridles be long enough to easily fit their attachment
points. Hatch beam bridles must be equipped with attachment devices that cannot become accidentally dislodged,
such as toggles. Pontoon bridles are required to have the appropriate number of legs to conform to the design of the
cover. All such legs must be utilized when lifting. If all legs of a bridle cannot be used due to the design of the cover,
the spare leg(s) must be prevented from free swinging. Finally, as for the construction of these bridles, OSHA requires
that for proper manual guidance, at least two legs be fitted with a fibre rope lanyard, and that the bridle end of the
lanyard (the end attached directly to the bridle) be constructed of chain or wire rope.
Proposed 1918.43 is generally carried over from the current longshore rules, with some changes made for clarity,
a revision to paragraph (j), and the addition of a new paragraph (i). Provisions in this section address the hazards
associated with handling and stowing of hatch boards, hatch beams, and pontoons, such as falling into the hatch or
being struck by improperly stowed items. Similar requirements are found in Section X of the PCMSC (Ex. 1145),
part O of the NYSA/ILA code (Ex. 12), and ILO Convention 152.
In revised paragraph (j), tarpaulins may be used to reduce the dust emissions of bulk cargoes instead of night tents
if the vessel lacks cargo gear. In these situations, OSHA requires positive means, such as placards or barricades,
be taken to prevent employees from walking on the tarpaulin that is covering an open or partially open hatch. Verbal
warnings or instructions do not satisfy this provision.
A new paragraph (i) is being proposed to address the hazards of unsecured materials falling from hatch covers when
they are being moved overhead.


Subpart F_Vessel's Cargo Handling Gear


Proposed subpart F would apply to all gear and equipment used in cargo handling that is the property of the vessel. Examples
of this type of equipment can include cranes, derricks, specialized bridles, winches, wire rope, and shackles. This
subpart addresses hazards associated with the use of that gear. This would include such hazards as using faulty gear,
overloading or improperly rigging cargo gear, or improper operation of cargo gear, which can result in serious injury
or death. (See Ex. 1103.)
Proposed 1918.51 contains general requirements that apply to all cargo handling equipment that is permanently attached
to a vessel.
Proposed paragraph (a) stipulates that the safe working load of the gear, whether marked on the lifting appliance
itself or specified in the required certificates/gear register, shall not be exceeded. Proposed paragraph (b) requires
that each component of ship's cargo handling gear be inspected by the employer before use, and at intervals during
use. This requirement is more clearly worded than the existing requirement by specifying the employer's obligation
to perform a visual inspection. Also, this new language more closely parallels the shoreside requirement found in
29 CFR 1917.42(a)(2). The paragraph also prohibits the use of unsafe gear. Proposed paragraph (c) provides criteria
for splicing wire rope and for wire rope configuration characteristics. Additionally, the paragraph conforms the
Longshore regulations to some current use criteria for wire rope that appear in OSHA's rules for the shoreside aspect
of marine cargo handling (Marine Terminals_29 CFR part 1917). Proposed paragraphs (d), (e), and (f), also parallel
the shore side rules. OSHA believes that the new language in this section enhances the safety of the worker in several
ways. In paragraph (c), new and more stringent requirements are proposed for wire rope that is part of the ship's cargo
handling gear. In addition, the new provisions (paragraphs (d), (e), and (f)) set replacement criteria for wire rope
slings, natural and synthetic fibre rope slings, synthetic web slings, chains and chain slings, none of which are
addressed by the existing standard.
Proposed 1918.52, 1918.53, and 1918.54 and all address the subject of rigging and operating vessel's cargo handling
gear. By and large, the requirements of these sections are found in the existing rule. Some language modifications
have been made to enhance clarity. In addition, some paragraphs have new language that enhances the understanding
of the provision which promotes greater compliance and eases enforcement burdens. For example, proposed 1918.53(e)
adds to the existing reporting requirement of a defective winch, the following requirement ``... and the winch shall
not be used until the defect or malfunction is corrected.'' Similarly, paragraph (i) adds a monitoring requirement
during operation and (k) removes a feasibility exception based on design that is no longer necessary today due to technological
improvements. 
OSHA wishes to raise the issue and solicit comment from the public regarding whether or not to delete 1918.52(b). This
paragraph addresses the use of chain topping lift stoppers and clamp type stoppers that are used to manually lower
and raise the boom. This method of topping the boom is a potentially dangerous operation and has been largely replaced
by the use of electric topping lift winches, which do not require the use of stoppers. However, OSHA understands that
as a result of the breakup of the Soviet Union, vessels which had not been allowed to sail into the U.S. because of restrictions
placed on Soviet bloc countries, are now calling on various ports of the United States. In some cases, these vessels
are old, and have types of cargo handling gear that had been largely replaced by more modern gear. In light of this occurrence,
OSHA solicits public comment on this issue.
A new paragraph has been added, 1918.54(a), that addresses the hazard associated with the poor practice of rigging
guys or preventers so that they chafe against other guys, preventers, or stays. This practice can cause the vessels's
cargo gear to fail as the chafing can cause the wires to separate. This can lead to serious injury or death as the gear
and cargo fall down on the deck or into the hold.
Proposed 1918.55 covers deck cranes permanently affixed to a vessel. The existing rule only addresses one of the hazards_the
guarding of the swing radius. The new requirements more completely address the hazards encountered in the use of ship's
cranes. These rules become necessary due to the widespread replacement of winches and booms by ship's cranes on newer
vessels. In addition, the new provisions closely parallel similar shoreside requirements in part 1917 and other
OSHA crane standards.
This section prohibits the use of cranes which develop a visible or known defect that impacts on its safe operation.
In addition, the operator's position must be well maintained, with good visibility provided through the operator
cab's glass. During cargo operations, areas that are within the swing radius of the body of revolving cranes and are
accessible to employees must be guarded to prevent an employee from being caught between the body of the crane and any
fixed structure, or between parts of the crane. Paragraph (c) of 1918.55 also addresses the danger of employees being
caught between shipboard gantry cranes, such as would be found on a LASH (Lighter aboard ship) vessel or a self contained
container ship, and fixed structures on deck along the path of the cranes travel. (Ex. 1103, cases 26 and 27).
Crane brakes must be monitored throughout the workshift. If they are unable to hold the load, the crane must not be used.
If cranes are used in tandem, a designated person (see definitions) must direct the operation with special emphasis
on positioning, rigging and movement.


Subpart G_Cargo Handling Gear and Equipment Other than Ship's Gear


Proposed Subpart G applies to all cargo handling gear utilized in cargo operations that is not part of the vessel (ship's
gear). Proposed 1918.61 is very broad in its coverage. In paragraph (a) it stipulates that all gear and equipment brought
aboard a vessel must be inspected before and during its use by the employer or a designated person to determine its condition.
If, upon inspection, an unsafe condition is found, the gear must not be used until deficiencies are corrected.
Proposed paragraph (b)(1) is carried over from the current longshore rules and requires that the Safe Working Load
(SWL) of the gear not be exceeded. Proposed paragraph (b)(2) is new. This paragraph requires the marking of the SWL
on special stevedoring gear with a safe working load (SWL) of over five short tons. OSHA believes that this is a basic
requirement (Ex. 1151), and that most gear in use is already marked with the SWL on it.
Paragraph (c), which is similar to the current language, stipulates that the weight of any article of stevedoring
gear that exceeds 2,000 pounds (1 short ton) must be plainly marked with the weight of that article before being hoisted
by the ship's gear. Examples of such stevedoring gear are container handling lifting frames and certain multi-point
engagement bridles. It is important to consider the weight of such articles when evaluating safe working loads of
the ship's cargo gear.
This is because the weight of the gear must be added to the weight of the load being lifted to determine the actual load,
which together cannot exceed the SWL.
Proposed paragraphs (d) and (e) remain unchanged and address certification and certification procedures.
Proposed paragraph (f) addresses special stevedoring gear fabricated of components that are not common, off-the-shelf
type items. For example, gear room constructed spreader bars for heavy lift cargo, special lifting devices for unique
pieces of cargo, or bar pallet bridles will have some components that are not marketed or purchased with a specific
cargo handling use in mind. Such certification must be performed in accordance with paragraphs (d) and (e) by an agency
accredited by the Department of Labor under 29 CFR part 1919 before being put into use. Also, all intermodal container
spreaders that are supplied by the stevedore for hoisting afloat shall be similarly inspected, tested, and certificated.
Special stevedoring gear with a SWL of five short tons or less can continue to be inspected and tested as a unit by a designated
person.
OSHA is also proposing that all cargo handling gear covered by 1918.61(f) with a SWL greater than 5 short tons be inspected
and proof load tested every four years in accordance with the chart found in paragraph (f) of this section. This inspection
and proof load test may be done by an agency accredited by the U.S. Department of Labor under 29 CFR part 1919, or it can
be done by a designated person.
This change to the existing longshore regulations parallels similar requirements found in 29 CFR part 1917, Marine
Terminals. For consistency between the two parts, OSHA is proposing in this rulemaking, to change 1917.50(b)(5)
to reflect the 5 long ton exemption that is being proposed in 1918.61 and to require the periodic testing of special
stevedoring gear and container spreaders every four years by a designated person, shoreside as well as shipside.
OSHA feels that this will provide additional protection for those employees that use special stevedoring gear and
will eliminate any confusion that may currently exist by requiring special stevedoring gear with a SWL greater than
five long tons and spreaders supplied by the employer to be inspected, tested, and certificated whether it is used
by shore-based material handling equipment or by cargo handling gear afloat.
Proposed 1918.62 covers all miscellaneous gear that is not part of ship's gear, such as all slings, shackles, hooks,
blocks and pallets (loose gear), employed aboard a vessel for use in cargo handling operations. The hazards addressed
by this section are those generally associated with an employee's being struck by falling objects, i.e. dunnage,
gear or cargo, when the gear fails. The provisions in this section helps to assure that loose gear used in the longshoring
operation is both adequate in strength and size and in good enough condition to safely perform the operation. To foster
uniformity, the Agency proposes the same requirements for miscellaneous gear as required in shoreside cargo handling
at 29 CFR 1917.42. (See 46 FR 4194 and 48 FR 30895 for a full discussion of the rationale for these provisions.)
OSHA proposes a comprehensive system of tables (See Appendix II) that will be utilized in the event that manufacturer's
recommendations/certificates are not immediately available at the worksite for safe working load assessment.
The tables are primarily based on ASME B30.91990 (Slings), (Ex. 1148), as well as requirements applying
to wire rope clips and shackles currently contained in the Agency's rules for Marine Terminals. It is OSHA's position
that the manufacturers's recommended use and safe working load criteria, given the wide universe of international
fabrication of all miscellaneous gear, are the most reliable factors to utilize in determining safe usage. However,
the Agency appreciates that certificates or manufacturers' use recommendations may not be instantly available
in certain circumstances. For instance, when inbound pre-slung drafts of cargo are ready for discharge at a given
port, certificates or use recommendations might not be found aboard the vessel. Because such pieces of miscellaneous
gear are not ``ship's gear,'' it is likely that no data on them will appear within the ship's collection of certificates.
Likewise, such gear cannot be properly classified as ``stevedore supplied gear,'' for the stevedore will not have
known the characteristics of the slings until the hatch section is actually observed. In these circumstances, the
tables found in Appendix II can be relied upon to provide a realistic safe working load.
In accordance with I.L.O. recommendation 160 (Ex. 18), OSHA, in proposed requirement 1918.62(h)(5)(ii),
has added wording to prohibit the use of wrought iron in new parts of lifting appliances or loose gear. As a practical
matter, wrought iron is rarely seen on vessels that are trading today. However, as with many of the regulations in this
rule that have reduced application, there is the possibility that such conditions may still exist, and for that reason
the relevant standards are being left in the proposal. OSHA invites the public to comment on this matter.
Finally, a new paragraph is proposed to be added, (g)(2)(vi), that adds an additional criterion to cause a synthetic
web sling to be removed from service. If warning threads or markers that the manufacturer has designed to indicate
excessive wear or damage are visible, than the sling must be removed from service. Proposed 1918.63 and 1918.64 provide
requirements for the use of chutes, rollers and both gravity and mechanically powered conveyors. OSHA proposes to
bring into part 1918 the requirements that cover such pieces of equipment within the shoreside (29 CFR 1917.48 and
1917.49) rules. In this manner, no regulatory disparity will exist with equipment that often physically originates
on shore and extends onto the ship. (See 46 FR 4208 and 48 FR 30900 for a full discussion of the rationale for these provisions
as adopted in the Marine Terminal standard.) Notable among the changes brought about by bringing those shoreside
rules aboard vessels, is the requirement that powered conveyors be locked out and tagged during most maintenance,
repair, and serving. Also, that same procedure would be required in most situations that require the removal of a jam
or overload on the powered conveyor system.
Proposed 1918.65 covers the use of all mechanically powered vehicles brought aboard vessels to conduct or assist
in cargo handling operations. Included in this category of equipment are all industrial trucks and all bulk cargo
moving vehicles. In that these same vehicles are similarly utilized in the shoreside aspect of marine cargo handling,
the hazards are essentially the same. These would include, among others, exceeding the safe working capacity of the
vehicle; cargo falling on the operator either from stowage on the vessel or from being handled by the vehicle itself;
improper maintenance which could lead to unsafe operation of the vehicle; and the falling hazards associated with
the lifting of personnel by mechanically powered vehicles. Therefore, OSHA has proposed to track the requirements
found in 1917.43 that are applicable to this class of equipment. (See 46 FR 4197 and 48 FR 30896 for a full discussion
of the rationale of these provisions as adopted in the Marine Terminal standard.) Additionally, the Agency is proposing
a requirement for roll-over protection on bulk cargo moving vehicles (such as the type used to trim and position bulk
cargo in underdeck spaces). Such protection is required on similar pieces of equipment used in construction industry
settings, where the hazard posed by turnover also exists. OSHA seeks comment on whether this provision provides adequate
protection shipside and whether similar protection is needed shoreside.
OSHA is proposing, in 1918.65(g), that vehicles purchased after the effective date of the final rule shall be equipped
with parking brakes. OSHA believes that, although most older equipment may not be equipped with parking brakes, equipment
that is currently being manufactured is generally equipped with such brakes. A parking brake is especially important
when working Ro-Ro type vessels where the ramps can have a steep grade.
Proposed 1918.66 covers all cranes and derricks which are not part of a vessel's permanent cargo handling gear, but
are placed aboard a vessel temporarily to conduct cargo operations. As an example, mobile and crawler type cranes
are at times positioned upon barges and thereupon transported to locations adjacent to a vessel to load and discharge
cargo. Given that these hoisting devices are identical at both the shoreside and shipboard location, the hazards
associated with the operation of this equipment are basically the same. These would include, among others, exceeding
the safe working capacity of the crane or derrick; improper operation; improper maintenance; exposed mechanical
moving parts; falling hazards associated with lifting personnel; and crushing hazards. Therefore, OSHA has relied
upon its rules for cranes and derricks found in 29 CFR 1917.45 to provide regulatory consistency to the marine cargo
handling industrial sector. (See 46 FR 4201 and 48 FR 30897 for a full discussion of the rationale of these provisions
as adopted in the Marine Terminal standard.)
In one obvious departure from the foregoing principle, the Agency has chosen not to propose requirements for load
indicating devices within this section for shipside cargo handling. Usually such devices rely upon boom radius (outreach)
as a component determinant in arriving at a load indication. When afloat, however, boom radius can be compromised
by load and stability factors, resulting in indications that are not accurate. OSHA seeks comment from interested
persons as to whether this approach provides adequate safety. In addition, the Agency solicits comment on alternative
means of preventing overloads of cranes used aboard ships. Are there reliable alternate devices (that do not use radius
as a central component in arriving at a load indication) that are sufficiently developed to accurately indicate the
weight of the load? Would load moment indicators provide equal or better protection. Are some systems more precise
than others? What other procedures could be employed to prevent overload conditions?
Additionally, proposed 1918.66(c)(2) requires that the hoisting mechanism of cranes and derricks, when being used
to hoist personnel, shall operate in the power up and power down mode with automatic brake application when stopped.
This provision is similar to the requirements found in the personnel hoisting section of the OSHA Construction standards
at 29 CFR 1926.550(g)(ii)(D). Earlier OSHA had proposed such a rule for all cranes in the Marine Terminal Proposal
(46 FR 4237) but comments and other record evidence convinced OSHA that, at the time, this would be infeasible for mobile
cranes. The final Marine Terminal standard, promulgated in 1983, therefore, only applied this provision to overhead
and container gantry cranes.
However, in 1988, OSHA issued its Construction standard for Crane or Derrick Suspended Personnel Platforms, (29
CFR 1926.550(g); 53 FR 29116). This rulemaking reexamined the feasibility of the controlled load lowering provision
and, based on the record evidence, OSHA determined that controlled load lowering was both feasible and necessary
when using cranes to hoist employees. For a detailed discussion, see 53 FR 29122.
In light of these findings, OSHA is proposing to include the controlled load lowering provision in this part, and to
amend part 1917 (1917.45(j)(2)) to cover all cranes and derricks, including mobile cranes. OSHA wishes to emphasize
that hoisting employees by crane is 

not

 a safe practice and should be used only where other means are not feasible. OSHA solicits comment on this issue.
Proposed 1918.66(c)(3) is a new requirement has also been taken from the from OSHA's Construction Safety standards
applicable to hoisting personnel. This requires that a crane used to lift personnel be equipped with an anti-two block
device. This is a device which prevents the hoist block from coming into contact with the head block of the boom. Such
``two-blocking'' can occur when the operator is not paying attention to how high the hoist block is in relation to the
head of the boom. After contact, continued hoisting of the block can cause the block to separate from the load line,
or break the load line itself, causing the hoist block and load to fall. OSHA feels that this requirement is necessary
to prevent serious injury or death to employees being hoisted by a crane. In the 1988 construction rulemaking, this
requirement was also found to be both necessary and feasible.
Proposed 1918.67 carries over the exact requirements currently found in OSHA's Longshoring rule at 1918.75. Paragraphs
(a) and (b) both provide that the employer must obtain permission from the officer in charge of the vessel whenever
internal combustion or electrically powered tools, equipment or vehicles are brought aboard, and whenever the ship's
power is needed for operating the employer's electrical tools or equipment. These requirements are prudent, in that
such employer-provided equipment may be incompatible with vessel systems and could lead to electrical and ventilation
problems, among others.
Proposed 1918.68 provides for the effective grounding of all portable electrical equipment, such as saws, drills,
grinders, etc., through a separate equipment conductor that either runs with or encloses both circuit conductors.
This represents a clarification of the current rule. Double-insulated tools and battery-operated tools are excluded
from the requirements.
Proposed 1918.69 is a section titled ``Tools.'' The current requirements with the same title are found in 1918.72,
which addresses the safety devices that are required on portable tools, generally, and portable circular saws specifically.
OSHA believes that the current OSHA General Industry standards, subpart P, titled ``Hand and Portable Powered Tools
and Other Hand-Held Equipment'' comprehensively address the subject of portable tools. The hazards presented by
these tools in this industry are no different than in general industry. Rather than repeating these requirements
here, OSHA has decided to reference them in this proposal.


Subpart H_Handling Cargo


Proposed Subpart H specifically covers the cargo handling process. These sections (1918.8189) address the
hazards encountered by longshore workers while loading and unloading cargo. The primary hazards involve situations
where the employee falls or is struck by cargo during the operation. In this subpart, OSHA is proposing to retain many
of the rules currently found within subpart H of the current Longshoring standards (part 1918); to carry over applicable
regulatory language from the Agency's rules for the shoreside segment of marine cargo handling (part 1917); and to
add new requirements to account for occupational situations that are both unique to the shipboard workplace setting
and up to date in their coverage of intermodal transport systems.
Sections 1918.81 through 1918.84 address those hazards common to the handling of break bulk (or general) cargo. They
require proper slinging, building, bulling and stowing drafts of cargo in order to prevent cargo from coming loose
from the draft and falling on or tipping over on workers.
Proposed paragraph (a) of 1918.81 is a general requirement for safety in the hoisting of slung drafts (loads hoisted
by a sling or slings). Many factors can result in an unsafely slung draft. For instance, the wires of the sling may be
placed on or around the cargo in a manner that causes a load to become unstable once it is hoisted. Such a situation can
be recognized and effectively handled simply by rearranging the placement of the sling. Also, multi-tiered drafts
are sometimes hoisted in a very unstable condition that is caused by one tier resting off center of another. Even a slight
slacking of the gear can cause drafts slung in this manner to come apart. Readjustment of such drafts before hoisting
can easily remedy that unsafe condition.
Proposed paragraph (b) requires that slings attached to the lifting gear for handling more than one draft in succession
be positively engaged to the hoisting system. This is usually accomplished by shackling the bridle (or sling) directly
into the falls. Mousing (closing off) the throat of the cargo hook assembly, is not permitted.
Proposed paragraph (c) provides protection for a common hazard encountered in break bulk cargo operations; that
of being struck by sliding pieces of cargo or dunnage (shoring materials) that fall from the draft while in transit.
There are at least two ways to correct such a situation: the first is to reconfigure the sling so that the top layer of
the cargo is effectively engaged; the second is to secure the potential ``sliders'' to themselves (by banding them,
for instance) or to the more substantial part of the draft.
Proposed paragraphs (d), (e), and (h) are virtually identical to the current rules but are modified somewhat for clarity.
Proposed paragraphs (f) and (g), on the other hand, are derived from the Marine Terminal standard which address the
hoisting of ``unitized loads.'' Unitized loads are loads that are banded or strapped together into a unit. Hoisting
hazards with such loads occur when the bands are used to hoist the load but were not designed to do so; and when hoisting
is performed when the banding is damaged. (See full discussion at 46 FR 4189.)
Proposed paragraph (i) requires that loads not be hoisted unless the crane or winch operator can clearly see the draft
at all times, or, alternatively, can clearly see the signals given by a signal person who is observing the draft. This
is particularly important in that many break bulk vessels in current use and under construction are being fitted with
revolving deck cranes. When using booms rigged in union purchase (the rigging of two booms together to be used as one
lifting unit) the position of the boom head (and thus the location of the load's ultimate place of landing) is pre-determined,
rarely changed, and fairly reliable. By contrast, in using deck cranes, the position of the boom bead can be varied
easily. Loads, therefore, can be landed at many more locations, causing increased exposure of personnel to being
struck by loads. Effective signaling requires a clear observation of the load by the signalperson and of the signalperson
by the operator.
Proposed paragraph (k) provides that the employer must require employees to stay clear of the area beneath overhead
drafts or descending lifting gear. The employer is obligated to train certain employees in correct and safe procedures
associated with the job, and to require that employees adhere to the well established and enforced work rules that
are contained in that training. (See full discussion at 46 FR 4194.) OSHA is also proposing to include the same language
in the Marine Terminal standard in 1917.13(h).
Proposed paragraph (l) prohibits riding of the load or the cargo engaging means. This precludes the utilization of
any cargo or any cargo engaging device (hook, clamshell, grapple, etc.) as a personnel conveyance. This proposed
paragraph does not cover, however, the riding of loaded intermodal container spreaders, which is addressed in 1918.85(g).
In accordance with proposed 1918.23(b), specific latitude is afforded longshoring operations taking place on the
Mississippi river system, where the use of a personnel basket may be used. However, careful consideration and consultation
with the Agency is important in the exercise of that latitude.
Proposed 1918.82 and 1918.83 (a) and (b) address the hazards of cargo becoming inadvertently dislodged from an improperly
built draft or improper stowage and falling or shifting, thus striking workers. The language is virtually 
identical to the current longshore rule. 1918.83(c), however, addresses a different hazard_losing workers in the
hold of a ship. Such a hazard is greatly enhanced when the worker is working alone or in an isolated area, such as in tanks
or reefer compartments. Also, workers trimming grain could be lost in the cargo. To deal with these hazards, the proposed
and current rules require an employee check-in, check-out system or frequent checks thereby accounting for the safety
of employees working in these conditions.
Proposed 1918.84 addresses the ``bulling'' of cargo. Bulling is the horizontal dragging of cargo (across a deck space)
with none of the weight of the cargo supported by the hoisting wire(s). In practice, this procedure is accomplished
with power generally provided by the cargo winch (with the hoist runner led out through the heel block), and then to
an angled system of ``fairleads'' that provide mechanical advantage in achieving a horizontal pull on the cargo.
The paragraphs that comprise this section are all taken from the current part 1918 regulations, but have been somewhat
clarified and reordered into a more logical sequence. They are also covered (in part) within the NYSA-ILA Safety Code
(Ex. 12) and the PCMSC (Ex. 1145).
Proposed 1918.85 applies to containerized cargo operations of any form. The proposed paragraphs track both the current
Longshoring standards of part 1918, as well as the shoreside requirements found in the Marine Terminals rule (part
1917). In summary, each intermodal container (see definition at 1918.2(h)) must be marked with its gross, net, and
tare (empty) weights. Generally, containers must be weighed 

before

 being hoisted aboard a vessel, to arrive at an actual gross weight. No container is permitted to be hoisted aboard a
vessel if its actual gross weight exceeds either the maximum gross weight marked on the container or the safe working
load of the gear that is being utilized to load the ship. In the case of containers coming from foreign ports, container
weights must be determined by utilizing data provided in shipping documents or, as is most often the case, by weights
shown on cargo stow plans.
Proposed paragraph (b) addresses the topic of overloaded intermodal containers. This issue has raised a good deal
of international concern (Exs. 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126).
The proposed provisions largely reflect the current rules in both the Longshore and Marine Terminal standards. OSHA
feels that the protection afforded by its rules as they pertain to outbound (export) containers, namely that with
few exceptions all are weighed before hoisting, will permit very few overweight loads going out from U.S. ports. The
reliability of manifested or stow plan weights of containers coming into U.S. ports, however, appears to be in serious
question as documented by the previous exhibits. The question then becomes, whether there is a better method of determining
the actual weights of these containers, and how should such a method be implemented in the standards. The Agency requests
interested persons to submit comment into the record concerning both as to the Agency's perception of the problem,
and what better regulatory approach OSHA may take in seeking resolution. For instance, instead of relying upon the
proposed language of this section, should OSHA require that container handling gantry cranes (currently exempted
from the rule requiring a load indicating device_
1918.74(a)(9)(viii)) be fitted with such a piece of equipment? In addition, a new proposed 1918.85(b)(6) has been
added as a result of OSHA Instruction STD 2.2 dated July 3, 1989 (Ex. 1114). Prior to the issuance of this instruction,
the rule required closed containers loaded only with automobiles to be weighed. This instruction (and the language
of this paragraph) allows closed dry van containers that have been loaded with vehicles to be loaded onto a vessel without
being weighed on a scale. By contrast, other loaded containers, other than open top containers and containers solely
used for the carriage of compressed gases, have to be weighed on a scale before being loaded onto a vessel. The reasoning
behind the Instruction and this paragraph is that the weight of the vehicles inside a container will not exceed the
net weight that the container itself is designed to carry. There are, however, three conditions that must be met in
order for this exception to apply. First, the container must only contain assembled vehicles and no other cargo; second,
the container must be marked on the outside so that an employee can readily discern that the container is carrying vehicles;
and finally, the vehicles must have been loaded at the marine terminal. This paragraph is also to be proposed to be put
into the Marine Terminal standard as 29 CFR 1917.71(b)(6). 
Proposed paragraph (d) addresses the hazard of handling a defective container. Although existing 1918.85(d) addresses
the inspection of both outbound and inbound containers for visible defects, the proposed language does not mention
the limitation of outbound or inbound. With regard to outbound containers, the hazards associated with handling
a defective container are effectively covered by 1917.71(g) of the Marine Terminal standard. In this paragraph,
OSHA chooses not to limit the inspection requirement to only inbound containers since certain other containers,
including possibly defective ones, may need to be shifted in order to discharge an inbound container. Since a defective
outbound container can create an identical hazard to the worker as does a defective inbound container, this proposal
makes no distinction between the two. Finally, the provisions for handling a defective container remain the same
as the current requirements: special safe handling or emptying of the container.
In proposed paragraph (e), the Agency would require that employees be required to stay clear of the area beneath suspended
containers. Accidents of an extremely serious nature have occurred in recent years (Ex. 137, 187) that
highlight the need to propose this provision. Additionally, the Agency has such a requirement in its shoreside rules
(1917.71(d)(2)).
Proposed paragraph (f) on lifting fittings contains identical language to that found in the Agency's shoreside rules
(1917.71(f)). Discussion is warranted, however, on the need to apply paragraph (f)(1)(i) on board ships. Often,
particularly in below deck stowage on conventional break bulk vessels, it may be tempting to utilize ship's gear or
shoreside mobile cranes and rig four leg bridles with hooks (engaging the four top corner castings) to facilitate
easier stowage. In handling loaded containers, this practice is dangerous and is prohibited. The International
Cargo Handling Coordination Association (ICHCA), has published a paper entitled ``The Safe Handling of ISO Freight
Containers with Hooks ***'' that clearly outlines the inherent dangers of this practice (Ex.
113) as well as methods to accomplish stowage safely in such situations. Additionally, other international
standards exist (Exs. 1115, 1116 and 1117) that recommend that loaded containers only be lifted
vertically when being handled from the top. Any method of lifting containers that is not vertical places undue stress
which could lead to failure of the container. OSHA believes that this regulatory approach is well taken and reasonable.
In proposed paragraph (g), the Agency requires that a safe means of access and egress be provided to each employee who,
due to the nature of the work, must work atop stowed containers_both above and below deck. In practice, most employees
gain such access by riding aboard safety platforms installed on container crane lifting frames. Such means are permissible
when conducted in a manner consistent with design requirements found in the shoreside rules (1917.45(j)). While
the shoreside rules already apply whenever a shore-based crane acts as the personnel conveyance, this proposed paragraph
(which incorporates by reference the shoreside design criteria) provides for the same requirements to apply whenever
shipboard equipment carries out the same function.
Proposed paragraph (h) applies on vessels so equipped, to any loaded intermodal container spreader. It is well known
throughout the industry that there are significant risks associated with riding a loaded container spreader. ``Free
falls'' (or the unintended release of a container from a spreader), although infrequent, occur only while under load
(Exs. 125 and 126). Additionally, having riders aboard a loaded spreader adds to the responsibilities
of the crane operator, and whose attention is already occupied with the task of getting the containers to their intended
location. The Agency is proposing a similar prohibition for the shoreside aspect of marine cargo handling (part 1917)
as part of this proposal, proposed 1917.45(j)(9).
In proposed paragraph (i), OSHA would require (when safer methods are available) that ladders not be used to gain access
to the tops of containers that are stowed greater than two high. The Agency deems gaining access by means of a properly
designed and conveyed personnel platform (such as those often found on intermodal container spreaders) as being
safer than employing ladders in climbing to heights that can attain 50. ft or more (Ex. 110).
Proposed paragraph (j) covers the hazard of falling from the tops of intermodal containers. This hazard has long been
recognized by the stevedoring industry as both extremely dangerous and difficult to prevent.
Although constituting a small percentage of the total number of shipboard accidents in the United States, falls from
the tops of containers have resulted in a number of serious occupational injuries and fatalities (Exs. 118,
119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 143, 167, 168, 1100,
1108). As early as 1968, U.S. terminal operators recognized the need to improve container top safety. Matson
Terminals, Inc., in conjunction with their parent ocean operator, Matson Navigation Company, developed the first
system of container top fall protection within the worldwide intermodal network (Ex. 153). In that system,
Matson provided for a ``D'' ring fixture to be installed within the roof of each company-owned intermodal container.
Employees working aloft were provided with a safety belt and lanyard that could be secured to the ``D'' ring anchorage.
For a number of reasons, use of the system proved to be difficult, and it is not widely used today.
In 1970, OSHA's predecessor agency, the Bureau of Labor Standards, was contacted by the Coast Labor Relations Committee
of the International Longshoremen's and Warehousemen's Union, who raised this issue specifically. In their letter
of August 24, 1970 (Ex. 150), the Coast Committee asserted:



Consider if you will the dangers attendant to working atop containers. They are not equipped with skidproof surfaces,
there are no protective railings, and there are no requirements that safety belts be provided. In dry warm weather
such work is dangerous enough, but the dangers are critically compounded when workers must labor atop these during
windy and wet weather. At the very least, BLS regulations ought to provide that *** safety belts be
[required] for men working aloft.




As the containerized transport revolution progressed during the 1970's and into the 1980's, and intermodal containers
become more common in the cargo handling trades, container top exposures increased proportionately. At that time,
there was no specific container top safety provision in the Longshoring standards. The Agency issued citations under
the General Duty Clause (Section 5(a)(190) of the Act and 1918.32(b) of OSHA's rules for Longshoring (Exs. 1139).
The latter provision states, in the context of applying to stowed cargo and temporary landing platforms:



When the edge of a hatch section or stowed cargo more than 8 feet high is so exposed that it presents a danger of an employer
falling, the edge shall be guarded by a safety net of adequate strength to prevent injury to a falling employee, or by
other means protection equal protection under the existing circumstances.




Although there were questions regarding the applicability of 1918.32(b) to container operations, it was determined
that the provision did indeed have application to container top on-deck exposures. In an Instruction to the Field
(CPL 21.17) dated August 30, 1982, the Agency's policy on the issue was spelled out (Ex. 149). In that
instruction, OSHA determined that although the 1918.32(b) provision applied, there would be situations where the
abatement of the container fall hazard was not feasible. In such situations, the instruction noted:



A violation (of 1918.32(b)) shall not be issued; however, OSHA should recommend and encourage the employer to work
toward a solution and assist the employer in every way possible to effect a means of protection by advice, consultation
and dissemination of information obtained during other inspections.




With the onset of containerized cargo handling, it became necessary to secure containers (not placed in cell guides)
to each other to prevent unintentional movement during transit. To achieve this stability, workers placed stacking
cones in the corner castings of the container (``coning'') while the containers were being loaded on the ship. While
the containers were unloaded from the ship, workers removed stacking cones from the corner castings of the container
(``deconing''). The original stacking cones were replaced in the early 1970's by conventional twistlocks which
eliminated the need for some lashing but still required workers to climb on top of the containers to place or remove
them. Today twistlocks are the most commonly used fitting for securing freight containers onboard vessels (Ex. 1140).
Semi-automatic twistlocks, developed in the mid 1980's, eliminate the need for some lashing but also eliminate the
need for workers to go on top of the containers for the purposes of coning and deconing. While some work performed on
container tops remains unaffected by the use of SATLs, most of the work that would otherwise require workers to go atop
containers could be eliminated. The use of these devices could, effectively, ``engineer out'' exposure to container
top falling hazards.
Industry efforts to find feasible methods for container top fall hazard abatement received a significant impetus
when, on June 27, 1985, Longshore Division members of the International Longshoremen's and Warehousemen's Union
(ILWU) called a work stoppage that put at a standstill all container operations at the ports of Los Angeles and Long
Beach, California. The work stoppage (Ex. 142) punctuated the ILWU's concern over a series of work related
deaths that occurred over a 14-month period. Although only one of these occupational fatalities was attributable
to container top exposure, the labor union insisted that an effective work rule to minimize the hazards associated
with container top work be instituted, and asserted that such a work rule was central to averting a continued work stoppage.
On July 1, 1985, the ILWU and the Pacific Maritime Association (PMA), acting as management's representative, agreed
upon a package of 25 work rules that were specifically designed to enhance safety at container terminals. That successful
management and labor agreement led to the resumption of work.
Internationally, a number of national and multi-national organizations are aware of and have acted upon the problem.
The International Labor Organization, in its Code of Practice for Safety and Health in Dockwork (Ex. 1130)
specifically requires that:



A person gaining access to the top of a container should be adequately protected against the danger of falling where
appropriate by wearing a suitable safety harness properly tethered, or by other effective means, whilst on the container.




In its Directions for Safety in Dockwork, the National Swedish Board of Occupational Safety and Health (Ex. 1131)
provides, in pertinent part, that:



Work on top of a container is only permissible if measures have been taken to prevent falling down.




In the Netherlands, the Inspectorate of Dock Labor notes (Ex. 144) that:



For general containertop [sic] safety in most cases the recommendations of I.L.O. and ICHCA are followed.




In the port of Hamburg, Germany, a ``lash basket'' designed by a dockworker (Ex. 145) rides underneath the container
spreader and moves between container stows, minimizing containertop exposures. Also, in the port of Bremerhaven,
a specially designed ``rigger box,'' which is similar in configuration to some U.S. designs, protects dockworkers
who go on top of containers in that port (Ex. 152).
In the wake of a fatal accident that occurred in a New Zealand port in 1979, the New Zealand section of ICHCA responded
by conducting and publishing a study, entitled: ``Container Top Safety_An Overview'' (Ex. 146). In that study,
ICHCA analyzed the problem and a number of possible solutions, among them having the employee tethered to a fixed anchorage.
Other tentative solutions arrived at by a number of worldwide locales were also discussed.
OSHA believes that longshore workers who work on container tops are exposed to fall hazards that can cause serious
injury or death. Containers are typically stacked from one to nine below deck and one to six above deck. The loading
and unloading procedures typically require a worker to place and remove container stacking alignment cones in and
from the container's corner castings. This means that workers performing these tasks are regularly exposed to falling
hazards of up to 90 feet (27.3 m).
Within the last few years, advances have been made in the technology of securing intermodal containers which have
had a dramatic effect on container top safety. The use of positive container securing devices or systems, such as semi-automatic
twistlocks (SATL) and above deck cell guides, can nearly eliminate the need for workers to work on the tops of containers
thereby eliminating the falling hazard. Although OSHA has participated in an ongoing dialogue with industry, labor,
the international cargo handling community, and others interested in how these technologies can improve worker
safety, actual record evidence is somewhat limited. However, OSHA's information does include a comprehensive study
prepared by a safety expert under contract to OSHA that addresses the hazards associated with containerized cargo
handling (Ex. 1139); an ICHCA Safety Panel Research Paper addressing the use of semi-automatic twistlocks
(Ex. 1140); a time-and-motion study comparing the use of conventional twistlocks (also referred to as manual
twistlocks) with semi-automatic twistlocks (Ex. 1141); safety information produced by the United Kingdom
(U.K.) addressing jammed container fittings (Ex. 1142); an article published by a U.K. terminal association
that addresses the freeing of jammed twistlocks (Ex. 1143); and a newsletter from an insurance company addressing
container twistlocks (Ex. 1144).
The ICHCA study is the most comprehensive study on the SATL experience (Ex. 1140). This study defines SATL at
page 3 as follows:



Semi-Automatic Twistlock (SATL)_A twistlock which will automatically engage in the locked position when the locking
mechanism has been triggered by the weight of the container as it is landed onto another container or deck foundation.




Since prototypes were first developed in Japan in the mid 1980's, manufacturers around the world have made improvements
on the design which enhance both durability and reliability. (Id.) In fact, the ICHCA study indicates the existence
of approximately 22 different models of SATLs (Id. P. 6). Manufacturers indicate that, with proper use and maintenance,
the average lifespan of the SATL in the marine environment would be about the same as a conventional twistlock_about
10 years (Id. p. 59). 
As indicated in both the ICHCA study (Id.) and the OSHA study (Ex. 1139), the use of SATLs is widespread throughout
the world and the United States. In fact, OSHA estimates that over 25 percent of ships calling in U.S. ports are already
utilizing SATLs. Proponents of the use of SATLs argue that the device avoids accidents and saves money. Unlike conventional
twistlocks, which must be inserted by workers on top of the container and manually locked, semi-automatic twistlocks
are inserted into the bottom of the container by workers standing on the dock and lock automatically when placed upon
another container. Both SATLs and conventional twistlocks can be unlocked by workers standing on the deck of the ship
using an actuator pole. In the case of unloading with the conventional twistlock, the upper container is then removed
leaving the twistlocks on the top of the lower container. The major operational distinction is that workers must remove
conventional twistlocks from the top of a shipboard container before the spreader can attach to the corner castings,
while the SATL is designed to remain attached to the bottom of the container being unloaded. SATLs are then removed
by workers standing on the dock. This operation using SATLs, therefore, eliminates worker exposure to falling hazards.
Finally, proponents argue that the use of SATLs enhances productivity and reduces lashing costs. (Ex. 1140,
p. 76; Ex. 1141). In fact, a time-and-motion study that compares the performance of conventional twistlocks
to that of SATLs indicates an increase in productivity in the range of 25 to 29 percent. This translates to a 11.1 percent
reduction in stevedoring costs (Ex. 1141, p. 4 and 5; Ex. 2). To the extent that this study is representative
of all container cargo handling operations affected by this rule, it indicates substantial reductions of fall hazards
by the use of SATLs. OSHA seeks comment from interested parties including any additional data or studies that address
this issue.
As indicated above, another advancement in securing containers in transit that eliminates the need for workers to
go on top of containers is the development of above deck cell guides. Cell guides are rigid, structural members that
form cells where containers are stowed. These cell guides allow for the ready placement of containers in a manner that
prevents movement once so placed. Although cell guides in the hold are common in container ships, above deck cell guides
are far less common, constituting only 2 percent (Ex. 2, pgs. 219) of container ships calling at U.S. ports.
In addition, OSHA is aware of the existence of positive container securing devices other than those discussed above,
such as the SeaLand framing system (Ex. 157), OSHA believes that use of the term ``positive container securing
devices'' is broad enough to allow for innovative technological improvement.
While the use of SATLs is the most widespread method of positively securing containers that eliminates the fall hazard,
OSHA is aware of certain problems that have been encountered with their application, use and design. (Ex. 1140,
1142, 1143,
1144). The Agency is working closely with those international standards setting organizations responsible
for developing design and use specifications. In this rulemaking, OSHA solicits relevant information regarding
the use of SATLs.
Proposed 1918.85(j) addresses the hazards associated with working on the tops of containers. In keeping with OSHA's
hierarchy of controlling hazards, this paragraph requires the use of feasible engineering controls. In proposed
paragraph (j)(1) a definition for ``fall hazard'' is provided in a footnote. The definition seeks to narrow the elevated
work surfaces where fall hazards exist in order to reflect the reality of a changing work surface. A longshore worker
working on the top of containers for the purpose of loading or unloading a layer of containers is working on an elevated
work surface that can increase or decrease at the rate of 320 square feet (29.4 m2) every few minutes. OSHA believes
that such a rapidly changing elevated work surface is unique to this industry. For example, five 40-foot containers
stowed side by side present a work surface of approximately 40 foot (12.2 m) by 40 foot (12.2 m) (1600 square feet)(147.2
m2). According to this definition, falling hazards (absent weather considerations) only exist within 3 feet (.92
m) of the perimeter or 3 feet (.9 m) by 148 feet (45.1 m) (444 square feet) (40.8 m2). By contrast, the hazardous area on
top of a single container is 252 square feet (23.4 m2) of the 320 square feet (29.4 m2). The definition makes it clear
that it is the unprotected edge where the hazard exists, and not necessarily the entire work surface. Additionally,
any gap of 12 inches (.31 m) or more on a horizontal surface formed by containers is considered an unprotected edge and
a falling hazard would exist under this definition. (For further discussion of the gap issue see 51 FR 42685 and 53 FR
48186). Finally, OSHA believes that any work within 3 feet (.92 m) of the unprotected edge constitutes a hazard (See
Ex. 1139).
Another important element of this definition is the vertical distance necessary to constitute a fall hazard. OSHA
believes that, in this industry and in this work operation, 10 feet (3.0 m) is the appropriate vertical distance. There
are several considerations that leads OSHA to this conclusion. The height of the overwhelming majority of intermodal
containers range from 8 feet (2.4 m) to 91/2 feet (2.7 m) (Ex. 1139). Therefore, an employee working on top of
a one-high container where the surface is less then 10 feet (3.04 m) would not, by definition, be exposed to a fall hazard.
However, such containers are usually worked off ladders, not the top. Also, if such a container is stowed on a raised
surface, such as a hatch cover or pedestal, that puts the top of the container at 10 feet or over, then any workers on top
would, by definition, be exposed to fall hazards. The unique working surface in this operation coupled with heightened
awareness of the longshore worker and the absence of accident data at this distance further assures OSHA that 10 foot
is the appropriate height.
OSHA is aware that an opposing view exists. Labor is of the opinion that OSHA should make this vertical height 8 feet
(2.4 m) to be consistent with the proposed requirement 1918.32(b) where a fall hazard is considered to exist over 8
feet (2.4 m) when handling non-containerized cargo (Ex. 1150). OSHA wishes to fully assess all factors attendant
to this issue, and solicits all pertinent views and data on the appropriate height for fall protection.
Two final considerations in the definition of a fall hazard are with regard to the elements and the ``adjoining surface.''
When weather conditions are such that the vision or footing of workers on top of containers is impaired then a fall hazard
will, by definition, exist. The proposed standard requires such workers to be protected by fall protection, regardless
of the fall distance or their proximity to the edge. OSHA notes that unsure footing on container top work surfaces created
by oil or grease is addressed in the housekeeping section, 1918.91, of this proposed standard. In addition, in the
Marine Terminal standard, OSHA defers to adverse weather conditions by prohibiting terminal crane operations in
high-wind conditions (1917.45(g)).
The other consideration involves the measurement of the vertical distance from ``the adjoining surface.'' Informal
discussions between OSHA staff and various affected parties have indicated concern that this phrase must be carefully
defined in order to avoid confusion in the maritime community. An enforcement concern is a that vertical height measurement
might be made from the elevated surface to an adjoining surface which would not be the landing surface in the event of
a fall. Should the term, ``adjoining surface'' be further clarified by adding either performance or specification
language? For example, the term could read, ``adjoining landing surface (in the event of a fall)''; or ``adjoining
surface with a minimum 8 by 8-foot area (2.4 m by 2.4 m).'' OSHA solicits comment on this issue.
In view of the recent technological improvements in positive container securing devices indicated above, OSHA feels
that many work operations, notably coning and deconing, that exposed workers to container top fall hazards can now
be eliminated. As noted above, SATLs have proven to be particularly effective when container gantry cranes are utilized
(Ex. 1140). In fact, the use of these devices in these circumstances can, in most instances, eliminate the need
for workers to go on top of containers. In light of this, three years after the date of publication of this proposal,
proposed 1918.85(j)(1) would prohibit the performance of any work, notably coning and deconing, on top of containers
that can be eliminated by the proper use of these devices. OSHA has estimated that over 25 percent of ships calling at
U.S. ports already utilize SATLs (Ex. 2). Since it is OSHA's policy to allow a reasonable time to come into compliance
with final standards, the proposed compliance date for the implementation of engineering controls would be three
years.
OSHA is optimistic that exposures to container top fall hazards will significantly decrease with the expanded deployment
of positive container securing devices worldwide. At the same time, the Agency is sensitive to the magnitude of a phase-in
process for SATLs. Consequently, OSHA is proposing a lengthy effective date of this section of three years from the
date the proposed standard is issued. Consonant also with the Agency's policy, OSHA will continue to disseminate
information to employers and employees in this industrial sector, as to how other operations throughout the nation
and the world are approaching the problem.
OSHA recognizes that positive container securing devices will not entirely eliminate the need for workers to go on
the top of containers. Certain container placement or securing tasks, in addition to coning or deconing, must be performed.
In these situations (e.g., securing bridge clamps or releasing jammed twistlocks), a comprehensive fall protection
program must be implemented.
Where cranes other than container gantry cranes are used to handle containers, OSHA recognizes that the use of SATLs
may not be feasible. Precise placement capabilities of a container gantry crane are far superior to other lifting
devices, thus facilitating the use of SATLs. This enhanced capability is due to the four point suspension system of
the gantry crane, which provides greater stability and control of the container being handled, enabling the crane
operator to place the container without assistance. Container operations where the spreader is suspended from a
single point, on the other hand, have far less stability and control and typically requires the assistance of other
employees in the placement of containers. In these circumstances, employees can frequently be exposed to fall hazards.
In light of the discussion above, even when the use of SATLs is feasible when other than gantry cranes are being utilized,
the need for employees to work on container tops in the handling of containers may not be eliminated. Therefore, OSHA
would not require the use of positive container securing devices when containers are not being handled by container
gantry cranes.
Nonetheless, there is nothing in the proposed standard that would prohibit an employer from employing SATLs where
a single point suspension is in use. However, under these circumstances, SATLs in the container being placed have
been shown to jam or puncture the top of the container below with improper alignment (Ex. 1140). OSHA solicits
all pertinent views and information on all issues.
With regard to the feasibility of fall protection, OSHA recognizes that, in this industry, there may be particular
instances when even fall protection may not be feasible. An example of circumstances where fall protection may not
be feasible is the placement of an overheight container on a chimney stow using gear that requires the manual release
of hooks. In these situations the proposed standard requires the employer to:
1. Make a determination that an employee will be exposed to a fall hazard but that the use of fall protection is not feasible;
2. Alert the exposed employee about the hazards involved; and
3. Instruct the exposed employee how to best minimize the hazard.



OSHA wishes to emphasize that such a situation is not common and that when they occur, the burden is on the employer to
fully comply with these requirements prior to the actual exposure. In fact, the OSHA study indicated that a ``specific
set of circumstances could not be framed'' where fall protection might not be feasible (Ex. 1139, p. 1). Furthermore,
situations that will be considered infeasible for fall protection will be narrowly construed in the enforcement
context. A footnote in the standard refers to non-mandatory Appendix III which provides examples of situations where
it may be considered infeasible to use fall protection. Where feasible, however, OSHA will require that fall protection
be provided. 
Proposed 1918.85(k) establishes the technical requirements necessary to provide a fall protection system that
is tailored to the handling of containers. Most of the requirements in this paragraph are basic to any occupationally
related fall protection system. These include all of the paragraphs with the exception of (k)(7) and (k)(10), and
are based on the PCMSC (Ex. 1145), American National Standards Institute (ANSI) consensus standard Z359.11992
and the OSHA standards 1910.66 and 1926.104. Essentially, these requirements address the design, selection, care
and proper use of a personal fall protection system. In addition, 1918.85(k)(7) and (10) have been specially crafted
for the container top situation. Paragraph (k)(7) addresses the situation where a container gantry crane, or its
extension, is being used as the anchorage point for the fall protection system in use. Under these circumstances,
the crane must be placed in the slow speed mode and equipped with a remote shut-off switch in the control of the tied off
employee. In addition, an indicator must be present to inform the employee when the remote is operational. OSHA seeks
comment on whether the indicator should reflect that both the slow speed mode and the remote shut-off are operational.
The other proposed requirement unique to this work operation, paragraph (k)(10), addresses the situation where
the employee is being transported by a device, such as a safety cage, attached to a container gantry crane spreader.
Such a device is required to have a means of attachment to the spreader in place in addition to the primary attachment
mechanism of the spreader (hydraulic twistlock mechanism) to prevent accidental disengagement. OSHA is aware of
several instances where accidental disengagement of a load has occurred (Ex. 125, 126). This secondary
means of attachment is intended to minimize the potential for injury if accidental disengagement were to occur.
A final issue for discussion in this section is Paragraph (k)(13) where an employee retrieval procedure in the case
of a fall must be established. It has been suggested that local emergency response personnel be consulted in the development
of this procedure in order to assure that rescue or retrieval efforts do not exacerbate any injury. OSHA believes that
such a consultation would be prudent.
OSHA invites comment on all issues related to container top safety and encourages the submission of relevant views
and information.
Proposed 1918.85(l) addresses container operations that require employees to work along unguarded edges other
than on container tops. In these situations, fall protection meeting the requirements of paragraph (k) of this section
must be provided where the fall distance is greater than 8 feet (2.4 m). This primarily addresses work operations such
as lashing or locking and unlocking twist locks from other surfaces, or signalling to direct the placement of containers.
Frequently, this work operation requires employees to work in elevated positions that remove the fall protection
that would have normally been provided by the ship's coaming or railings. OSHA recently investigated a fatality where
an employee fell 34 feet (10.3 m) from a lashing platform that was inadequately guarded (Ex. 1149).
Proposed 1918.86 is a new section that addresses operations aboard vessels that accommodate Ro-Ro (Roll-on/Roll-off)
traffic.
The emergence of Ro-Ro vessels is a fairly recent development and were not addressed in the current rules. Along with
container operations, this section proposes new provisions that address advances in modern technology in the marine
cargo handling industry. Examples of such vessels are car carriers, which facilitate the import and export automobile
trades, and stern or side port combination carriers, which provide water carriage for wheel mounted as well as containerized
cargo. Commonly such vessels are fitted with ramps that extend to the dock or wharf, and are fitted with ramps internally
or, alternatively, are fitted with cargo elevators (lifts). In this manner, cargo is either driven through the vessel
from deck to deck until reaching its final stowage location, or hoisted by cargo elevator to its proper deck and then
driven to its final stowage location. Once positioned in its stowage location, the wheeled cargo is lashed to securing
fittings that are provided on the deck. In such operations, lashing personnel are exposed to being struck by vehicular
traffic. In addition, other workers involved with loading or unloading wheeled cargo, both drivers and pedestrians,
are exposed to traffic hazards. OSHA is aware of a number of accidents (Ex. 178, 189) that are attributable
to this process, wherein employees are interspersed with vehicles in a closely confined, marginally illuminated
and poorly traffic managed space.
In proposed paragraph (a), OSHA would require an organized system of traffic control to be established and maintained
at each entrance and exit ramp. The confluence of vehicular and pedestrian traffic in Ro-Ro operations, and thus the
area where substantial accident potential is most pronounced, is the area on and around access ramps. With this mode
of cargo carriage on the increase, accident potential is expected to increase proportionately. Ramps inside the
vessel, although generally not as congested as ship-to-shore access lanes, must also be addressed by the traffic
control system if they experience a periodic traffic flow that warrants such control. In developing this rule, OSHA
considered positions taken by the International Labor Organization in their Code of Practice for Dock Work (Ex. 1106),
which provides that:



A system of movement control of vehicles used in loading and unloading ships should be effectively and continuously
applied.




In assessing other national requirements, the Agency found that Sweden in its Dock Work Directions issued by the National
Board of Occupational Safety and Health (Ex. 1136), also requires that:



A traffic guard shall be stationed wherever motor vehicles need to be directed, e.g., on roll on-roll off ramps, narrow
wharves and places where there is traffic crossing and the view is limited.




Clearly, shipside traffic control is just as necessary as it is in the shoreside environment. In OSHA's preamble to
the Marine Terminals standard, the Agency emphasized (46 FR 4200) in its assessment of the importance of traffic control
at the shoreside marine terminal setting:



*** the importance of these practices to employee safety cannot be over estimated.




Given the close relationship between shoreside and shipboard vehicular utilization, it is appropriate that OSHA's
rules addressing the two be complementary.
Proposed paragraph (b) addresses the hazard of exceeding the capacity of the ramp used to transfer cargo. As a result
of ramp failure, the likely injury to occur is drowning or being crushed in the vehicle. Ramps must be plainly marked
with their load capacity and these capacities must not be exceeded (Ex. 15).
Proposed paragraph (c) provides protection for employees that use the ship's ramp for access. In such situations,
OSHA proposes that a physical separation, i.e., a barrier, be provided to separate the employee and the vehicles.
Often vessels are fitted out in this manner (Ex. 184). However, should it be the case that a particular vessel
is not so fitted, it is a matter that is easily rectified. When the design of the ramp prevents physical separation of
pedestrians from vehicles, a signalperson shall direct traffic, and shall not allow concurrent use. Additionally,
OSHA proposes to require that such ramps utilized for pedestrian access be fitted out in the same manner as would a traditional
pedestrian gangway (see 1918.21).
Proposed paragraph (d) requires that ramps be properly maintained and secured. This is consistent with 1918.24(b)
which addresses maintaining and securing portable ramps.
Proposed paragraph (e) recognizes that in many of the modern generations of Ro-Ro vessels, internal ramps are elevatable.
Such a construction feature allows for multiple access destinations, depending upon the placement of the ramp. If
a ramp is placed in such a manner as to allow access to a given deck, thereby creating a void in another access route (that
could perhaps lead to a substantial drop or fall), this paragraph provides that the incomplete route be clearly identified
and barricaded. OSHA has investigated at least one (Ex. 186) occupational fatality in which this circumstance
was apparent.
Paragraph (f) requires that all brake air lines be connected and tested prior to commencing operations. The proper
operation of brakes is necessary when operating inside a Ro-Ro vessel that typically has ramps with steep grades.


Proposed paragraph (g) requires that flat bed and low boy trailers be marked with their cargo capacity and not be overloaded.
These operations typically employ the use of trailers not designed for over-the-road use such as low boy trailers
(sometimes referred to as ``mafi's'') that allow access to low deck height spaces found in Ro-Ro vessels.
Proposed paragraph (h) is analogous to OSHA's current weight requirement for intermodal containers. It would require
that cargo to be handled via the ship's ramp be either marked with its weight or have such weight clearly marked in a written
record.
As a practical matter, vessel stow plans most always contain such data.
Proposed paragraph (i) requires tractors to have sufficient power and braking capacity to safely operate on Ro-Ro
vessels.
As previously noted, this is especially important in negotiating tight spaces and steep grades on Ro-Ro vessels.

Proposed paragraph (k) would require that internal combustion engine vehicles only be operated when adequate ventilation
exists or is provided. It also provides guidance in determining acceptable levels of air contaminants generated
by the internal combustion process, by referring the reader to the appropriate section of this part and part 1910,
subpart Z (which is referenced in subpart A of this proposal. In most situations, the vessels themselves are fitted
out with ventilation systems at all decks. It has been the Agency's observation that a number of purpose built Ro-Ro
vessels possess ventilation systems that function remarkably well (Ex. 172), monitoring ambient air for
various air contaminants as well as explosive properties.
Proposed paragraph (l) would require that cargo be secured to prevent sliding loads. This addresses the specific
hazard of cargo falling off trailers while in transit on Ro-Ro vessels.
Proposed paragraph (m) would require that authorized persons, equipped with high visibility vests (or equivalent
protection), be the only employees permitted on any deck where Ro-Ro operations are being conducted. Requiring only
high visibility vests (or equivalent protection) and eliminating the allowance of using decals or reflectors is
a departure from what has been allowed in the Marine Terminal standard. As is noted in Section VI of this preamble, OSHA
proposes to eliminate the allowance of decals or reflectors in 1917.71(e) because of problems experienced with the
use of decals, reflectors, and similar items. The reflective area of a decal on a hard hat is obviously less than that
of a vest. Also, the reflective value is lost during daylight hours or whenever the wearer takes off the hard hat. A number
of serious accidents (Exs. 178, 189) have occurred in the past due to the nature of the work involved in
such cargo operations. This paragraph, along with the signalling requirements in proposed paragraph (n) that follow,
are expected to enable employers to avoid vehicle-related accidents onboard ships. Paragraph (n) addresses signalling
requirements for maneuvering vehicles into stowage positions while other personnel are in the adjacent vicinity.
In proposed 1918.87, OSHA sets out requirements for the utilization of shipboard elevators (lifts). Elevators are
most common on a number of different Ro-Ro and Combination carrier vessel designs. The hazards addressed by this section
are cargo falling from an improperly loaded elevator; and from wheeled cargo or employees falling into open spaces
in the deck created by a moving elevator. In approaching the issue of elevator usage, the Agency remained mindful of
foreign vessel design prerogatives. Consequently, the four paragraphs proposed within this section, are protective
of U.S. longshore workers obliged to use such installations, but are not expected to have an impact on any other nation's
vessel designs.
In summarizing this section, OSHA would require that safe working loads of elevators be determined and adhered to.
As a ``lifting appliance,'' shipboard elevators are part of a complement of gear that comes under considerable discussion
in ILO Convention No. 152 (see discussion of Subpart B_Gear Certification). As such, shipboard installations of
elevators will require certification of safe working loads as well as the posting of elevator capacity. In practical
terms, the employer's responsibility with regard to this paragraph is relatively simple to discharge. The requirement
for evenly distributing the weight(s) to be lifted, particularly when considering the various drive mechanisms
providing power to the elevator platforms, is an important provision.
Proposed paragraph (c) also is an important requirement that, while allowing the driver of a vehicle to remain at the
vehicle's controls, prohibits other persons from riding the elevator to other decks. Of necessity, the sides of many
shipboard elevators are unguarded while in transit. Riders, therefore, would be exposed to falls from sometimes
significant heights. The ILO's Code of Practice for Dock Work (Ex. 1107) addresses this issue in much the same
manner.
In proposed paragraph (d), OSHA addresses a problem that both this Agency and the earlier Labor Standards Bureau have
recognize as needing attention (Ex. 182). This provision would require that if fall hazards are created by
open decks during the operation of shipboard elevators, the decks shall be barricaded. OSHA believes that under current
international practice most installations will already be effectively guarded. In those situations, however,
where the installation falls short in providing this safeguard, the employer must take the initiative in acquiring
and effectively utilizing the required barrier protection.
Proposed 1918.88, ``Log operations,'' as previously mentioned in the preamble discussion of proposed 1918.38 ``Log
rafts,'' is also an entirely new section addressing the hazards associated with loading logs from the water into a
vessel. This is a particularly hazardous operation both because of the location where it occurs (on the water) and
the nature of the cargo. Logs that are loaded from the water usually have been in the water for a long period of time, causing
them to absorb water. The extra water adds to their weight and also loosens the bark, making the log surface very unsure
and slippery. The proposed provisions of this section have been taken from both existing longshore regulations and
from the ILWU-PMA Pacific Coast Marine Safety Code (PCMSC) (Ex. 1145). In addition, these new requirements
are supported by record evidence developed by OSHA personnel in Region 10 (Ex. 1146).
Proposed paragraph (a) is taken from PCMSC Rule 417 (Ex. 1145) and addresses the hazards associated with unstable
logs that could be in the hold of a vessel creating a situation where employees could be injured or killed should the
logs shift. Employees must not be in spaces in the hold when and where logs being loaded could strike them.
Proposed paragraph (b) addresses the hazard associated with the physical condition of the log surface, which may
be slippery if there is no bark, or otherwise hazardous if the bark is loose and slides off the log as the employee is stepping
on it. Employers must provide appropriate footwear to employees that have to climb on the log. Such footwear typically
are spiked, also known as ``caulked'' shoes, may be styled like a sandal that attaches to existing footwear, and specifically
designed for working logs (Ex. 1146, pp.1314).
Proposed paragraph (c), which is taken from the current longshore 1918.96(f), requires that lifelines be furnished
and hung over the side when working log booms or cribs.
Proposed paragraph (d) is also taken from the current longshore regulation 1918.23(c), and requires that a Jacob's
ladder be provided for each gang when working a log boom. However, in accordance with the provision in proposed 1918.23(c),
no more than two Jacob's ladders are required for each log boom being worked.
Proposed paragraph (e) has also been taken from the current longshore regulations, 1918.96(e), and requires that
a U.S. Coast Guard approved life ring with at least 90 feet (27.4 m) of line be in the vicinity of the work area.
The final paragraph, (f), requires that a rescue boat be available when employees are working on log rafts or booms.
This requirement is similar to that found in Rule 638 of the PCMSC (Ex. 1145). This addresses the hazard of employees
falling into the water while loading logs and being carried away by the river current and possibly drowning. The requirement
of a rescue boat would allow an employee who falls into the water to be quickly rescued.
Much of the proposed language in this section is based on rules found in the Pacific Coast Marine Safety Code (PCMSC)
(Ex. 1145), which has been negotiated by the Pacific Maritime Association and the International Longshoremen's
and Warehousemen's Union. In addition, OSHA believes that the proposed requirements reflect the current safe industry
practice.
OSHA requests comment from the public concerning the completeness of these proposed regulations pertaining to handling
logs from the water. Proposed 1918.89, addressing hazardous cargo, is carried over from the existing Longshore standard
(1918.86). The same language is found addressing this issue when at shoreside cargo handling operations (1917.22).
Proposed 1918.89 and the Hazard Communication rule that is referenced in the ``Scope and Applicability'' paragraph,
1918.1(b)(6), complement one another in covering employee notification and procedures for handling hazardous
cargo. OSHA requests comment from the public on whether 1918.89(a) and (c), and similar language in 1917.22(a) and
(c) is repetitious in light of the Hazard Communication rule, keeping in mind that HazCom is referenced in both Parts.
(In addition, the exposure of employees to toxic and hazardous substances is addressed in subpart B of part 1917, in
proposed subpart I of part 1918 and in subpart Z of part 1910.)


Subpart I_General Working Conditions


In 1987, OSHA extended the coverage of the Hazard Communication standard (HazCom) (29 CFR 1910.1200) to all employers
with employees exposed to hazardous chemicals in their workplaces. As a result, subpart I of part 1918 was amended
to include the requirements of that standard as 1918.90. Basically the HazCom standard requires such employers to
provide information to their employees concerning hazardous chemicals by means of hazard communication programs.
These programs would include the use of labels, material safety data sheets (MSDS), training and access to written
records. In addition, distributors of hazardous chemicals are required to ensure that containers they distribute
are properly labeled, and that a material safety data sheet is provided to their customers.
On August 24, 1987, OSHA, in expanding the coverage of this rule, also made certain revisions that address the handling
of sealed containers of hazardous materials, such as is usually done in longshoring work. Specifically, OSHA stated
at 52 FR 31861:



There are a number of work situations where employees only handle sealed containers of chemicals, and under normal
conditions of use would not open the containers and would not expect to experience any measurable exposure to the chemicals.
Such work operations include, for example, warehousing, retail sales, 

marine cargo handling,

 and trucking terminals. (Emphasis added.)




OSHA recognized, nonetheless, that even under these circumstances, the potential for a hazardous exposure could
occur.



It is reasonable to assume, however, that all such containers are subject to leakage and breakage, and these employees
are in fact potentially exposed by virtue of the presence of these hazardous chemicals in their workplaces. Because
of this potential exposure, they need information to protect themselves form the hazards of these chemicals in the
event such an emergency situation occurs. (Id.)
 


Proposed 1918.90 consists solely of a cross-reference to the Scope and Applicability section of the proposal, specifically
1918.1(b)(6), which references the Hazardous Communication standard, 1910.1200. OSHA has decided to reference
the Hazard Communication standard in the scope section of this proposal as one of the part 1910 provisions applicable
to longshoring. This would have no effect on either the enforceability or the applicability of HazCom to longshoring.
OSHA proposes to do the same in the Marine Terminals standard (part 1917).
The primary HazCom obligations that apply to longshoring are found in 1910.1200(b)(4). This paragraph sets out the
basic duties of employers: (1) not to remove or deface labels affixed to containers of hazardous chemicals; (2) to
maintain and provide access to any MSDS's that are received for hazardous chemicals while the chemicals are in the
workplace; and (3) to obtain an MSDS when one is not received but an employee requests one. In addition, the employer
must train employees in accordance with the provisions of the rule to ensure they are protected in the event of a spill
or leak. The Agency seeks comment on this different approach.
Proposed 1918.91 addresses housekeeping. In assessing the types of accidents that most occur in shipboard cargo
handling, one fact has remained constant: many involve slips, trips, and falls (Exs. 114, 173). Housekeeping
factors cause a substantial number of such accidents. Staying with the principle of providing a uniform regulatory
approach to shipboard and shoreside occupational safety and health, OSHA proposes, in this section, to bring into
part 1918 those applicable provisions of part 1917 that cover the same hazards on shore. Those remaining provisions,
which are vessel-specific, would be retained from the current part 1918. In addition, OSHA considers lashing gear
that is used with containers, roll-on, roll-off cargo, and, in particular, automobiles, to be ``equipment,'' as
referred to in paragraph (a).
Proposed 1918.92 provides illumination requirements for cargo handling work aboard vessels. Here again, OSHA remains
consistent with its shoreside rules in requiring 5 footcandles (average) (54 lux) of illumination at cargo operations.
In proposing this standard, OSHA believes that it will not only remain uniform with its shoreside rule (1917.123),
but also remain consistent with good illumination safety principles. (Ex. 1152)
In crossing from one location to another, in this case shore to ship, it is a well-recognized safety practice to provide
uniform lighting. On this topic, the American National Standard practice for Industrial Illumination (ANSI/IES
RP71991) (Ex. 1152) states the following:



Alternate areas of extreme luminance differences are undesirable because it tires the eyes to adjust to them.

.... uniformity permits flexibility of functions and equipment and assures more uniform luminances. 


Proposed paragraph (c) would require that lighting provided aboard ship does not shine into the eyes of personnel
in key positions of cargo control, such as crane and winch operators. Certainly it is extremely important to allow
a clear and unencumbered view to those that are in control of the cargo transit. With the same principle in mind, it would
also be required that stationary lights (those not mounted on vehicles) on Ro-Ro vessels not shine into the eyes of
drivers. In addition, the proposed requirements for portable lights and entry into dark areas closely parallel the
provisions in the existing standard.
Proposed 1918.93, Hazardous atmospheres and substances, is designed to provide protection from atmospheric hazards
which are not specifically addressed in other proposed sections. In as much as these hazards are virtually identical
to those found in marine terminals, the language of this section largely tracks the requirements found in 1917.23.
Since the promulgation of the Marine Terminal standard, OSHA has promulgated a Permit-Required Confined Spaces
standard for General Industry (58 FR 4462, Jan. 14, 1993). Since both the Marine Terminal and Longshoring standards
currently addressed hazards associated with confined spaces, OSHA did not intend the General Industry standard
to apply to these workplaces. However, OSHA also had planned, in its ongoing development of this longshore proposal,
to conform the relevant longshore requirements to the more explicit and protective marine terminal requirements.
Furthermore, this approach is consistent with the vertical nature of these maritime standards.
The use of the phrase ``the employer is aware'' that a hazardous condition exists means that the employer is or should
be aware of the hazardous condition. This section establishes requirements for the determination of the hazard,
the testing during ventilation, and the procedures for entry into hazardous atmospheres. In addition, the hazards
associated with emergency entry, inadvertent entry and asbestos spills are also addressed.
Proposed 1918.94 provides requirements for ventilation and atmospheric workplace conditions. Proposed paragraph
(a) specifically addresses the hazards associated with carbon monoxide (CO) aboard ship. Longshoring work frequently
involves the use of internal combustion-powered equipment to facilitate the stowage and removal of cargo. This equipment
would include fork lift trucks, bulk cargo movers and the cargo itself (vehicles on Ro-Ro ships). Occupational fatalities
and disabling illnesses still appear on the waterfront (Exs. 176, 177, and 181) due to high levels
of (CO) accumulating from these sources in cargo spaces.
Currently OSHA's limit for (CO) in General Industry, Construction, and Shipyards is 50 ppm as an 8-hour TWA. The limits
in Marine Terminals and Longshoring are a 50 ppm and, in confined spaces, a 100 ppm ceiling. The ACGIH1986 has
a TLV

&reg;

-TWA of 50 ppm and a TLV

&reg;

-STEL of 400 ppm for (CO) (Ex. 38). NIOSH (Ex. 31) recommends an 8-hour TWA limit of 35 ppm and a 200 ppm ceiling.
For both Longshoring and Marine Terminals, OSHA is proposing to lower the PELs for CO to 35 ppm (8-hour TWA) and is proposing
a 200 ppm (ceiling, measured over 5 minutes) in outdoor, non-enclosed spaces. OSHA is proposing to retain the 100 ppm
ceiling for CO in enclosed spaces in Marine Terminals and Longshoring. NIOSH concurs (Ex. 32) that the proposed
limits are appropriate.
Carbon monoxide is a flammable, colorless, practically odorless gas. It is used as a reducing agent in metallurgical
operations, in the manufacture of metal carbonyls and zinc-based white pigments, and as a chemical intermediate.
Most occupational exposures to this ubiquitous substance are the result of the incomplete combustion of organic
material (HSDB 1990; Ex. 318).
Carbon monoxide has caused a large number of industrial fatalities as a result of its tendency to combine readily with
hemoglobin to form carboxyhemoglobin (COHb). The Immediately Dangerous to Life and Health (IDLH) level for carbon
monoxide is 1500 ppm (Ex. 33). At levels above this, workers quickly lose consciousness; if exposure is not
terminated immediately, death by asphyxiation follows quickly.
In experimental animals, asphyxiation occurs when the air-borne concentration of CO exceeds 3 percent (30,000 ppm)
(HSDB 1990). CO also causes reproductive and developmental effects in animals. The LD





 in rats is 1807 ppm for 4 hours (Ex. 34).
Excessive accumulations of COHb cause hypoxic stress in healthy individuals as a result of the reduced oxygen carrying
capacity of the blood. In patients with cardiovascular disease, such stress can further impair cardiovascular function.
A number of studies show that 8-hour TWA exposures to 50 ppm carbon monoxide generally results in COHb levels of 8 to
10 percent. Such levels are not generally associated with overt signs or symptoms of health impairment in healthy
individuals with strong cardiovascular systems who are working under nonstressful conditions. However, the ACGIH
believes that a TLV

&reg;

-TWA of 25 ppm, which results in COHb levels of 4 percent or less, may be necessary to protect workers with cardiovascular
disease, because this condition places workers at higher risk of serious cardiovascular injury (Ex. 38, p.
1106). The NIOSH REL of 35 ppm TWA is also aimed at protecting workers with chronic heart disease (CHD); NIOSH believes
that such workers should not be allowed to have carboxyhemoglobin levels that approach 5 percent. In the part 1910
air contaminants rulemaking, several commenters questioned the need to lower the 8-hour TWA and to add a STEL.
In response to these commenters, OSHA quoted the ACGIH (Id.):




Each molecule of CO combining with hemoglobin reduces the oxygen carrying capacity of the blood and exerts a finite
stress on man. Thus, it may be reasoned that there is no dose of CO that is not without an effect on the body. Whether that
effect is physiologic or harmful 

depends upon the dose of CO and the state of health of the exposed individual

. The body compensates for this hypoxic stress by increasing cardiac output and blood flow to specific organs, such
as the brain or the heart. When this ability to compensate is overpowered or is limited by disease, tissue injury results
[emphasis added].

Exposure to CO sufficient to produce COHb saturations in the 3-5% range impairs cardiovascular function in patients
with cardiovascular disease and in normal subjects. *** The primary effect of exposure to low concentrations
of CO on workmen results from the hypoxic stress secondary to the reduction in the oxygen-carrying capacity of blood.
*** Workmen with significant disease, both detected and undetected, may not be able to compensate
adequately and are at risk of serious injury. For such workers, a TLV of 25 ppm *** might be necessary.
Even such a concentration might be detrimental to the health of some workers who might have far advanced cardiovascular
disease. *** It would appear to the Committee that the time-weighted TLV of 50 ppm for carbon monoxide
might also be too high under conditions of heavy labor, high temperatures, or at high elevations (Ex. 38).




Thus, the ACGIH also regards a lower limit for CO as necessary to protect workers with cardiovascular or pulmonary
disease or those working under stressful conditions.
OSHA believes that it is clearly necessary to set a CO level that protects workers who have CHD because (1) a large percentage
of employees have it, (2) it is often not diagnosed or diagnosable, and (3) it is frequently fatal. The 35 ppm 8-hour
TWA is designed to protect employees with asymptomatic CHD. The term CHD is generally used to refer to the process of
atherosclerosis of the coronary arteries, which leads to disturbances in the myocardial blood supply.
The general worker population in the United States is composed of a very significant number of persons with CHD. Since
the identification of such persons in the absence of overt clinical symptoms is virtually impossible, it is necessary
to assume that the average worker has asymptomatic CHD, especially when his/her first clinical symptom may be sudden
death (Ex. 31). Several studies demonstrate the significant risk associated with CO exposure, particularly
with respect to coronary heart disease. A study of firefighters in Los Angeles (Ex. 310) suggests that CO exposure
during firefighting may be responsible for the high incidence of heart disease in firefighters. In some fires, peak
exposures were occasionally as high as 3000 ppm CO, with 40 percent of peak values in the 100-to 500-ppm CO range. However,
in some fires, the peak CO exposure was below 100 ppm. Although these peak exposures in firefighters were high, firefighters
are likely to be exposed overall for fewer hours than the workers of concern in this rulemaking.
A prevalence study was recently performed on angina pectoris, ECG changes, and blood pressure that involved 1,000
workers from 20 foundries (Ex. 311). A clear dose-response was found with regard to the prevalence of angina
(as obtained by history on a World Health Organization-recommended questionnaire) and CO exposure in workers (both
smokers and nonsmokers).
NIOSH conducted a prospective cohort mortality study among 1,558 white male motor vehicle examiners who were employed
in New Jersey for a minimum of 6 months between 1944 and 1973 (Ex. 312). Industrial hygiene surveys indicated
that the examiners were exposed to carbon monoxide at a time-weighted-average (TWA) of 10 to 24 ppm. Using a modified
life table technique, the expected deaths were compared to the expected deaths through August 1973. The overall deficit
of mortality observed (SMR180) in this occupational cohort during the first 10-year period was to be expected as a
result of the widely accepted ``healthy worker effect.'' However, the component SMR for cardiovascular disease
deaths (134) was unexpected, since the ``healthy worker effect'' had been most significantly associated with decreased
cardiovascular disease mortality (Ex. 313). This evidence suggests that slightly elevated COHb may contribute
to excess cardiovascular disease rates in a healthy population that is of average fitness (since the work is not physically
hard).
A recent study (Ex. 314) reviewed the epidemiological evidence for an association between carbon monoxide
and heart disease and concluded that carbon monoxide exerts acute and possibly reversible short-term effects that
can increase the risk of cardiovascular disease.
In another recent study, male volunteers aged 35 to 75 with stable exertional angina pectoris and positive exercise
treadmill tests were exposed to CO concentrations designed to cause 2.2 to 4.4 percent COHb levels after exercise.
The subjects performed a symptom-limited exercise test on a treadmill, followed by exposure for 1 hour to CO, and then
performed a second treadmill test. All subjects who completed the study (N=63) showed significant decreases in time
to onset of ischemic ST-segment changes; in the 2 percent COHb group, this change equalled 5.1 percent, and in the 4
percent COHb group it averaged a 12.1 percent decrease (Allred, Bleecher, Chaitman, Dahms, Gottlieb, Hackney et
al. 1989, in Res. Rep. Hlth. Effect. Inst. 25:79).
As pointed out above, cardiovascular disease (detected or undetected) and pulmonary impairment are widespread
in the general population in this country, in workers as well as other sub-populations. In addition, OSHA is particularly
concerned about the adverse effects of CO because workers regularly encounter complex and stressful situations
at work, including heat stress, jobs demanding heavy exertion, and tasks requiring both judgment and motor coordination.
OSHA standards are intended to protect workers of average and below-average fitness and those who engage only intermittently
in heavy physical labor and who do not therefore receive the benefit of physical conditioning.
OSHA thus has determined that, in Longshoring and Marine Terminals, the proposed 8-hour TWA of 35 ppm for carbon monoxide
is needed to reduce the significantly increased risk of cardiovascular disease that is associated with overexposure
to CO. The Agency also believes that a ceiling of 200 ppm in outdoors, non-enclosed spaces is necessary to ensure that
peak CO exposures are kept below the 1500 ppm IDLH level by a reasonable safety factor. The ceiling limit will also assist
in keeping COHb levels below 5 percent; the ceiling will be measured over 5 minutes to permit the use of simpler monitoring
techniques.
Based on this evidence, OSHA is proposing an 8-hour TWA of 35 ppm and a ceiling of 200 ppm in outdoor, non-enclosed spaces
as the PELs for carbon monoxide in the longshoring and marine terminal industries. In these industries, however,
most employees regularly enter and work in a compartment, hold, or other enclosed space, in which CO levels can increase
rapidly if uncontrolled. CO, therefore, presents an especially great danger of death from IDLH levels of CO. Consequently,
OSHA is retaining the 100 ppm ceiling for CO in such spaces, as well as the provision requiring monitoring of these spaces.
The Agency would continue to require that the employer monitor the ambient air within any cargo space where internal
combustion engines discharge their exhaust. Therefore, when concentrations of CO in these enclosed spaces reach
100 ppm, work shall be suspended and the workers removed from the spaces. Work shall not resume until concentrations
of CO, as determined by actual monitoring, have been reduced to within the allowable limits.
The Agency believes that these limits will ensure that the COHb levels of exposed workers (especially of non-smokers)
in these sectors are maintained at or below 5 percent, which will protect those workers at greater risk because of cardiovascular
or pulmonary impairment. In addition, these revised limits will protect healthy workers in the affected sectors
who must work in environments involving intermittent exertion, heat stress, or other strenuous conditions. OSHA
believes that these limits are necessary to substantially reduce the significant occupational risk associated
with both chronic and peak exposures to carbon monoxide in the workplace. The hypoxic stress associated with exposure
to carbon monoxide clearly constitutes a material impairment of health and functional capacity. For a more complete
discussion of these health effects see 57 FR 26371.
If natural or vessel supplied ventilation is not sufficient to maintain levels within the allowable limits, the employer
must utilize supplemental methods until such levels are reached (generally accomplished with portable blowers).
It should be noted that the proposed requirement deletes the language ``before work is resumed.'' This is to make the
requirement reflect more clearly the actual industry practices being employed to control exposure to CO through
the use of engineering controls. The longshoring work itself generates CO through the use of the loading equipment.
In reality, then, it is not the circumstance that 100 ppm is routinely reached, the hold is cleared of workers, supplemental
blowers are used to clear the air and then the workers return to work. Rather, when a sustained build-up of CO is detected,
even at much lower levels, the supplemental blowers or other additional means are employed to maintain the exposures
to within the allowable limits.
Portable ventilating equipment must be guarded to prevent employee injury, and they must be effectively grounded
by a grounding conductor run with or enclosing the circuit conductors. In situations where portable ventilating
equipment is run by vessel supplied power, the grounding conductor must be bonded to the structure of the vessel. Given
the shipboard environment, careful attention must be paid to the electric cords of portable equipment, making certain
they are not worn or otherwise unserviceable.
OSHA is proposing to retain the requirement for recording tests of the atmosphere. The stevedoring community is successfully
using such testing logs as a frame of reference in assessing atmospheric conditions from one point in time to the next.
In proposed paragraph (b), OSHA addresses the longshoring hazards associated with handling grain that has been treated
with fumigants. Grain is subject to infestation by insects and rodents during storage and shipping. Fumigants used
to control infestation can be liquid or solid compounds that release poisonous gases and can be applied in the form
of sprays, fogs or gases or by direct contact (Ex. 1104).



*** these gases are harmful, possibly fatal, to humans as long as they remain potent. Therefore, they
constitute a safety hazard from the time of application throughout the duration of their potency_which may last for
several days. (Id. p.36).




Here, OSHA would require that the employer determine whether or not grain to be loaded or discharged aboard a vessel
had been fumigated. Such a determination shall be based on direct communication with knowledgeable persons from
both the grain elevator and the vessel.
When a cargo has been fumigated, an employer shall designate a person (see 1918.2(c)), who is thoroughly familiar
with the characteristics of the fumigant being used and how to properly assess contaminant levels; fully aware of
the manufacturer of the fumigant's use recommendations and warnings; and knowledgeable about the proper personal
protective equipment which must be worn to safely guard against the possible effects of the fumigant. The designated
person must test the vessel's compartments after loading begins, but before longshore employees (generally trimmers)
enter. Subsequent tests must be made to ensure that fumigant concentrations to exposed personnel never attain levels
that are beyond the allowable limits. Records of those tests are retained by the employer for a period of 30 days. Whenever
the concentration in any compartment reaches the level specified as hazardous by the fumigant manufacturer or by
subpart Z of 29 CFR part 1910, whichever is lower, all employees shall be removed from such compartments and shall not
be permitted to re-enter until such time as tests demonstrate that the atmosphere is within allowable limits.
Consistent with 1917.25 of the Marine Terminal standard, during emergencies or while tests are being undertaken
in compartments that have hazardous or unknown concentrations of fumigant, the designated person entering the compartment
must be properly outfitted with personal protective equipment, (See criteria at proposed 1918.94(b)(3)(v)), and
must be observed while conducting such tests by two standby employees, who are themselves properly outfitted. The
personal protective equipment used by the designated person and the observers, will be required to be readily available
wherever fumigated grains are handled.
In situations where it is necessary to carry out insecticide or pesticide treatment of a localized nature, such as
in rodent control, paragraph (b)(4) would require that employees conducting the treatment and those that may be exposed
to the chemical(s) applied, be equipped with personal protective equipment that meets the specifications set out
by the manufacturer of the chemical(s) being used.
In proposing these rules covering fumigated grain cargoes, the Agency has relied upon the existing rule for longshore
employment (Ex. 139) but has also utilized the Agency's experience in promulgating the general industry Permit-required
Confined Space standard (29 CFR 1910.146, 58 FR 4549), together with accident data (Ex. 1104) relating to fumigated
grain cargoes aboard ship. Finally, these rules are further supported by similar provisions found in the Pacific
Coast Marine Safety Code (Ex. 1145) and the U.S. Coast Guard's ``Interim Regulations for Shipboard Fumigation,''
46 CFR147A (Ex. 1105).
In proposed paragraph (c), the Agency proposes requirements for handling cargoes of fumigated tobacco. Tobacco
cargoes, both ported and exported, are shipped most typically in bales, in hogsheads, and in intermodal containers.
OSHA's proposed Longshoring requirements apply when cargoes are break-bulk, i.e., piece lots of bales or in hogsheads.
When such cargoes are containerized, OSHA addresses employee exposure in the Marine Terminal standard (29 CFR 1917.25(g)).
In the case of break-bulk fumigated tobacco cargoes, the employer would be required to determine (by written notification)
if the cargo has in fact been fumigated. If so, the employer would be further required to obtain a written warranty from
the fumigator(s) that the cargo has been sufficiently aerated (concentration of fumigant is within allowable limits.)
OSHA notes that this practice is currently in place at all longshore operations in the U.S. handling tobacco. In the
case of containerized shipments of fumigated tobacco, OSHA is proposing new language that can be found in the proposed
changes to the Marine Terminal regulations, 1917.25(g), which is part of this proposal and which is discussed in Section
VI of this rulemaking.
Proposed paragraphs (d) and (e) remain virtually identical to the existing provisions. Paragraph (d) involves a
work practice to discover hazardous exposures to fumigants of any cargo other than grain and tobacco while paragraph
(e) involves the use of personal protective equipment to protect against heavy concentrations of dust.
Proposed paragraph (f) addresses operations aboard vessels engaged in the menhaden trade. Menhaden is a term that
refers to several species of trash fish. Menhaden is used to produce, among other products, fertilizer, pet food and
fish oil. (See 46 FR 4213.) As cargo to specialized menhaden marine terminals, menhaden presents a health hazard to
longshore workers when it decomposes, generating hydrogen sulfide (H




S). As recently as 1987, a hydrogen sulfide incident aboard a menhaden vessel led to serious injury and a fatality (Ex.
180). OSHA's current limit for hydrogen sulfide in Marine Terminals is 20 ppm as an 8-hour TWA; the current Longshore
standard is silent with regard to both H




2S and menhaden. The 1986 ACGIH TLV

&reg;

s for hydrogen sulfide are 10 ppm as an 8-hour TWA and 15 ppm as a 15 minute STEL (Ex. 38); NIOSH has a 10-ppm, 10-minute
REL for this substance (Ex. 33). OSHA is proposing an 8-hour TWA of 10 ppm in Longshoring and Marine Terminals
with a STEL of 15 ppm. Promulgation of these PELs will make OSHA's limits for hydrogen sulfide consistent with the best
available evidence on the hazards of H




S exposure.
Hydrogen sulfide is a colorless, flammable gas with the odor of rotten eggs. It is widely used as a chemical intermediate,
an analytical reagent, and in the manufacture of ``heavy water'' (H




O




) in the utilities sector. In agriculture, it is used as a disinfectant (HSDB 1985). It is also generated by the fermentation
of animal manure. Many farm workers have been exposed to this substance while working in the vicinity of liquid manure
storage pits and have been asphyxiated as a consequence (Ex. 41). Hydrogen sulfide also is encountered in natural
oil and gas deposits and in sewers, caissons, tunnels, and other construction sites (Grant 1986, p. 495). When used
in pesticidal applications and as directed on the label, this substance is regulated by the EPA under the Federal Insecticide,
Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA). In longshoring, the hazard is brought about by the generation of hydrogen
sulfide gas, caused by the decomposition of the menhaden (and similar species) catch.
Hydrogen sulfide's effects on experimental animals are similar to those seen in exposed workers: conjunctivitis,
pulmonary irritation, acute poisoning, and death by chemical asphyxiation (Ex. 42). The LD





 in mice is 673 ppm for 1 hour (Ex. 43). A number of experiments have demonstrated that exposure to hydrogen sulfide
concentrations of 50 to 100 ppm for several hours (or sometimes longer) causes damage to the corneal epithelium of
dogs, cats, rabbits, and guinea pigs; animals are believed to be somewhat less sensitive than humans to hydrogen sulfide's
ocular effects but may be more sensitive to its pulmonary effects (Grant 1986, p. 1496).
When inhaled at concentrations exceeding 500 ppm, exposure to hydrogen sulfide has caused respiratory paralysis
and death. Acutely poisoned individuals who recover may experience headaches, fatigue, dizziness, and nystagmus;
eventually, however, recovery is usually complete (Ex. 44). The 1986 ACGIH 

Documentation

 (Ex. 1-3, p. 1318) cites several reports (Ex. 46) of the occurrence of adverse ocular effects, including conjunctivitis,
caused by exposure to 20 ppm or less of hydrogen sulfide. A study by Poda and Aiken (Ex. 47) reports that the adoption
of a voluntary limit of 10 ppm in two heavy-water plants eliminated exposure problems at those facilities. An early
study by Flury and Zernik (1931f) reports that the conjunctivitis caused by the exposure of volunteers to 10 to 15 ppm
of hydrogen sulfide for six hours endured for several days; however, this substance is not known to have caused irreversible
eye damage.
The author of the best-known general source on the toxicology of the eye (Grant 1986) states that ``where the concentration
[of hydrogen sulfide] is regularly kept below 10 ppm in air, it is rare to have any irritation of the eyes'' (p. 1496).
OSHA believes that the proposed STEL will ensure that concentrations are maintained close to the 8-hour TWA and that
excursions above irritant levels are thus minimized.
Based on this evidence, OSHA believes that the current 10-ppm 8-hour TWA limit alone does not adequately protect workers
in Longshoring and Marine Terminals against the adverse ocular effects associated with exposure to concentrations
of hydrogen sulfide above 10 ppm. OSHA believes that the eye irritation and conjunctivitis associated with such exposures
represent a significant risk of material health impairment to these workers because they may experience pain and
other ocular effects and be forced to seek medical treatment after such exposures. OSHA is accordingly proposing
an 8-hour TWA limit of 10 ppm for hydrogen sulfide with a short-term limit of 15 ppm in these parts 1917 and 1918. Based
on available information, the Agency has determined that these limits are necessary to provide protection from the
significant risk of exposure-related ocular effects, including conjunctivitis, corneal edema, and distortion
of vision, associated with occupational exposure to hydrogen sulfide.
Since the hazard this paragraph seeks to avoid is brought about by the generation of hydrogen sulfide gas, caused by
the decomposition of the menhaden (and similar species) catch, the requirements are not applicable to operations
aboard vessels with operable refrigerated compartments used to hold the catch. Paragraph (f) requires that tests
be performed before and during discharge, by designated personnel who are trained and competent in their understanding
of the potential hazards involved within the catch hold(s). The test would include assessments of hydrogen sulfide
and oxygen content of the atmosphere(s) within the hold(s). Employers would be prohibited from sending employees
into the hold(s) unless the hydrogen sulfide level was kept below 10 parts per million on a time weighted average with
a short term exposure limit of 15 ppm measured over a 15 minute sampling period. Oxygen levels must be maintained to
at least 19.5 percent. In arriving at these proposed requirements, OSHA utilizes information that supported similar
requirements for the shoreside aspect of menhaden operations in the Agency's rules for Marine Terminals (1917.73;
See discussion at 46 FR 4213). Also, in the development of the proposed requirements, the National Fish Meal 
Oil Association was clearly supportive of the proposed regulatory posture. In communications between that group
and the Department of Labor, and in memoranda to the association's membership (Ex. 156), it is clear that industry
practice is quite consistent with OSHA's proposal.
Proposed 1918.95 contains requirements for sanitary considerations at all longshoring operations. OSHA believes
that the hazards associated with poor sanitation and sanitary practices are well established and need not be elaborated
here. The proposed provisions are fully consistent with the current regulations for shoreside cargo handling (1917.127),
providing the uniformity that is necessary between the two segments of marine cargo handling. OSHA is proposing in
both 1917.127 and 1918.95 to include tables which specify the number of toilet facilities according to the number
of employees at the worksite. This table has been taken from the sanitation section in OSHA's Construction Safety
Regulations, 29 CFR 1926.51(c). OSHA requests the public to comment on the inclusion of this table in this proposal.
Summarizing the section, OSHA would require that employers provide their workers with washing and toilet facilities
that are equipped with hot and cold (or tepid) running water; soap; clean hand towels (or warm air blowers); clean and
functional toilets (that offer separate compartments with a latched door), and clean drinking water (with no common
cups). The consumption of food or drink would continue to be prohibited wherever hazardous materials are stowed or
being handled (see definition at 1918.2(g)). Additionally, cargo handling operations are to be separated (by barriers)
from the vessel's uncovered refuse and, in the unlikely event of a sanitary line overboard discharge, from it as well.
Since longshoring work is performed adjacent to a marine terminal, if the marine terminal's sanitation facilities
are available for longshore employees' use, this would constitute compliance with 1918.95. (Section 1917.127,
which covers sanitation at marine terminals, is virtually identical to proposed 1918.95.)
Because longshoring operations generally take place in a location with restricted space, i.e., aboard a ship, other
non-associated but often necessary work (such as ship's maintenance and repair) must be conducted carefully, with
due deference to the cargo handling being performed. In such circumstances, employees may be exposed to hazards associated
with excessive noise leading to impaired communications, excessive light or heat from hot work, overspray from abrasive
blasting or spray painting, or non-ionizing radiation. In OSHA's current rules for Longshoring (1918.95), the Agency
has prescribed requirements to account for the hazards that can be anticipated when maintenance and repair work are
concurrently undertaken with cargo handling. Those same rules are proposed in 1918.95 (with very minor change) to
be included in the revision of this part. Summarizing them, longshoring operations would be prohibited when noise
produced by such concurrent work interferes with the communication of warnings or instructions; when falling objects
could fall on cargo handlers from such work being conducted overhead; when welding slag, burning sparks or welding
rod flash could injure cargo handlers; and when abrasive blasting or spray painting is being performed in the vicinity
of cargo operations. Additionally, OSHA is proposing to prohibit cargo handling operations where the employees
are exposed to electromagnetic (non-ionizing) radiation that is emitted from the radio and radar equipment on the
vessel. This could be especially dangerous when employees are working on the tops of containers while work is being
done to the radar or radio equipment. OSHA is also aware of the dangers associated with non-ionizing radiation emitted
from radio and television towers that are close to marine cargo handling facilities and has included the words ``or
from radio or television transmitting towers ashore'' in this paragraph. OSHA issued a Hazard Information Bulletin
on September 5, 1990, concerning a non-ionizing radiation incident caused by radio transmitting towers that were
near a cargo handling facility. The radio frequency emissions were aimed in the direction of the cargo handling operation
and the radiation caused longshore workers touching the crane wires and hooks to be burned. This situation was corrected
by having the transmissions directed away from the cargo handling area, however other options were available such
as, insulating the cargo hook, or providing proper personal protective equipment (Ex. 1137).
Proposed 1918.97 sets out requirements for first aid and lifesaving, and parallels closely the same considerations
set out by OSHA in its rules for the shoreside aspect of marine cargo handling (1917.26). The hazards that this section
is meant to address are those that would occur in the absence of first aid or rescue; that is, following an accident,
this section is intended to mitigate the extent of injury to the employee.
In summarizing this proposed section, the employer would be required to direct all employees to report all injuries.
A first aid kit would be required to be available at each vessel being worked, with at least one person holding a valid
first aid certificate also available to administer first aid. OSHA does not stipulate who the certificate's issuing
organization must be, but remains consistent with its position taken while developing the Marine Terminals rule,
wherein the agency stated at 46 FR 4193:



No particular first aid course or approving agency is designated, so long as the certificate is issued by a responsible
organization which requires successful completion of a course as evidence of qualification.



OSHA sets out no specific criteria for the contents of the required first aid kit(s). The Agency does, however, propose
to have those needs individualized by a physician who, in consultation with the employer, can customize first aid
kit contents to the hazards to be encountered. This is consistent with the approach taken by OSHA in its General Industry
(1910.151(b)) and its Construction standards (1926.50(d)(1)). OSHA believes this approach to be not only more flexible,
but more protective as well. It should be noted that OSHA is proposing to amend the Marine Terminal regulations to read
the same as what is being proposed in this draft in regards to first aid kits and emergency stretchers. Requiring weekly
checks of the contents of first aid kits is again consistent with OSHA's Safety and Health Regulations for Construction,
1926.50(d)(2).
Additionally, OSHA proposes to include more specific requirements addressing strength and design characteristics
of emergency stretchers (Stokes baskets). These requirements reflect the terms of an agreement between the West
Gulf Maritime Association and individual locals of the I.L.A. operating on the Gulf of Mexico, which OSHA considers
to be appropriate for inclusion in the proposal. The requirement that the stretcher have at least four sets of ``effective''
patient restraints means that the restraints must be able to secure the patient to the stretcher even if the stretcher
and patient is being lifted vertically. In an accident cited earlier in the preamble, (Ex. 190), where the employee
was being carried vertically in the stretcher, the restraints were not effective and the patient fell off.
In proposed 1918.98, OSHA sets out requirements for the qualifications of machinery operators, i.e., crane or winch
operators, industrial truck drivers, conveyor operators, etc., and provides proposed language to require the training
of supervisory personnel, i.e., gang foremen, stevedore superintendents, etc., in accident prevention. The hazards
addressed by this section arise from inexperienced, untrained or inappropriate operators of cargo handling machinery;
and hazards created by improperly trained supervisory personnel. These hazards can readily lead to accidental injury
or death.
Both topics originate in the shoreside rules (1917.27), and focus on very important aspects indisputably tied to
safe cargo operations. The proposed provisions would require that all employees (except supervised trainees) be
familiar with signs, signals and operating instructions before operating cargo handling machinery or before giving
signals to operators. OSHA would require that employee competency to perform such work be determined by the employer,
using training and experience as criteria in making such a determination. The employer would be prohibited from allowing
employees with a known incapacitating ailment, such as heart disease or epilepsy, or employees with defective uncorrected
hearing or eyesight, from operating that equipment. Because supervisory training is considered to be essential
to reducing the amount of accidents in any industrial setting, the Agency proposes to set requirements for the shipboard
cargo handling workplace that will complement such requirements already in place for shoreside work. OSHA asks the
public to comment on the effectiveness of the shoreside supervisory programs and benefits that have been derived.
In proposing this requirement, the Agency notes that the great majority of supervisory persons already trained in
accident prevention under the part 1917 rules, are those same individuals who would be covered by the training requirement
under this proposal. The Agency requests interested persons to submit comment on the proportion of supervisory employees
for whom such training would actually be required. The same built-in transition periods established for training
within the Marine Terminals rule (two years after the promulgation of the final rule and after that date 90 days after
supervisory assignment), are proposed also for shipboard application. The criteria for course content is performance-based,
allowing for instruction to be tailored to the particular operation(s). The recommended topics included as a footnote
are considered to be rudimentary to most shipboard cargo handling operations.
It should be noted that current 1918.98 entitled ``Grain fitting'' is being deleted by this proposal. OSHA believes
that this type of longshoring operation is obsolete and no longer exists. OSHA, however, recognizes that interested
parties may have differing views regarding this deletion and invite comment on this point.


Subpart J_Personal Protective Equipment


All proposed sections of this subpart are based in the requirements for personal protective equipment found in the
shoreside requirements for marine cargo handling (1917.91, 1917.92, 1917.92, 1917.93, 1917.94, and 1917.95).
The hazards addressed by this section are those that personal protective equipment can eliminate or ameliorate by
its proper use. For example, eye protection can prevent the loss of an eye; foot protection can prevent a broken foot;
respirators can prevent toxic poisoning; and so on. As was the case in that rulemaking, (48 FR 30903), OSHA again sets
out the principle that whether the PPE costs must be borne by employers depends largely on whether the employee has
possession, responsibility and control over the specific piece of equipment. As an example, items such as protective
gloves and foot wear are among pieces of gear that employees may bring home for personal use between work shifts, but
the employees would be protected by the gear while at work. As such, the employer has to make available and assure that
employees wear such equipment, but the standard does not require the employer to furnish it free of cost. Other items
however, such as respirators, fall protection systems and special protective clothing, are pieces of gear that the
employer is required to furnish and maintain.
These are items that do not leave the workplace and are always under the control of the employer. Such items are those
for which the employee is not obligated to bear any cost under the standards. OSHA understands that various arrangements
exist for shared cost responsibilities and sole cost responsibilities at different parts of the Nation's waterfront,
and leaves to the employers and employees the right to resolve such issues.
Proposed 1918.101, would require employees performing work which is hazardous to the eyes be provided with protection
that meets the requirements (evidenced by marking or labeling) of the American National Standard for Occupational
and Educational Eye and Face Protection (ANSI Z87.11989). Such eye protection would be required to be maintained
in good condition, with cleaning and disinfection performed prior to issuance to another worker.
Proposed 1918.102 refers to 1918.1(b)(12), which adopts by reference OSHA's General Industry standard for respiratory
protection (1910.134). The shipboard cargo handling environment is not unique in the selection or use of respiratory
protection.
In proposed 1918.103, the Agency requires that employees whose heads are exposed to hazards associated with impact
or electric shocks or burns be equipped with and be required to wear protective hats that meet the design requirements
(evidenced by marking or labeling) of American National Standard Requirements for Protective Head Wear for Industrial
Workers (ANSI Z89.11986). It also requires that cleaning and disinfection be performed when reissued to another
worker.
Proposed 1918.104 addresses foot protection, requiring that employees exposed to impact or puncture hazards wear
safety footwear meeting the design requirements of the American National Standard for Personal Protection_Protective
Footwear. ANSI Z411991.
In this rulemaking, OSHA also proposes to update the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) references that
are in the Marine Terminal standard so that they are the same as in the proposed Longshoring standard; 1917.91 (Eye
protection); 1917.93 (Head protection); and 1917.94 (Foot protection).
In proposed 1918.105, other forms of protective measures for personnel are addressed. In summary, OSHA adopts a general
approach to all additional protective clothing which requires that the employer provide and see to the proper use
of all such measures. The Agency would require that all additional protective clothing be cleaned and disinfected
before reissuance. It notes, however, that some types of equipment, such as disposable coveralls, require no cleaning
or disinfection since they are single use items and discarded once used. Also, in some instances protective clothing
may be issued, but because never worn or soiled, necessitates no further sanitary measures.
Personal flotation devices would be provided by the employer and required for all employees whose work exposes them
to falls into the water in any of the following circumstances: when they are working in isolation (such as when adjusting
by oneself mooring lines of a small craft abreast of a larger vessel); where physical constraints posed by limited
working or walking area creates a fall hazard (such as when securing lines at the outboard edge of a barge having a narrow
fore and aft walkway, or where the work area is obstructed by cargo or other obstacles in a manner that does not allow
employees safe footing (such as when securing boom tie-downs at the outboard edge of a floating crane whose deck is
congested with auxiliary hoisting equipment). OSHA is also proposing to add that personal flotation devices be worn
by employees that are doing any work on the deck of a barge. There are numerous incidents of drowning which have occurred
when employees have fallen overboard from a barge. Often these falls from a barge occur in the river system, where rapid
currents increase the danger of drowning (Exs. 1103, Case Nos. 13, 17, 18, 72, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 101, 130,
136, 139, 143). OSHA feels that the danger of falling overboard while working on the deck of a barge (as opposed to working
on the deck of a ship where the edge of the deck generally is guarded by a bulwark and railing) is sufficiently great as
to add this proposed language. All personal flotation devices would be required to be a Coast Guard approved preserver
or vest, and would be expected to be maintained in a safe and serviceable condition (no rips, rot or punctures and all
closure devices in good order).
In all cases, it is clearly not enough just to have PPE available; the equipment needs to be used. The standard requires
the employer to enforce the wearing of each type PPE whenever it is needed.


Appendices I, II, and III


Appendix I is a non-mandatory appendix that sets out the format of vessel cargo gear registers and certificates, under
the terms of ILO Convention 152 (Ex. 133), discussed earlier in reference to 1918.11. Major changes from the
original ILO Convention 32 (Ex. 134), include a new Form (Form No. 2 (U) which is a certificate issued by a ``competent
person'' (most often a surveyor under the employ of a vessel classification society or inspection surety service)
that contains the results of testing and examination of derricks used in union purchase.
In the case of foreign flagged ship's gear with which U.S.longshore workers load or discharge cargo, OSHA acts in the
role of the ``competent authority'' in determining which ``competent person(s)''/``responsible person(s)''
are in fact qualified to witness tests/exams and execute certificates and registers. For this purpose, as a practical
matter, OSHA recognizes persons and organizations acceptable to the Nation under whose laws the particular vessel
is registered. In the event that a given flag has no laws that specifically apply (Ex. 191), OSHA would rely upon
the vessel having a register and certificates endorsed by an entity approved for that purpose by the Commandant of
the U.S. Coast Guard (see 46 CFR 91.37) or, alternately, an organization accredited by OSHA under part 1919 of this
chapter (see proposed 1918.11). Another significant change from the original Convention, is the interval between
tests of cargo handling gear. Such gear, under the terms of Convention 32, was required to be tested (for the assignment
of a safe working load) initially before being taken into use. Because OSHA's current rule adopts the testing and examination
requirements for vessel's cargo gear contained in Convention 32 (see 1918.12(a) of the current rules), the Agency
can presently require that such gear is initially tested but, absent special circumstances, the gear is not required
to be tested again. As a practical matter, most vessels (those operating under the rules of classification societies
and international inspection services) have been operating under a quadrennial test schedule. With the advent of
Convention 152, the international standard has shifted to ``at least once in every five years,'' giving latitude
to all organizations desiring to maintain the four year cycle. In proposing to stay in step with the international
standard, OSHA offers this Appendix to assist employers and employees in correctly ascertaining the form and content
of registers and certificates prescribed for in the newer Convention.
Appendix II, which is also non-mandatory, is offered as an aid to employers and employees in arriving at strength values
of various pieces of gear used aboard ship in longshoring operations. Although the primary source for information
on component gear strength is ``the manufacturer's recommendations'' or ``the manufacturer's recommended ratings,''
the Agency appreciates that instances will arise wherein such recommendations or ratings will not be available (such
as when some preslung cargoes are to be discharged from foreign ports). In such instances, proposed Appendix contains
tables which can be used to evaluate hoisting equipment. Many of the tables appearing in this Appendix are taken directly
from the latest American National Standard (ASME B30.91990 and addenda titled, Slings) (Ex. 1148).
The balance of the tables (those for allowable chain wear; shackle safe working loads; and wire rope clips) are derived
from an amalgam of other OSHA rules for Longshoring, Construction (1926.251), and General Industry (1910.184).
These tables have been carefully assessed by OSHA as to their appropriateness for cargo handling applications, and
the Agency believes that they will serve as fully protective criteria.
Appendix III, which is also non-mandatory, recognizes that, in some very limited situations, the use of fall protection
may be infeasible. OSHA has listed two narrowly defined situations where it feels that fall protection may not be feasible.
OSHA solicits comment from the public regarding the appropriateness of these two examples and whether there are additional
examples of infeasibility. In addition, OSHA would consider this as an appropriate place to include any other advisory
information regarding container top safety and solicits comments accordingly. 

VI. Proposed Amendments and Corrections To Marine Terminal Standards


Several of the proposed amendments to the Longshoring standard (part 1918) address marine cargo handling hazards
that should be reflected by a corresponding provision in the Marine Terminal standard (part 1917). For example, both
parts currently do not explicitly prohibit employees from riding the hook or the load. By contrast, proposed 1918.81(l)
prohibits this practice as does proposed 1917.45(l). The basis for this prohibition is discussed above. For the purposes
of this discussion, when the basis for a proposed amendment is treated in the preamble above, it is not necessary to
repeat it here. OSHA is requesting comment from the public on proposed amendments to Marine Terminals (part 1917)
standards.
A new paragraph (d) has been added to 1917.11 that addresses the hazards associated with protruding nails that may
be left in materials, such as dunnage, that have ben removed from the vessels and placed ashore. This paragraph has
been taken from language that is in the current Longshoring regulations and is in the proposal at 1918.91(h)(2).
Currently in both parts, the allowable exposure limits for carbon monoxide is 50 ppm over an 8-hour time weighted average
with a ceiling of 100 ppm. OSHA is proposing to change the 8-hour time weighted average to 35 ppm while leaving the ceiling
limit at 100 ppm. This change is reflected in both proposed parts in 1918.94 and 1917.24. (See above.)
In another example, currently in both 1918.96 and 1917.26, the contents of a first-aid kit are specifically listed.
In proposed 1918.96, however, the contents of a first-aid kit are to be determined by a physician. OSHA feels that the
proposed part 1918 standard is more protective and proposes to amend 1917.26 to be consistent. OSHA would also incorporate
into part 1917 the more extensive provisions that are found in proposed 1918.96 pertaining to the requirements for
stokes basket stretchers.
In 1917.45(j)(2), OSHA is proposing to require that all cranes used to hoist personnel be equipped with and operate
in the power up and power down mode and have the brake apply automatically when not hoisting or lowering. This is consistent
with proposed 1918.66(c)(2).
OSHA is proposing a new requirement in 1917.50(i)(1), that prohibits exceeding the safe working load of cargo handing
gear which is similar to language found in proposed 1918.61(b)(1). OSHA is also proposing a new requirement in 1917.50(i)(2),
which requires the safe working load be marked on cargo handling gear with a safe working load greater than 5 short tons.
This proposal is similar to proposed 1918.61(b)(2). See the discussion on these proposed requirements in the preamble
for 1918.61.
In 1917.71(e), OSHA is proposing to allow only high-visibility vests (or equivalent protection) to be worn and remove
the words ``decals or reflectors.'' This would be in agreement with proposed 1918.86(n). As indicated above, the
reflective area of a decal on a hard hat is obviously less than that of a vest. Also, the reflective value is lost during
daylight hours or whenever the wearer takes off the hard hat. A number of serious accidents (Exs. 178, 189)
have occurred in the past due to the nature of the work involved in such cargo operations. Additionally, OSHA is proposing
to amend the language found in 1917.71(f)(5) to reflect the language found in proposed 1918.86(f), which requires
that all brake air-lines be connected when pulling trailers equipped with air brakes. OSHA is proposing to change
1917.73(a)(2) to read 10 ppm of hydrogen sulfide to agree with proposed 1918.94(f)(4). As recently as 1987, a hydrogen
sulfide incident aboard a menhaden vessel led to serious injury and a fatality (Ex. 180). (See discussion of
this for 1918.94(f) in Section V of this proposal).
OSHA proposes to carry over to 1917.71 the provision found in proposed 1918.86(g) that requires that flat bed and low
boys trailers (mafi's) be marked with their cargo capacities and not be overloaded. 
OSHA also seeks public comment on two proposed rules to be included in the Marine Terminal standard that do not have
analogous rules in the proposed Longshoring standard. First, OSHA proposes to require that seat (lap) belt restraints
be installed in the crane operators seat in high-speed container gantry cranes. High speed container gantry cranes
are now capable of hoist speeds of 360 feet per minute (110 m/min) (without a load) and trolley speeds of 500 feet per
minute (152 m/min). OSHA is concerned that the operator may be exposed to potentially injurious effects of sudden
stops and starts (Ex. 1133). OSHA believes that operator restraints will minimize the hazard and seeks comment
from the public on this issue.
In the case of shipments of tobacco that have been containerized and then fumigated, OSHA is proposing, in 1917.25(g),
that such containers be aerated (before being loaded on a ship) as follows: (1) If in unsealed bales or in hogsheads,
aerated (with doors open) for 48 hours after fumigation has been completed, and, (2) if contained in a plastic enclosure,
aerated (with doors open) for 72 hours. In proposing these requirements, OSHA relies on studies performed by the U.S.
Department of Agriculture, Agriculture Research Service (Ex. 170). These studies concluded that intermodal
containers so treated required 48 to 72 hours aeration to be free of hazardous fumigant levels. Past and recent communications
(Ex. 195) with the Tobacco Association of the United States, also show that organization in accord with the
72-hour aeration required for tobacco shipped in polyethylene or similarly lined boxes carried in intermodal containers.
Upon the publication of the final Marine Terminal standard, several technical drafting amendments were treated
in the preamble that were not consistently picked up in the subsequent regulatory text. OSHA is now proposing that
these amendments be made. Several paragraphs have been corrected by removing the phrase, ``The employer shall ensure...'',
from the beginning of the paragraph. See the discussion for this in 48 FR 3088830889. The paragraphs that have
been corrected in this manner are: 1917.18(a); 1917.43(e)(1)(i); 1917.44(o)(3)(ii); 1917.44(o)(4); 1917.126(b);
1917.152(f)(1); 1917.152(f)(2) and 1917.152(f)(3)(iv). In addition, several paragraphs are being proposed to
be revised by changing the phrase, ``shall be available at the terminal'' to the phrase, ``shall be made available
for inspection''. See the discussion for this in 48 FR 30889. The proposed paragraphs that reflect this change are:
1917.24(d), 1917.25.(c), 1917.42(b)(4), 1917.42(c)(1), 1917.42(d)(1), 1917.42(h)(4), and 1917.42(h)(5).
OSHA is also aware of several typographical errors that are in the current 29 CFR part 1917 and intends to correct those
in this rulemaking. For example, one of these corrections is in 1917.42. A square root sign has been added to the formula
found in paragraph (d)(2), correcting an error that is in the current formula. OSHA seeks public comment on any other
areas in the Marine Terminal standard that are affected because of the changes proposed to the Longshoring standard
in this rulemaking.


VII. Other Issues


A. OSHA is raising the issue of the possible harmful effects of diesel exhaust on employees, especially those employees
who work Ro/Ro vessels where exposure to such exhaust is probably the greatest. OSHA is aware that studies have been
done concerning the effects of diesel exhaust by the Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) in the mining industry.
OSHA is not aware of any studies relating to the longshoring industry, (although the International Cargo Handling
and Coordination Association (ICHCA) is in the process of drafting a paper entitled ``Fumes in Ships'', which will
address this topic), and requests the public to submit pertinent information. OSHA requests information of the following:
1. What are the health effects of diesel exhaust? 2. What are the typical timeframes where employees are exposed to
diesel exhaust? 3. Is mechanical ventilation sufficient to eliminate any harmful effects? 4. What other methods
can be employed to reduce any harmful effects?
B. OSHA is aware of the problem of picking up the chassis and fifth wheel along with the container due to the failure of
the container and chassis to separate during a loading operation. This is due to one or more of the chassis's twistlocks
being in the locked position or one or more of the twist locks ``hanging up'' while in the unlocked position. Unfortunately,
the driver of the fifth wheel is in the cab as it is being lifted and often sustains injuries when the cab and chassis fall
back to the ground before the crane operator can lower everything back down. OSHA requests information on the following
questions: 1) How frequently does this problem occur;? 2) OSHA believes this is primarily a problem on the West Coast.
Is this true and why;? 3) OSHA is aware of several devices that have been developed to shut the crane down once the device
detects the fifth wheel being raised off the ground. OSHA seeks information on the effectiveness of these devices
in eliminating the problem, and the cost to purchase and install these devices; 4) Are there other ways to eliminate
the problem, such as better ``monitoring'' of the chassis twistlocks under the hook through training and work practices,
or requiring the driver to get out of the cab until the container is lifted clear of the chassis?
C. OSHA has long recognized the utility of comprehensive occupational safety and health programs, and adopted non-mandatory
guidance for safety and health program management on January 26, 1989 (54 FR 3904). These guidelines were based on
a distillation of safety and health management practices used by employers that have implemented successful comprehensive
programs. The major elements OSHA identified in the guidelines for effective occupational safety and health programs
are: 1) management commitment and employee involvement; 2) worksite analysis to anticipate and identify potential
hazards; 3) hazard prevention and control; and 4) safety and health training.
Successfully implemented programs generally result in facilities that have a lower incidence of occupationally
related illnesses and injuries. In particular, OSHA has found that companies which have implemented comprehensive
safety and health programs and are participating in its Voluntary Protection Programs (VPP) have lost-workday rates
that range from one-fifth to one-third the rates experienced by average worksites within their industrial classification.
In addition, participating sites have reported improved employee morale, product quality, and productivity as
some of the secondary benefits of their safety and health management activities.
Occupational safety and health standards and guidelines, whether mandatory or developed as voluntary consensus
activities, traditionally have tended to focus on specific problems or hazards rather than taking a broad, program-oriented
approach.
In recent years, however, OSHA has promulgated a number of generic standards that have program requirements. There
is now increasing evidence that a requirement for all employers to address occupational safety and health programmatically
can provide an effective supplement to specific hazard-related requirements, and provides an added degree of safety
and health for employees.
Properly designed and implemented comprehensive programs focus the attention of both employers and employees on
safety and health in the workplace. With increased awareness of safety and health concerns, and the commitment to
alleviate the hazards by implementing appropriate controls, workplace-related safety and health injuries and
illnesses are expected to decrease.
While the specific elements of existing comprehensive occupational safety and health (COSH) programs may vary,
the general concept is the same. COSH programs are designed to coordinate and integrate all facets of occupational
safety and health into the management practices for the facility. Rather than addressing problems on a one-by-one
basis, implementation of a COSH program requires company management to systematically review all hazards in the
facility, and develop a plan to prevent or control them. All employees of the facility must be involved in the development
and implementation of the plan, and there must be a company-wide commitment to controlling or eliminating occupational
safety and health problems. The program is implemented on a continuing basis, that is, there are provisions for ensuring
that the situation in the facility is monitored on a regular basis to ensure that the program is working. Program evaluation
activities to assess effectiveness are also part of the concept. The logic of this approach is simple_prevent adverse
effects from occurring by identifying hazards, and implementing a plan to eliminate or minimize them. By doing this
systematically, resources are not duplicated or wasted, and a coordinated, integrated strategy can be implemented.
Effective functioning of such a program depends largely on the commitment and involvement of all members of the organization,
beginning with the highest level of management.
OSHA believes the COSH program approach can be applied in any establishment, and in any size facility. The complexity
of the specific program in a particular establishment will depend on the nature of the business, the number of employees,
and the types of hazards present. While the basic components of a COSH program would be the same in, for example, a marine
terminal and an automobile manufacturing plant shop, the methods used to implement them would vary based on the different
needs of the facilities. Every type and size of establishment should nevertheless have a systematic approach to addressing
occupational safety and health concerns. All workplaces, from office situations to health care facilities, restaurants
to stevedoring operations, can benefit from the development and implementation of an appropriate COSH program.


Request for Comments and Information


OSHA is raising this issue to solicit public input on COSH programs. The Agency is particularly interested in learning
about the experiences of employers who have already implemented such programs, and those of employees who work in
facilities where these programs have been implemented. The purpose of collecting these comments is to determine
whether OSHA should adopt mandatory requirements for comprehensive occupational safety and health programs; what
the components of such programs should be; what problems employers have had in implementing such programs, and what
can be done to alleviate those problems; the benefits of implementing COSH programs; methods that can be used to evaluate
the effectiveness of the programs; the costs and economic feasibility of such programs; the impacts on small businesses;
and suggestions regarding existing OSHA rules that could be consolidated or modified as a result of promulgating
requirements for mandatory COSH programs.


Format of Questions and Responses


The specific questions asked are designed to elicit the information OSHA believes would be helpful in determining
appropriate elements for COSH programs in longshoring work. The questions are in some cases directed towards specific
audiences, such as employers who have implemented programs. Other questions have more general applicability. Interested
persons may also submit other information or opinions which they believe are relevant.
OSHA asks that commenters respond to the specific questions enumerated, and to number responses in accordance with
the number of the question to which the response is addressed. In addition, it would also be helpful for OSHA to receive
copies of written materials to supplement these responses, such as copies of written programs, examples of forms
used, and sample evaluations.
1) OSHA would like to receive information and data regarding the respondents to this notice in order to properly profile
the responses. If you are submitting comments in response to this notice on behalf of an employer or group of employers
that have implemented a COSH program, or employee or group of employees working in such a facility, please provide
the following specific information. If you are not one of either of these groups, please indicate your role or relation
to COSH programs.
a) The size of the facility by number of employees;
b) When the program was implemented;
c) Why the program was implemented (

e.g

., voluntary decision, state requirements, insurance carrier's requirements, etc.);
d) What the major components of the existing program are;
e) What the initial and annual costs of implementing each of these components have been, and how you derived these costs;
f) What resources have been required to operate the programs; and, 
g) What cost savings, illness or injury reductions, or other benefits (e.g., changes in productivity, absenteeism,
turnover, insurance, etc.) have accrued due to implementation of the program, and how you derived these benefits.
Components of a COSH Program
As described above, OSHA has published and distributed guidelines for safety and health management programs which
include four major elements. OSHA would like comments on whether these elements are appropriate; whether more specific
information should be provided regarding what should be addressed under each of these elements; and what other elements
may be appropriate for inclusion in COSH programs.


Management commitment and employee involvement

. The first element included in the guidelines is management commitment and employee involvement, or management
leadership. Management commitment is expected to be stated in a worksite policy which outlines the organization's
priority on safety and health, and indicates who has primary responsibility for implementation of various aspects
of the policy. Other facets of this element include establishing and communicating clear goals and objectives for
the program; providing visible management involvement; ensuring employee involvement; providing adequate authority
and resources for those responsible; holding those responsible accountable; ensuring contract workers are protected;
and reviewing and evaluating the program at least annually.
2) Please comment on the inclusion of management commitment and employee involvement as a major element of a COSH program.
It has been OSHA's experience and that there is no situation where these considerations are inappropriate.
3) Is this a common program component? How is it implemented? Is the program integrated into the overall management
of the workplace? How well does this work? 4) Who is responsible for managing the program? What skills and knowledge
must this person have to be the program manager? What is the role of the President or Chief Executive Officer? The facility
manager? The supervisor? The employee? Do performance evaluations include an assessment of performance with regard
to safety and health? Are managers and employees held accountable for safety and health performance? How?
5) Are written policy statements prepared and distributed? Please provide examples. Are there situations where
a program can operate effectively without having a written plan?
6) What was the primary motivation for implementing the program (e.g., voluntary, state requirements)? Have insurance
companies encouraged adoption of COSH programs? How was this done?
7) How is employee involvement ensured in existing programs? Are labor-management committees used? If so, please
provide details about how the committees are formed and are operating. What other suggestions do you have for ensuring
employee involvement?
8) How are existing programs evaluated to determine whether or not they are effective? Are worksite program audits
conducted? What do the audits include? How often are workplace conditions reevaluated after the initial assessment?
Please provide copies of any evaluation procedures that may be available. What are the criteria for determining that
the program is or is not effective? What type of evidence is required to demonstrate that each program element has been
implemented? Is the program integrated into the overall management of the workplace?
9) Have any problems been encountered in implementing this element in existing programs? If so, how were these problems
solved? Is the guidance provided in the voluntary guidelines sufficient to implement this element appropriately?
What other information would be useful?


Worksite analysis

. The second element in the guidelines is worksite analysis. Employers must identify all worksite hazards by conducting
an initial and subsequent periodic comprehensive baseline worksite surveys for safety and health. The surveys would
vary by the type of workplace, and the nature of the hazards present, but would include an assessment of both safety
and health hazards. Examples of situations that would have to be assessed would include: exposure to chemicals; exposure
to noise, radiation, or other physical hazards; ergonomics hazards; procedures to handle chemicals that have physical
effects such as flammability and reactivity; machine guarding; shoring of trenches; and potential for falls. Programs
must include provisions for regular worksite inspections to determine if existing controls are working, and to identify
uncontrolled hazards; investigations of accidents, or other unusual incidents; analysis of planned and new facilities,
processes, materials and equipment; job hazard analysis; an employee hazard reporting system; and analysis of injury
and illness trends.
10) Do existing programs you are familiar with include worksite analysis? How is it implemented, and who is responsible
for doing it? Please provide examples of how this element is being implemented in existing programs. What criteria
are used to determine what hazards are present? Are there OSHA standards, guidelines, or other documents you can recommend
to assist employers? What do you consider to be the most significant hazard in the workplace?
11) Do existing programs include chemical exposure assessments as part of the worksite analysis process? Should
further guidance be provided for exposure assessment? What criteria for exposure assessment are used in existing
programs? Is exposure monitoring conducted? What criteria are used to determine when monitoring is to be done? Who
is performing exposure monitoring? What training or background did they have to prepare them for this? Are other types
of hazards subject to monitoring (such as noise, radiation)? What criteria are used to monitor these hazards?
12) Do existing programs include an ergonomics component? How are ergonomics problems identified? What criteria
are used? Who does the evaluation, and what is their relevant training or background?
13) Has any illness/injury trend analysis been undertaken in facilities with COSH programs? What have the trends
shown? What action was taken as a result of the findings? Please provide any trend data you have to demonstrate the effect
of such programs.
14) What problems have been encountered in implementing this element in existing programs? How were these problems
solved? Is the guidance provided in the voluntary guidelines sufficient to implement this element appropriately?
What other information would be useful?
Hazard prevention and control. Once the hazards have been identified, the third element the COSH program must address
is hazard prevention and control. The current and potential hazards must be corrected or controlled in a timely manner,
using engineering techniques where feasible and appropriate.
Procedures for working safely are to be established, and all affected parties must understand and follow them. Personal
protective equipment is to be made available where appropriate; administrative controls are to be used when necessary;
provision is to be made for repair and maintenance of equipment; emergency preparedness is to be addressed; and a medical
program must be available.
15) Do existing programs you are familiar with include hazard prevention and control? How is it implemented, and who
is responsible for doing it? Please provide examples of how this element is being implemented in existing programs.
In particular, please provide any available information about how hazards and risks are defined, and how risk reduction
goals are set. Who decides what control measures are implemented? What criteria are used? Does the program include
an evaluation of occupational safety and health implications when new facilities, processes, materials, or equipment
are planned?
16) Do existing programs include standard operating procedures for repair and maintenance?
17) Are their programs for emergency preparedness? If so, how are they compiled and made available? Is there a plan
for emergency response? If so, what types of emergencies are addressed? Please provide samples of your standard operating
procedures and emergency preparedness and response plans.
18) Is a medical program available? What is the scope of the program, e.g. does it cover assessments related to workplace
conditions, wellness programs, etc.? Are medical services provided in-house, or are they contracted out? What types
of health professionals are involved in delivering occupational health services? What are their respective roles
and what is their relevant training or background?
19) Does the medical program include preplacement medical surveillance? Periodic medical surveillance? What criteria
are used to determine what surveillance is done? Who decides what surveillance is to be done? Are medical records reviewed
to determine if there are trends in injuries and illnesses? Who conducts the review? What is done with the results?
20) Have problems been encountered in implementing this element in existing programs? If so, how were these problems
solved? Is the guidance provided in the voluntary guidelines sufficient to implement this element appropriately?
What other information would be useful?


Safety and health training

. The last major element in the voluntary guidelines for COSH programs is safety and health training. In order to ensure
that the program works effectively, all employees must be trained to understand the safety and health concerns in
their workplace; the plan to minimize or eliminate those concerns; and their roles in implementation of the plan.
This includes training for those in supervisory or management roles. Responsibilities must be clearly described,
and the lines of authority appropriately drawn. OSHA has published Voluntary Training Guidelines to provide employers
with information about designing and implementing an appropriate safety and health training program. (See Training
Requirements in OSHA Standards and Training Guidelines, OSHA 2254 (Revised), 1992.)
21) Do existing programs include safety and health training? How is it implemented, and who is responsible for performing
and implementing it? Please provide examples of how this element is being implemented in existing programs, including
the type of training, such as classroom instruction, on-the-job work practices training, videotapes, or interactive
videos. Does the type of training vary with the type of operation? Have OSHA's Voluntary Training Guidelines been
used in designing and implementing the safety and health training program?
22) Is safety and health training conducted prior to workplace assignment? What does it include in this situation?
Are training requirements for various programs combined into one training program? Approximately how long does
the initial training take for managers? For supervisors? For other workers? Is periodic training conducted? How
often? How long does periodic training take? What is included in the periodic training?
23) Do you have workers who are subject to training certification requirements? How has this worked?
24) Is the training evaluated to determine whether or not it is effective? How is this done?
25) What qualifications do the trainers have?
26) Have problems been encountered in implementing this element in existing programs? If so, how were these problems
solved? Is the guidance provided in the voluntary guidelines sufficient to implement this element appropriately?
What other information would be useful?


Issues Related to Regulation
If OSHA determines that it would be appropriate to promulgate a standard for COSH programs, there are a number of other
issues which will have to be addressed. Comments from the public are solicited on the following:
27) Should the voluntary guidelines OSHA issued in 1989 be the primary basis for any future regulatory activity in
this area? Based on your experiences, what modifications to the guidelines would be necessary in order for OSHA to
use them as a basis for regulation? Are there additional elements that should be included in a COSH program? What other
information do you think employers would need to implement an appropriate program?
28) The current guidelines are very generally written, and OSHA believes they can be applied in any type of industry
or workplace. Do you think that industry-specific guidelines are required? If so, what should the breakdown be, and
what is the rationale for different program requirements?
29) The current guidelines are also applicable to all sizes of industries. Do you think that small businesses should
be treated differently? If so, why, and in what way?
30) It has been suggested that if OSHA promulgates requirements for COSH programs, there are existing OSHA standards
that could be revised, modified, consolidated, or otherwise changed as a result. Without diminishing employee protections
under current OSHA standards, what rules do you think could be reconsidered if the Agency promulgates a new rule requiring
COSH programs? Commenters are requested to be specific, and provide the rationale for any suggestions.
31) If OSHA promulgates a rule for COSH programs, what type of outreach or compliance assistance materials would you
suggest be made available to employers? What would be the most effective way for OSHA to reach small employers who do
not belong to trade associations or professional societies?



D. OSHA is aware of the increased usage of Flexible Intermediate Bulk Containers (FIBC's) which are used to handle
bulk chemical solids. Some of the FIBC's are designed only to be used for one voyage while others are designed for repeated
usage. OSHA wishes to know: 1) What means are used to mark and identify the one use only type of FIBC, and are they adequate?
and 2) What are the current industry practices regarding the testing of FIBC's and should OSHA incorporate them into
this regulation?
E. OSHA issued a standard for the control of hazardous energy sources (lockout/tagout) that applied to general industry
employment under 29 CFR part 1910 as 1910.147 (54 FR 36645). This standard addresses practices and procedures that
are necessary to disable machinery or equipment and to prevent the release of potentially hazardous energy while
maintenance and servicing activities are being performed. The standard requires that lockout be utilized for equipment
which is designed with a lockout capacity, and tagout may be used for equipment which was not designed to be locked out.
Servicing and maintenance activities are necessary adjuncts to the industrial process.
They are needed to maintain the ability of all machines, equipment, or processes to perform their intended functions.
OSHA believes that these types of operations present the employee with the same types of hazards of unexpected activation,
re-energization, or the release of stored energy, regardless of the type of industrial setting. For these reasons,
OSHA is soliciting public comment regarding the appropriateness of including ``The control of hazardous energy
(lockout/tagout)'' in the ``Scope and applicability'' sections of both 29 CFR part 1917 (Marine Terminals) and 29
CFR part 1918 (Longshoring). While OSHA recognizes that marine terminal activities are more likely to contain work
operations where lockout/tagout hazards are present, it also sees the potential to occur in some longshoring related
operations. OSHA wants to know: 1) should 1910.147 be included in Marine Terminals and why or why not, and 2) should
1910.147 be included in longshoring and why or why not?
F. As indicated earlier, OSHA contracted a safety expert, A. J. Scardino, to conduct a study of the fall hazards associated
with the cargo handling of intermodal containers. (Ex. 1139). The development of the data, that was used in
formulating the opinions and recommendations of this study, involved the visiting and documentation of the activities
at 20 major ports in the United States. Those ports were: Gulfport, MS, Houston, TX, Barbers Cut, TX, Galveston, TX,
Miami, FL, Miami River, FL, Port Everglade, FL, Charleston, SC, Savannah, GA, Norfolk, VA, Portsmith, VA, Elizabeth,
NJ, New Jersey, NJ, Long Beach, CA, Los Angeles, CA, Seattle, WA, Tacoma, WA, Oakland, CA, San Francisco, CA, Honolulu,
HI. As part of the data gathering process the contractor conferred with: members of the Technical Committee of the
National Maritime Safety Association, representatives of Labor Associations, individual Stevedores, Longshore
personnel, and Port representatives.
Of the many areas of inquiry that resulted in positive recommendations, the issue of the location of the fixed anchorage
point in relation to the working surface was addressed: 


When feasible the attachment point of the fall protection system shall be located ``above'' the head of the employee.
Every effort should be made to assure that the attachment point for the system is located no lower than the vertical
height position of the harness ``D'' ring. According to ``Humanscale 7a'', for the 50th percentile male, this would
be 1.4 meters (55.4 inches).



In support of this position, the study cites the National Safety Council in its Accident Prevention Manual for Industrial
Operations 9th. Edition

 (the Bible on Safety) states: (p. 347) ``A belt or harness is worthless unless it is being worn at the time that a fall
is possible and attached to a lanyard or fall arrestor with an 

adequate overhead anchorage

.'' (Emphasis added; Id. p. 3.) In addition Mr. Scardino indicates the importance of pre-exposure planning by citing
Best's Safety Directory 1994 Edition which states: (p634) ``A fixture point above head height always should be planned.''
(Id.)(Ex. 1153).
With regard to current practice, many fall protection systems in use could meet the raised attachment requirement
recommended by Mr. Scardino ``*** approximately 70 to 75% of the existing operations that
employ various fall protection techniques would be able to meet ***'' the requirement. (Id.) Some
existing systems have attachments to devices that are installed on the work surface. Recommendations addressing
these systems include:



The use of systems that are at foot level, thereby creating a tripping hazard, should be discouraged. If these systems
are to be used, then, the components that make up the system should be of a high visibility color. This field study further
determined that these systems were not reliable and created a sense of false security.

While it is recognized that there is in existence, fall protection that does not meet this criteria, steps should be
taken to meet these minimums 

within a three year period.




In light of these recommendations, OSHA wishes to raise an additional issue. To what extent is it necessary and appropriate
to add an additional criteria to those found in 1918.85(k) requiring an elevated anchorage point in order to assure
worker safety.


VIII. Preliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis




Note: 

Numbered references that appear in brackets in this Section VIII, Preliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory
Flexibility Analysis, are to the References that appear at the end of Section VIII.


A. Executive Summary


Introduction


Executive Order 12866 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act require OSHA to analyze the costs, benefits, and other consequences
and impacts associated with proposed standards. Consistent with these requirements, OSHA has prepared this regulatory
impact analysis for the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards.
This analysis includes a description of the industries affected by the regulation, an evaluation of the risks addressed,
an assessment of the benefits attributable to the proposed revisions, the determination of the technological feasibility
of the new requirements, the estimation of the costs of compliance with proposed revisions, the determination of
the economic feasibility of compliance with the proposed revisions, and an analysis of the economic and other impacts
associated with this rulemaking.


Affected Industries


The requirements of the proposed revisions apply to all establishments involved in marine cargo handling. As classified
by the 1987 Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) manual, this industry consists of establishments in SIC 4491
as well as establishments in other SICs conducting marine cargo handling activities.


Evaluation of Risk and Potential Benefits


An estimated 7,593 injuries and 18 fatalities occur annually during marine cargo handling activities. The proposed
revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards are expected to result in the prevention of 1,262 injuries
and 3 fatalities, annually. Many additional fatalities and injuries would be prevented through full compliance
with existing requirements retained in the proposed standards. Most of the injuries occurring during marine cargo
handling activities could be prevented through compliance with the existing as well as with the proposed standards.
In addition to the unquantifiable benefits associated with the reduction in pain and suffering associated with these
incidents, the prevention of these injuries will result in savings of over $18 million dollars, annually. This estimate
includes savings related to wage and productivity losses, medical costs, administrative expenses, and other costs
associated with accidents.


Technological Feasibility


Since the proposed requirements can be met using existing equipment and methods, the proposed new requirements are
considered to be technologically feasible.


Costs


The estimated costs associated with the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards amount
to less than $4.7 million for the first year and less than $1.8 million, annually, after the first year. These costs
primarily reflect the sum of various minor expenditures associated with modifications to existing standards. New
provisions involving compliance costs include requirements for sideboards on dockboards and ramps, required certification
of fall protection systems, requirements for the vertical application of lifting forces to containers, requirements
for high visibility vests, and requirements to provide personal flotation devices, among others.


Economic Impacts 

Compliance with the proposed new requirements of the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards has been determined
to be economically feasible and is not expected to produce any significant adverse economic impacts. The costs that
are imposed by the regulation should be a minimal burden on marine cargo handling establishments. The total estimated
first-year costs of compliance represent less than 0.06 percent of revenues associated with marine cargo handling
activities and less than 1.19 percent of profits. Total annualized costs for subsequent years represent less than
0.03 percent of revenues and 0.46 percent of profits.


Regulatory Flexibility Analysis


Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act, OSHA has made an assessment of the impact of the revised standards and
has concluded that it would not have a significant impact upon a substantial number of small entities. The estimated
compliance costs do not involve large capital expenditures, and there is no significant differential effect on small
firms relative to that on large firms.


B. Industry Profile


Introduction


This section provides an overview of affected establishments, classifications of affected vessels, population
at risk, wages of affected workers, gang sizes and cargo handling rates, operating revenues and shipping costs.


Overview of Stevedoring and Marine Terminals


Marine terminals are designated areas of ports which include wharves, bulkheads, quays, piers, docks and other berthing
locations. Adjacent storage or contiguous areas associated with the primary movements of cargo or materials from
vessel to shore or shore to vessel, and structures devoted to receiving, handling, holding, consolidating, loading
or delivering waterborne shipments are considered part of the marine terminal. Marine terminals are the facilities
owned or leased by stevedores or marine terminal operators (MTOs). MTOs and stevedores provide most of the portside
services that shipping lines require. They provide the equipment and machinery for conducting cargo handling at
multi-use terminal facilities, in addition to specialized terminals designed to handle specific types of cargo
[2].
Stevedores are persons or firms contracting with a ship owner or agent for the purpose of loading or unloading ships
or barges in ports. Stevedores are direct employers of longshore labor and contractors to ship owners. Basically,
they are middlemen between the entity requiring the service and the longshore workers who perform the physical labor.
The stevedore's role is to provide the cargo handling expertise and the equipment required to load or unload all types
of cargo safely and efficiently.
The stevedore may also be the MTO. The functional roles and activities of stevedores and MTOs vary throughout the United
States and often cannot be distinguished. The stevedore contractor and the MTO may be distinctly different entities,
the same entity, or corporately related. In some cases, public entities or port authorities may be the MTOs. These
entities may also act as stevedores or lease the terminals to private operators [2].


Workplaces Affected


Compliance with the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards will affect two areas where
marine cargo handling operations occur. Activities that occur off the dock (work aboard vessels) are covered under
OSHA's Longshoring standard (29 CFR part 1918) and those which occur on the dock fall under the Marine Terminals standard
(29 CFR part 1917). The Longshoring standard covers establishments classified under SIC 4491 (marine cargo handling),
as well as various establishments in manufacturing; transportation; communications; electric, gas and sanitary
services; and wholesale trade.
Data on the exact number of stevedoring companies currently operating in the United States are not available. For
the purposes of this analysis, the number of marine terminals estimated by the Maritime Administration (MARAD) was
used as the estimate of the total number of firms affected by the Longshoring standard. According to MARAD, there are
a total of 3,700 marine terminals in the United States [4]. Establishments engaged primarily in marine cargo handling
are classified under Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) 4491, Marine Cargo Handling. The Bureau of the Census
estimated that 746 establishments are classified under SIC 4491 [7]. To identify other affected industry sectors,
Kearney/Centaur screened OSHA inspection data for non-SIC 4491 sectors where 29 CFR part 1918 citations were issued.
Non-SIC 4491 establishments primarily engage in activities other than longshoring, although longshore work is
a small part of their overall operation. For example, manufacturing establishments which load their products directly
onto barges are covered by the OSHA's Longshoring standard, though these operations represent only a very small part
of their total activity. Kearney/Centaur estimated the distribution of the remaining establishments among affected
industry sectors according to the distribution of non-SIC 4491 29 CFR part 1918 citations issued in other sectors.
The estimated number of affected establishments is shown in Table B-1 by industry and in Table B-2 by region. Although
only 20 percent of establishments affected by the longshoring standard are in SIC 4491, the majority of affected workers,
as discussed below, are accounted for in SIC 4491.



<TABLE>


Table B1_Number of Affected Establishments, by Industry
1Industry
1Longshoring 29 CFR part 1918 
1Marine Terminals 29 CFR part 1917


SIC 4491--Marine Cargo Handling
746
746Manufacturing 
1660
N/ATransportation, Communications, and Electric, Gas and Sanitary Services 
662
662Wholesale Trade
273
161Other SICs1 
359
359


TOTAL
3,700
1,928 
Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].




1Other SICs include SIC 13 (Oil and Gas Extraction), SIC 15 (Building Construction), and sectors under SIC 44 (Water
Transportation) other than SIC 4491.
</TABLE>



<TABLE>


Table B2_Number of Affected Establishments, by Region
1Industry
1Longshoring 29 CFR part 1918 
1Marine Terminals 29 CFR part 1917



Atlantic
586
305 
Gulf/Mississippi
2,164
1,128
Great Lakes
301
157
Pacific
649
338



TOTAL
3,700
1,928

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>




Of the industry sectors covered by the Longshoring standard, most also fall under the scope of the Marine Terminals
standard, with the exception of manufacturing establishments and some wholesale trade establishments. Approximately
1,928 of the 3,700 marine terminals covered by the Longshoring standard are estimated to fall under the scope of the
Marine Terminals standard [1].
The stevedore/MTO typically hires longshore workers, usually on a daily basis, from a hiring hall or labor pool of
union or nonunion members. Labor force size varies directly with the amount of work contracted to be performed. This
method of hiring creates difficulty in determining the size of the affected establishments. No data were available
on the number of small stevedoring firms. To estimate the number of small firms, the percent of establishments in SIC
4491 classified by the Bureau of the Census as employing fewer than 20 workers, is used. Fifty-six percent of affected
establishments are estimated to be small establishments [7].


Types of Vessels


This discussion describes the affected vessels calling at U.S. marine terminals. The proposed rule will be applicable
to five broad vessel categories. Four of these categories are self-propelled vessels: bulk carriers, freighters,
combination passenger/cargo ships, and cruise ships. The fifth category consists of non-self-propelled dry cargo
barges. Descriptions of these vessel categories, as well as important subcategories, are presented in Tables B-3
and B-4. Tankers and tanker barges are excluded since these vessels are primarily under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
Coast Guard.




<TABLE>


Table B3_Categories of Self-Propelled Vessels


1
1


1


Bulk Carriers
s Ships designed to carry dry bulk cargo such as ore, wood chips, coal, and grain. They are also used to carry heavy general
cargo items such as logs or steel.
s
Freighters
0
s,s


General Cargo Carriers 
Includes refrigerated and unrefrigerated breakbulk carriers as well as car carriers, cattle carriers, pallet carriers,
and timber carriers. Breakbulk cargo consists of heterogenous items of general cargo, packaged and moved as single
parcels or assembled together on pallet boards and wire rope slings. These packages are loaded and unloaded using
ship's gear or wharf cranes. Containers are also carried on general cargo carriers.
s,s
Full Containerships 
Ships equipped with permanent below-deck container cells with little or no space for other types of cargo.
s,s
Partial Containerships 
Multi-purpose ships where one or more, but not all, compartments are fitted with permanent container cells. The remaining
compartments are used for other types of cargo. Partial containerships include container/car carriers, container/rail
car carriers, and container/roll-on/roll-off ships.
s,s

Roll-On/Roll-Off (RO-RO) Ships 
Ships which are specially designed to carry wheeled containers or container/trailer combinations, automobiles,
and other vehicles which are loaded and unloaded using the roll-on/roll-off method. Containers are often carried
on the upper deck of RO-RO ships.
s,s

Barge Carriers 
Ships designed to carry either barges or some variable number of barges and containers simultaneously. Currently
this class includes two types of vessels, the LASH (lighter aboard ship) and the SEABEE. They differ in that barges
are loaded onto LASH ships by crane and onto SEABEE ships by a submersible elevator at the stern of the vessel.
s,s

1

Combination Passenger/Cargo Ships
s


Cargo ships with a capacity for 13 or more passengers.
s


Cruise Ships/Passenger Ships
s


Ships functioning primarily to transport passengers, usually for purposes of recreation and tourism. Does not include
passenger ferries.
0 

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>



<TABLE>


Table B4_Non-Self-Propelled Vessels


1
1


1
Dry Cargo Barges
s
Large mostly double hulled cargo holds lacking an internal means of propulsion. Virtually all barges used on the inland
river system are 195 feet long by 35 feet wide and have loaded drafts of up to nine feet. Barges can carry virtually any
dry cargo and have and average capacity of 1,500 tons or about 52,500 bushels. Also classified as barges are scows and
ocean-going barges. These barges tend to be much larger and have a higher freeboard than barges used on the inland river
system. 


Barges are typically lashed together in groups referred to as tows. The standard tow on most navigable rivers is three
barges wide by five barges long for a total of 15 barges. Tow sizes, however, vary by waterway with tows as large as 45
barges on the lower Mississippi and as small as two barges on the intracoastal waterway. Tows are usually propelled
by a towboat pushing them ahead, though occasionally they are moved by a towboat pulling them on a hawser.
s
0
Open Hopper 
Barges used primarily for dry bulk cargo, such as sand, gravel,and coal, which are not suseptible to weather damage.
s,s
Covered Hopper 
Barges used for grain and other commodities that need to be protected from the weather.
s,s
Scows and Ocean-Going Barges 
Barges which generally carry most of their cargo on deck.
s,s
Deck Barges
Barges used for transporting vehicles and heavy equipment.
s,s
Container Barges
Barges used to transport standardized container cargo. 
Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>






Self-Propelled Vessels


Table B5 shows the number of self-propelled vessels of 1,000 gross tons (GTs) and over in the world fleet, by
type of vessel. Of the 692 U.S. flag vessels, approximately two-thirds are privately owned and the remaining one-third
are Government owned. Only 11 of the 225 Government owned vessels were active as of mid1992 and were being used
by several Government agencies, state maritime academies, or private steamship companies under various forms of
agreement with the Maritime Administration. All U.S. flag vessels are owned either by the Government or U.S. firms.
However, U.S. firms also own a substantial number of merchant vessels that are registered under foreign flags. As
shown in Table B5, 313 of the 23,549 foreign flag vessels are owned by U.S. parent companies. Although no data
were available on the total number of self-propelled vessels in the world fleet of under 1,000 Gts, data were available
on the number of vessels calling at U.S. ports. According to Bureau of the Census data [5], approximately 1,980 U.S.
flag and 9,593 foreign flag self-propelled vessels called at U.S. ports in 1992.





<TABLE>



Table B5_Self-Propelled Vessels of 1,000 Gross Tons and Over in the World Fleet, 1992 
1Vessel Type
1U.S. Flag Vessels

2Private 
2Government 
2Total

1Total Number of Foreign Flag Vessels 

1Foreign Flag Vessels Owned by U.S. Companies

1World Fleet
 

Bulk Carriers
92
1
93
5,449
47
5,542
Tankers
203
25
228
5,316
208
5,544
Total Freighters
167
192
359
12,222
55
12,581


Break Bulk Carriers
26
120
146
9,977
29
10,123
Containerships
83
9
92
1,198
15
1,290
Partial Containerships
17
35
52
110
0
162
Roll-On/Roll-Off
29
21
50
916
7
966
Barge Carriers
12
7
19
21
4
40


Combination Passenger/Cargo
3
7
10
337
3
347
Cruise Ships/Passenger Ships
2
0
2
225
N/A
227



TOTAL
467
225
692
23,549
313
24,241

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>




Non-Self-Propelled Vessels


The total number of non-self-propelled vessels is shown in Table B6. Of the 31,017 non-self propelled vessels,
87 percent are dry cargo barges, 13 percent are tanker barges, and less than 1 percent are railroad car floats. Nearly
86 percent of all non-self-propelled vessels in the United States operate on the domestic river and intracoastal
waterway system and carry nearly all of the waterborne cargo transported on the inland waterways. Thirteen percent
of the non-self-propelled vessels (4,158 vessels) in the United States operate on the Atlantic, Gulf and Pacific
coasts. The remaining 1 percent of non-self-propelled vessels operate in the Great Lakes.



<TABLE>


Table B6_Non-Self-Propelled Vessels in the U.S. (as of December 31, 1990)

1Vessel Type

1Atlantic, Gulf and Pacific Coasts

1Inland Waterways1 

1Great Lakes 

1Total



Dry Cargo Barges
3,500
23,320
271
27,091 
Tanker Barges
652
3,231
30
3,913
Railroad Car Floats
6
2
5
13



TOTAL
4,158
26,553
306
31,017

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].




1Includes Mississippi River System, the Gulf and Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway and the Columbia/Snake River System.
</TABLE>




Containers and Container-Carrying Vessels


Over recent years, there has been an increase in the volume of containerized cargo handled. Containers are large,
standard size metal boxes, equipped with corner castings, into which cargo is packed for shipment. Containers are
designed to be moved with common handling equipment enabling economical, high-speed intermodal transfers in large
units between ships, railcars, truck chassis, and barges, using a minimum of labor. The container, therefore, serves
as the transfer unit rather than the cargo contained therein. Most containers in the U.S. inventory are either 20-foot
(6.1 m) containers (56 percent) or 40-foot containers (12.2 m) (42 percent).
Containerships are vessels equipped with permanent container cells. They have little or no space for other types
of cargo. Partial containerships are multi-purpose ships where one or more, but not all, compartments are fitted
with permanent container cells. The remaining compartments are used for other types of cargo. Several other types
of vessels also carry containers.
Table B-7 presents the number of liner service container-carrying vessels calling at U.S. ports by type of vessel,
flag of vessel (U.S. or foreign), and container capacity.




<TABLE>



Table B7_Number and Container Capacity of Liner Service Container Carrying Vessels Calling at U.S. Ports,
1992

1Vessel Type

1Number of Vessels
2U.S.
2Foreign Flag
2Total

1Container Capacity in TEUs1
2U.S.
2Foreign Flag
2Total
 



Bulk/Containership
0
106
106
 0
130,279
130,279
Containership
83
510
593
 183,358
1,126,341
1,309,699
RO-RO/Containership
7
36
43
 10,031
51,584
61,615
Partial Containership
17
135
152
 7,422
58,961
66,383
Barge Carrier
11
0
11
 6,940
0
6,940
Other


Break Bulk
N/A
N/A
11
 N/A
N/A
3,161
RO/RO2
29
75
104
28,509
73,748
102,257



TOTAL
147
862
1,0203
236,260
1,440,913
1,680,3344


Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].



1TEU - Twenty-foot Equivalent Unit: equal to the capacity of a 20x8x8 foot container. 

2Includes 13 RO-RO tug/barge combinations. 

3Number of U.S. and foreign flag vessels does not add to the total shown since a breakdown of the number of break bulk
carriers between U.S. and foreign flag fleets was not available. 

4The container capacity of U.S. and foreign flag vessels does not add to the total shown since a breakdown of the container
capacity of break bulk carriers between U.S. and foreign flag fleets was not available.
</TABLE>




Vessels in liner service operate on fixed routes to advertised ports on published schedules. As shown in the table,
1,020 container-carrying liner service vessels with a total container capacity of approximately 1.7 million TEUs
(twenty-foot equivalent units) called at U.S. ports in 1992. Virtually all containerships, partial containerships,
bulk/containerships, RO RO/containerships and barge carriers are in liner service, and essentially, the entire
container capacity of these types of vessels are accounted for in liner services. Break bulk freighters and RO-RO
ships also carry containers. Although RO-RO ships are generally in liner service, break bulk carriers are not. Data
on the number and container capacity of non-liner service break bulk carriers were unavailable. However, based on
the proportion of container traffic accounted for by break bulk freighters, the estimated number of voyages made
annually to the United States by these vessels, and their average container capacity, Kearney/Centaur estimated
that 544 non-liner service break bulk freighters with a container capacity of 78,336 containers called at U.S. ports
in 1992.
Combining the number of liner service and non-liner service container-carrying vessels, OSHA therefore estimates
that a total of 1,564 container-carrying vessels, with an overall container capacity of 1.76 million TEUs, call annually
at U.S. ports [1].


Population at Risk


Based on employment data from the Bureau of the Census and OSHA inspection data, approximately 93,427 workers are
estimated to be affected by the Longshoring standard, over 58 percent of which are employed in SIC 4491. Kearney/Centaur
estimated that about 70,140 of these workers would also be covered by the Marine Terminals standard, 78 percent of
which are in SIC 4491. Estimates of full-time equivalent workers, as well as the population at risk are shown in Table
B-8, by industry and in Table B-9, by region.




<TABLE>


Table B8_Number of Full-Time Equivalent Workers and Population at Risk, by Industry

1Industry

1Number of FTE Workers Covered by 29 CFR part 19181

1Population at Risk Covered by 29 CFR part 1918

1Number of FTE Workers Covered by 29 CFR part 19171

1Population at Risk Covered by 29 CFR part 1917




SIC 4491--Marine Cargo Handling

54,617
54,617
54,617
54,617
Manufacturing
18,700
21,811
N/A
N/A
Transportation, Communications, and Electric, Gas and Sanitary Services
7,467
8,705
7,467
8,705 
Wholesale Trade
3,100
3,582
1,823
2,106 
Other SICs2
4,067
4,712
4,067
4,712



TOTAL
87,951
93,427
67,974
70,140


Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].



1The number of full-time equivalent (FTE) workers is based on a 1,436 hour which is the average number of hours worked
per year by longshore workers in SIC 4491. 
2Other SICs include SIC 13 (Oil and Gas Extraction), SIC 15 (Building Construction), and other sectors under SIC 44
(Water Transportation) other than SIC 4491.
</TABLE>




<TABLE>


Table B9_Number of Full-Time Equivalent Workers and Population at Risk, by Region

1Industry

1Number of FTE Workers Covered by 29 CFR part 19181

1Population at Risk Covered by 29 CFR part 1918

1Number of FTE Workers Covered by 29 CFR part 19171

1Population at Risk Covered by 29 CFR part 1917




Atlantic
13,923
14,789
10,761
11,103 
Gulf/Mississippi
51,451
54,655
39,765
41,032 
Great Lakes
7,150
7,596
5,526
5,703 
Pacific
15,426
16,387
11,922
12,302

 

TOTAL
87,950
93,427
67,974
70,140

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].




1The number of full-time equivalent (FTE) workers is based on a 1,436 hour which is the average number of hours worked
per year by longshore workers in SIC 4491.
</TABLE>




Gang Sizes and Cargo Handling Rates


Table B-10 summarizes the average stevedoring crew sizes by type of operation. These estimates include both off-the-dock
and dockside workers directly involved in the loading or unloading of cargo. Average cargo handling rates are also
presented. Based on cargo handling rates, and the types and total tonnages of cargo handled, Kearney/Centaur estimated
that approximately 54 million person-hours of exposure occur during longshoring loading and unloading activities,
annually.



<TABLE>



Table B10_Summary of Average Stevedoring Gang Size and Cargo Handling Rates, by Type of Loading and Unloading
Operation

1Operation 

1Number of Workers

2Off-the-Dock 
2On-the-Dock 
2On-Site

1Average Cargo Handling Rate in Short Tons per:

2Gang Hour

2Off-the-Dock Employee Work-hour 

2Dockside Employee Work-hour



Break Bulk
9
6
15
80.0
8.9
13.3 
Container
8
9
17
232.9
29.1
25.9 
Bulk Carrier/Conveyor Loading
7
2
9
1,250.0
178.6
625.0 Bulk Carrier/Clam Shell Unloading
2
3
5
250.0
125.0
83.3 RO-RO
25
4
29
90.0
3.6
22.5 
Barge/Break Bulk
4
5
9
112.5
28.1
22.5 
Barge/Conveyor Loading
2
3
5
168.8
84.4
56.3 Barge/Bulk-Clam Shell Unloading
1
2
3
150.0
150.0
75.0 
Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>




Wages


Wages of longshore workers vary among regions and ports.
Two primary factors account for this variation. First, local union contractual agreements vary in wage rates, holidays,
and other rules or benefits which affect the wages and earnings of longshore workers. Second, the number of hours worked
per year varies by port and region, resulting in variations in overtime wage payments. The average national wage rate
of longshore workers, including overtime and benefits, is estimated to be $40.30 per hour. The average supervisor
wage rate, including overtime and benefits, is estimated at $50.78 [1].


Operating Revenues and Shipping Costs


Statistics on shipping costs were estimated based on vessel operating revenue data for domestic water carriers compiled
by The U.S. Department of Transportation. Table B-11 presents operating revenues and tonnage data, by region, for
1990.
As shown, operating revenues were nearly $3.0 billion for Coastal regions, $2.9 billion for Inland waterways, and
$0.6 billion for the Great Lakes region. The operating revenues per ton of freight hauled were $10.27, $4.57 and $5.33,
respectively.
The cost for shipping a 40-foot (12.0 m) container with FAK (freight-of-all-kinds) worth $100,000 and weighing 10
long tons from New York to Rotterdam was estimated to range from $277.40 to $300.50 per long ton. The cost for the same
shipment from Los Angeles to Tokyo was estimated to range from $243.60 to $288.30 per long ton [1].



<TABLE>


Table B11_Operating Revenues, Ton-Miles, Tons, and Average Haul of Freight Carries, 1990

1Region

1Operating Revenues ($ millions)

1Ton-Miles (millions)

1Operating Revenues per Ton-Mile

1Tons of Freight Hauled (millions)

1Average Haul per (miles/ton)

1Operating Revenues per Ton of Freight Hauled




Coastal
$3,008
470,000
$0.006
293
1,604
$10.27
Inland
2,865
283,000
0.010
627
451
4.57
Great Lakes
576
57,000
0.010
108
528
5.33
All Regions
$6,449
810,000
$0.008
1,028
788
$6.27

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 2].

</TABLE>



C. Technological Feasibility and Costs of Compliance


Technological Feasibility


All of the requirements of the proposed standard can be met using currently available equipment, facilities, tests,
inspections, supplies, and work practices. OSHA's analysis of the technological requirements of each provision
indicates that none of the proposed provisions will create any problem of supply or availability of equipment, facilities,
or personnel.
Although the proposed standard will require the expenditure of resources to fully comply, there are no technological
constraints associated with full compliance with the proposed regulation.


Costs of Compliance


This section presents preliminary estimates of costs that will be incurred by firms to come into compliance with the
proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards. The costs of the proposed revisions to the
two standards are shown in Table C1.




<TABLE>


Table C1_Summary of Total Compliance Costs (1993 Dollars)
1Rule
1Total First-Year Costs
1Total Annualized Costs*




29 CFR part 1918: Longshoring
$4,088,445
 $1,755,773 
29 CFR part 1917: Marine Terminals
535,585
20,099
s,s,s
TOTAL
 $4,624,029
$1,775,872

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis. 



* Annualized cost is the sum of annualized capital costs and recurring annual costs.
</TABLE>




Total first-year costs are estimated to amount to less than $4.7 million. After the first year, affected establishments
will incur costs of approximately $1.8 million, annually. These costs were estimated using a baseline of full compliance
with existing rules and estimates of current practice for those cost elements not required under previous standards
<FOOTCITE>2</FOOTCITE>
. OSHA welcomes comments on the preliminary costs and assumptions presented in this analysis.


<FOOTNOTE>
<FOOTNAME>
2

</FOOTNAME>
This is not intended to suggest that all establishments are fully complying with existing regulations. However,
the costs presented in this analysis reflect only those costs which are attributable to to proposed revisions to existing
regulations.


</FOOTNOTE>

Methodology



A side-by-side comparison of the proposed and existing rules was conducted to identify revisions to the existing
rules. In addition, a profile of current industry practices was developed to enable estimates of incremental compliance
costs to be made.
The data used in this preliminary analysis of compliance costs were obtained from three studies conducted in 1986,
1989 and in 1994 by OSHA's contractor, Kearney/Centaur. In 1986 and 1989, analyses were performed on proposed requirements
identified as changes to existing standards. These studies were conducted through field visits and telephone surveys
of U.S. ports. The 1994 study was conducted to update information collected in previous studies and to collect information
on the impact of proposed revisions made recently to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards. Efforts included
interviews with industry officials to gather information on key cost issues, and calls to equipment manufacturers,
suppliers, and professional service providers.
Three general types of costs were identified: first-year costs, capital costs, and recurring annual costs. First-year
costs are training and workplace analysis costs that which are expected to be incurred in the first year after promulgation
of a final rule. Capital costs are costs for equipment with a working life of more than one year. Recurring annual costs
are costs that will be incurred each year after promulgation of a final rule.
The majority of compliance costs are expected to be borne directly by stevedoring companies, although vessel operators
may incur some short-term costs.



Revisions to 29 CFR part 1918: Longshoring



This section presents preliminary cost estimates attributable to proposed revisions to OSHA's Longshoring standard.
Provisions for which costs are not specifically addressed are not expected to have any incremental costs beyond those
estimated for workplace analysis and general training.






General First-Year Costs







Proposed revisions to the existing Longshoring standard will result in general costs for workplace analysis and
training. Total first-year costs for these activities are estimated at $1,607,563, and will most likely be borne
by stevedoring firms.


Workplace Analysis


Workplace analysis involves evaluating an establishment to determine what needs to be done to achieve compliance
with the proposed rule. Preliminary costs for this activity are estimated using the hourly wage rate of a safety consultant
or safety engineer. The average hourly fee for a safety consultant is estimated to be $87.50, based on a range of $50
to $125 per hour [1]. The average time per establishment to have a safety consultant conduct such an analysis is estimated
to be about an hour and a half [1]. This yields an average cost per facility of $131.25. The total first-year workplace
analysis cost across all 3,700 affected establishments is estimated to be $485,625. This cost will most likely be
borne by stevedoring firms.


Training


First-year costs will be necessary to train supervisors on the new requirements of the proposed rule. No recurring
annual training costs are estimated since interviews with industry officials indicated that longshore supervisors
receive regular safety training, and training in new requirements will replace safety training related to the existing
rule. Kearney/Centaur field visits, and telephone interviews with longshore safety experts and industry officials
revealed that supervisors will assure implementation of proposed requirements. No additional training time will
be required for longshore workers. The proposed rule will result in three types of training: (1) general training
in new requirements; (2) additional safety training for RO-RO and containerized operations; and (3) accident prevention
proficiency training for supervisors overseeing five or more workers. The costs of additional training for container
and RO-RO operations, and accident prevention proficiency training will be discussed under the appropriate subparts.
OSHA assumes that first-year supplementary general training will be required to familiarize supervisors with the
new requirements of the proposed rule. The number of supervisors that will need general training is estimated using
a 10 to 1 employee to supervisor ratio. As discussed in the Industry Profile, approximately 93,427 workers are estimated
to be at risk. Hence, 9,343 supervisors are estimated to require general training. Kearney/Centaur estimated that
less than one hour of training, in addition to regular safety training, will be necessary to train each supervisor.
Using an average supervisor wage rate of $50.78, the total first-year cost of supervisor time to receive general training
is estimated at $474,438.
In addition to the cost of supervisor training time, the cost to provide safety instruction is estimated. The fee for
an instructor is estimated to be about $175 per hour of training [1]. The total cost for general safety instruction
is estimated at $647,500.





Subpart C: Means of Access


Most of the proposed revisions to this subpart are not expected to impose additional costs on affected establishments.
For example, proposed requirements for portable ladders are already addressed in the existing Marine Terminals
standard. Since portable ladders used on the vessel are typically the same ladders used on the dock, no incremental
costs are expected to be incurred. No additional costs are expected to result from requiring 6 inches (15.2 cm) or more
of clearance in the back of ladder rungs. This requirement can be met using portable ladders, which are currently available
on-site [1].
The proposed requirement for 6 inch (15.2 cm) sideboards on dockboards and ramps is expected to impose additional
costs on stevedoring firms. Based on Kearney/Centaur interviews with regional industry representatives, approximately
1,070 ramps will need to be retrofitted at a unit cost of $1,000 [1]. The incremental capital cost for this provision
is estimated at $1,070,000.



Subpart D: Working Surfaces



In the existing rule, 29 CFR 1918.32(b) requires fall protection for workers exposed to fall hazards at the edge of
a hatch section or stowed cargo over 8 feet (2.4 m) high. Although changes to the regulatory text are being proposed
for clarification purposes, the proposed language does not impose additional responsibilities upon employers.
Hence, no incremental costs are attributed to this provision. This is consistent with court interpretations, as
found by the Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission in its decision of October 24, 1979, OSHRC Docket No.
15242 concerning 1918.32(b) citation of Seattle Crescent Container Service, and the decision of the U.S. Court of
Appeals, Ninth Circuit in Long Beach Container Terminal Inc. v. OSHRC and Brock, February 23, 1987.
Proposed revisions to Subpart D also include requirements for ``walking sticks'' (floating walking and working
surfaces) for employees working logs out of the water. However, local rules in ports affected by this requirement
currently include these requirements, and affected establishments are already in compliance [1].



Subpart E: Opening and Closing Hatches



The proposed rule includes several revisions to this subpart. Proposed revisions impose more restrictions on working
spaces along coamings, more flexibility on covering hatches with tarpaulins, and more flexibility on securing hatch
covers. The proposed revisions would also require that all unsecured materials be removed before moving hatch covers.
Such changes in work practices are not expected to result in incremental costs other than first-year costs for general
training discussed earlier in this chapter [1].



Subpart F: Ship's Cargo Handling Gear



Proposed revisions to this subpart address changes in work practices. Costs attributed to changes in work practices
are accounted for in the general first-year cost estimates. 


Subpart G: Cargo Handling Gear and Equipment Other Than Ship's Gear



This subpart covers all employer-provided gear and equipment used in longshoring operations aboard vessels. The
majority of the gear used aboard vessels is also used on the dock. To the extent that proposed revisions to the Longshoring
standard covering this gear are addressed by the existing Marine Terminals standard, no incremental costs are estimated.
The proposed rule would require that all special stevedoring gear purchased or fabricated 90 days or more after publication
of a final rule, and having a safe working load of 5 short tons or over, be certified by an OSHA accredited agency in accordance
with 29 CFR part 1919. Most gear covered under this subpart is either also used on the dock and therefore, already required
to be certified under 29 CFR 1917.50, or already certified prior to purchase by the manufacturer. Although situations
do arise in which special gear is manufactured and used only on the vessel, such occurrences are rare and the overall
cost to affected establishments is expected to be minimal.
Two requirements, however, are expected to impose costs on affected establishments. The proposed requirements
for the quadrennial testing of special stevedoring gear and the lockout/tagout of powered conveyors are expected
to generate compliance costs.
OSHA assumes that only the 746 establishments classified under SIC 4491 will be affected by the proposed requirement
for quadrennial testing of special gear and equipment. Testing is estimated to take an average of five hours per affected
establishment. Assuming that a designated person with an average wage rate of $40.30 will do the testing, the average
cost per establishment is estimated to be $201.50 every four years, or $50.38 annually. The total annual cost for affected
establishments to comply with this provision is estimated at $37,583 [1].
Compliance costs are also expected to result from the proposed revision requiring the lockout/tagout of powered
conveyors. Those conveyors with master shut-off switches used only aboard vessels and not on the dock will be affected.
Kearney/Centaur estimated that existing switches on a total of 60 powered conveyors would need to be replaced by general
duty 240 volt/100 amp, 3 pole, fused, lockable safety switches. The unit cost for switch replacement, including installation
charges, is estimated to be $315 each ($130 for materials cost, $112 direct labor, $73 overhead and other charges)
[1]. OSHA estimates that the total capital cost associated with the lockout/tagout of powered conveyors is $18,900.
This cost will most likely be borne by stevedoring firms.



Subpart H: Handling Cargo



Nine proposed revisions to the existing rule were identified as substantive changes to the existing rule.


Vertical Lifting of Containers 

The proposed rule requires that, when containers are being hoisted by the top fittings, lifting forces must be applied
vertically from at least four such fittings. Since container gantry cranes provide vertical lifts, only non-container
cranes will be affected. Stevedores using non-container cranes currently use either box spreaders, or wires and
hooks to lift containers. The use of box spreaders would provide vertical lifts. Approximately 423 non-container
gantry cranes are used to lift containers. However, box spreaders would only need to be purchased for 8 to 20 percent
of these cranes [1]. Approximately one 20 foot (6.1 m) box spreader and one 40 foot (12.2 m) box spreader will need to
be purchased for 59 cranes (14 percent of non-container cranes). Kearney/Centaur estimated, based on an interview
with a box spreader manufacturer, that a 20-foot (6.1 m) box spreader costs about $8,800 and a 40-foot (12.2 m) box spreader
costs about $9,800. The total cost per crane to purchase one 20-foot (6.1 m) box spreader and one 40-foot (12.2 m) box
spreader is, therefore, estimated at $18,600 ($8,800 + $9,800). Thus, the total capital cost that will be incurred
by stevedoring companies to comply with this provision is estimated at $1,101,492 [1].


Prohibiting Work On Top of Containers to the Extent Feasible


The proposed rule would eliminate work on top of container stacks, to the extent feasible, through the use of engineering
controls. Compliance with this proposed requirement is considered feasible, for most operations, when container
gantry cranes are used to move containers. To secure stacked containers, twistlocks are placed in the corner castings
of each container. When manual twistlocks are used, workers are placed, usually by crane, on top of each container
to place or remove (cone or decone) twistlocks. The use of semi-automatic twistlocks (SATLs) and above-deck cell
guides would eliminate the need for workers to go atop containers for the purpose of coning or deconing. These engineering
controls would greatly reduce the time spent on top of containers and thus, reduce the fall hazards. The use of such
controls would also eliminate the need to use personal protective equipment (PPE) for the purposes of coning and deconing.
Kearney/Centaur conducted a time-motion study comparing the use of SATLs with the use of fall protection using tie-off.
Through field visits to eight ports, Kearney/Centaur observed various container operations on different types
of vessels. Activities that directly affect the total time to complete a project (activities on the critical path)
were identified, and the average time to complete each of these activities was estimated. Operations that delay the
crane are activities on the critical path. The study demonstrated that the use of SATLs would result in significant
decreases in crane delay time, since workers would no longer need to be placed on each container to cone or decone. This
finding is consistent with other studies conducted on the use of SATLs [1, Appendix E]. The unit cost of a SATL is about
$20 more than the cost of a conventional twistlock. Thus, the incremental cost per SATL is estimated to be $20 [1]. An
estimated 177 U.S.-owned vessels and 350 foreign-owned vessels will need to purchase SATLs. The total annualized
investment cost to purchase SATLs is estimated at about $2 million for U.S. vessel operators and $4 million for foreign
operators.
The use of SATLs is expected to result in cost savings to vessel operators, as well as to stevedores, in terms of productivity
increases. The total dollar value of the cost savings depends on the time savings per vessel, the vessel configuration,
the number of containers carried, the number of container cranes used to load or unload the vessel, and the number of
trips made to U.S. ports. In each case, as analyzed in Kearney/Centaur's study, cost savings exceed the annualized
cost of purchasing SATLs. Even under the worst case scenario, annual productivity increases more than offset the
annualized investment cost of the SATLs.
The use of SATLs also results in reduced damage to containers. Conventional twistlocks are often thrown or dropped
onto the tops of containers, often damaging them. Since SATLs are placed and removed on the dock, such damage would
be avoided.
Furthermore, interviews with industry officials revealed that shipping lines are already rapidly converting to
the use of SATLs. Approximately 47 to 55 percent of all containerships calling at U.S. ports are currently using SATLs.
An estimated 22 to 26 percent of U.S. flag containerships and 74 to 78 percent of foreign flag containerships currently
use SATLs. In addition, major shipping lines are currently in the process of fully converting to the use of SATLs [1].
In conclusion, based on the Kearney/Centaur study, the annual productivity gains realized as a result of using of
SATLs are expected to exceed the annualized investment cost to purchase SATLs. OSHA requests additional data and
comments on this issue.


Certification of Fall Protection Systems


The certification of fall protection systems used in container operations is also expected to result in compliance
costs. The proposed rule would require that all fall protection systems be certified by a registered professional
engineer as being capable of sustaining at least twice the potential impact of an employee's fall. Based on Kearney/Centaur
interviews with industry officials, compliance with this provision would require, on average, one annual certification
per establishment involved in container operations. Each certification is expected to take about two hours. Approximately
277 establishments are estimated to be involved in container operations [1]. The services of a registered professional
engineer to conduct the required testing and provide certification are estimated to cost about $50 per hour, or $100
per establishment, annually. In addition, there may be a $200 documentation fee and a 15 percent administrative surcharge.
This results in an average cost of $345 per establishment, and a total annual recurring cost of $95,565 for stevedoring
firms.


Secondary Attachments for Safety Cages


The proposed standard requires the use of secondary attachments for safety cages attached to container gantry cranes
which are used to hoist employees. Few safety cages have secondary means of attachment. The installation of padeyes
on cages to allow them to be attached to the spreader by chains and hooks would satisfy this requirement. Approximately
75 to 100 safety cages are currently in use, 90 percent of which lack secondary means of attachment [1]. Applying this
percentage to 88 safety cages (the midpoint of the estimated range of safety cages in use) yields an estimate of 79 cages
that will need to be retrofitted. The installation of padeyes is estimated to cost $200 per safety cage. No costs are
attributed to the purchase of hooks and chains since these items are readily available from existing inventories
of equipment. The total capital cost to comply with this provision is estimated at $15,840. This cost would is likely
to be borne by stevedoring companies [1].


Marking of Load Capacities on RO-RO Ramps


The proposed provision requiring that RO-RO ramps be marked with their load capacities is expected to impose first-year
costs primarily on vessel operators. Field visits and interviews with industry representatives indicated that
virtually none of the vessels have load capacities marked on their ramps. The Bureau of the Census reported that 147
RO-RO vessels called at U.S. ports in 1992. Approximately 120 of these are RO-RO car carriers, and 27 are heavy capacity
RO-RO vessels. On average, car carriers have about four ramps each and heavy capacity RO-RO vessels have 1.5 ramps
each. Thus, an estimated 521 ramps would need to be marked. Industry officials indicated that this procedure would
require about 0.5 hour per vessel to obtain the necessary information, and 0.5 hour to mark each ramp. Thus, a total
of 334 labor hours would be required. Using a labor rate of $40.30, the total estimated first-year cost for vessel operators
to comply with this requirement is $13,460.


Separation of Vehicles and Pedestrians on RO-RO Ramps


The proposed rule also requires that pedestrians and vehicles be physically separated on RO-RO ramps. When no physical
separation is present or feasible, a signal person would be required to direct traffic, disallowing concurrent use.
Although some heavy capacity RO-RO ramps have pedestrian walkways built into them, most are relatively wide and are
often used concurrently by pedestrians and vehicles.
For car carriers, ramps are narrow and many do not have room to designate both a pedestrian walkway and a car lane. Discussions
with car carrier foremen indicated that, currently, a gang member is assigned the duty of directing traffic and coordinating
the movement of vehicles. Consequently, no incremental costs are expected to be incurred for a signal person. However,
decreases in productivity may result since vehicles, which would normally be driven onto ramps when pedestrians
are present, would have to wait until all pedestrians clear the ramp.
Kearney/Centaur indicated that productivity decreases would be in the form of additional personnel rather than
vessel delays. Based on the number of vehicles imported to and exported from the United States each year, the probability
that pedestrians and vehicles would concurrently use a ramp, and the average delay time that would result for each
incident, Kearney/Centaur estimated that this proposed requirement would result in a total annual delay time of
about 2,178.7 hours [1]. Applying an average longshore worker wage rate of $40.30 to the total time delay yields a recurring
annual cost of about $87,801.


Marking Flat Bed and Low Boy Trailers


The proposed rule requires that flat bed and low boy trailers (mafis) be marked with their load capacities. Kearney/Centaur
concluded that the 307 establishments involved in container and RO-RO operations will be affected by this requirement,
80 percent of which are already in compliance [1]. To mark all mafis would take about eight hours per establishment.
Using an average hourly wage rate of $40.30, the first-year incremental cost of this requirement is estimated at $19,795.


High Visibility Vests


The proposed rule would require that high visibility vests be used during RO-RO and container operations. Kearney/Centaur
estimated that one vest would be required, annually, for each affected worker [1]. OSHA estimates that about 75 percent
(40,963 workers) of SIC 4491 workers are involved in container or RO-RO operations. The average unit cost of a high
visibility vest is estimated to be $6.50 [1]. Therefore, the annual recurring cost for high visibility vests is estimated
at $266,260.


Additional Training in Container and RO-RO Safety


Since there are several revisions proposed for container and RO-RO operations, additional training is expected
to be needed. OSHA estimates that 75 percent of longshore workers employed in SIC 4491 (40,963 workers) engage in either
container or RO-RO operations or both. Assuming one supervisor will need to be trained for every 10 workers at risk,
4,096 supervisors will need additional training. Additional training in container and RO-RO operations is not expected
to exceed 0.5 hour [1]. Applying an hourly supervisor wage rate of $50.78 yields a first-year cost of approximately
$103,997.
A first-year cost to provide safety instruction is also estimated. An estimated 307 establishments will need instructors
for container and RO-RO safety training [1]. Using an hourly instruction fee of $175 per hour of training provided,
the estimated instruction cost is $26,863.
The total first-year cost for additional container and RO-RO safety training is estimated to be $130,860, and will
most likely be borne by stevedoring firms.



Subpart I: General Working Conditions


Illumination 

According to industry officials, most lighting situations meet the proposed requirement of 5 footcandles (54 lux)
of illumination. The existing rule requires that ``adequate'' lighting be provided at all times. OSHA assumes that
establishments not using at least 5 footcandles (54 lux) of lighting would be in violation of the existing rule. Thus,
no incremental costs are estimated for this provision.


Sanitation


The proposed standard includes specifications on the number of toilets that would need to be available to longshore
workers. Kearney/Centaur interviews with industry representatives indicated that current practice already meets
this proposed requirement, with the exception of certain situations in the Gulf region. Compliance with this requirement
can be achieved through semi-monthly rentals of portable toilets at a rental cost of $65 each. The total recurring
annual cost to comply with the proposed sanitation requirements is estimated to be $1,560 for stevedoring companies
operating in the Gulf [1].


First Aid Kits


The proposed rule would require that first aid kits be checked at least weekly and that contents be approved by a physician.
Industry officials indicated that first aid kits currently in use are stocked on the basis of recommendations by first
aid and safety professionals and are expected to already meet physicians' recommendations. Thus, kit contents are
not expected to change as a result of proposed revisions.
Incremental costs are expected to result in the form of labor time necessary to perform weekly checks of the contents
of each kit. This procedure is not expected to take more than 5 minutes per week per establishment. Applying an average
hourly wage rate of $40.30 yields an annual cost of $174.63 per establishment per year. The total recurring annual
cost for all 3,700 establishments to comply with this requirement is estimated at $646,143.


Stretchers


Incremental costs are expected to result from the proposed requirement that stretchers be equipped with four sets
of working patient restraints. Costs are estimated assuming that 25 percent of the affected workplaces would need
to retrofit their stretchers. Approximately one stretcher per establishment would need to be retrofitted at an average
cost of $400 each [1]. The total capital cost for this requirement is estimated at $370,000.


Accident Prevention Proficiency Training for Supervisors


The proposed rule would require that all supervisors overseeing more than five workers complete a course in accident
prevention. This training is currently required under the Marine Terminals standard. Kearney/Centaur field visits
indicated that approximately 75 percent of supervisors already receive accident prevention training [1]. Each
course is estimated to take two hours. At an average supervisor wage rate of $50.78 per hour, the cost for 2,336 supervisors
to receive this training is $237,244. The average fee to provide instruction is estimated to be $175 per hour of training.
Assuming that 25 percent of the affected establishments (925 establishments) would require such training, the cost
for instruction is estimated at $323,750 ($175 x 2 x 925). The total first-year cost for accident prevention proficiency
training is, therefore, estimated to be $560,994 and is expected to be borne by stevedoring companies.
In addition to first-year costs, annual recurring costs are expected to be incurred as a result of supervisor turnover.
Kearney/Centaur estimated that the turnover rate for longshore supervisors is about five percent per year. The resulting
annual cost of supervisor time is estimated at $11,883. The annual cost to provide instruction is $16,188, assuming
that five percent of establishments would need such instruction. The recurring annual cost for accident prevention
proficiency training is, therefore, estimated at $28,070.



Subpart J: Personal Protective Equipment


The proposed rule would broaden the existing scope to require that personal flotation devices be used in more situations
where workers may be at risk of falling into the water. Since the existing rule already requires the use of personal
flotation devices in the Gulf/Mississippi region, no incremental costs in addition to general training costs are
expected to be incurred by establishments in this region. To estimate the number of flotation devices that would be
needed, OSHA assumes that 50 percent of employees not working in the Gulf/Mississippi region (19,386 workers), would
need personal flotation devices. The average unit cost per life vest meeting the required specifications is estimated
at $55 [8]. Thus, the total capital cost to purchase personal flotation devices is estimated at $1,066,230.



Summary


As shown in Table C2, the total first-year cost of the proposed revisions to the Longshoring standard is estimated
at $4,088,445. After the first year, establishments will incur an estimated $1,755,773, annually.





<TABLE>


Table C-2_Preliminary Cost Estimates of Proposed Revisions to 29 CFR Part 1918 (Longshoring) (1993 Dollars)


1Source
1First-Year Costs
1Capital Costs
1Annualized Capital Costs*
1Recurring Annual Costs
1Total First-Year Costs
1Total Annualized Costs




Workplace Analysis
485,625



485,625 



General Training



lSupervisor Time
474,438



474,438 

lInstruction
 647,500



647,500



Subpart C 



l6
&rsquo;
&rsquo; sideboards: dockboards/ramps

1,070,000
174,138

174,138
174,138 



Subpart G 


l4-yr. testing of special gear



37,580
37,580
37,580 

lLockout/tagout: powered conveyors

18,900
3,076

3,076
3,076



Subpart H



lVertical lifts

1,101,492
179,263

179,263
179,263

lCertification: fall protection 



95,565
95,565
95,565

lSecondary safety cage attachments 

15,840
2,578

2,578
2,578

lMarking RO-RO ramps
13,460



13,460 

lSeparation of vehicles/pedestrians on RO-RO ramps


 
87,801
87,801
87,801

lMarking flat bed/low boy trailers 
19,795



19,795

lHigh visibility vests



266,260
266,260
266,260

lTraining

lSupervisor Time
103,997



103,997 

lInstructor
26,863



26,863




Subpart I



lSanitation



1,560
1,560
1,560

lFirst aid kits 



646,143
646,143
646,143

lStretchers 

370,000
60,216

60,216
60,216

lAccident prevention training
560,994


28,070
589,064
28,070




lSubpart J

lPersonal flotation devices

1,066,230
173,524

173,524
173,524 

s,s,s,s,s,s,s

TOTAL
$2,332,672
$3,642,462
$592,794

$1,162,979
$4,088,445
$1,755,773 


Source: U.S. Department of Labor OSHA, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 4]. 


* Annualized over 10 years using a 10% interest rate. 
</TABLE>





Revisions to 29 CFR Part 1917: Marine Terminals


Several of the proposed revisions to the Marine Terminals standard are not expected to generate any specific costs.
Some of the costs of the proposed revisions are included in the cost analysis of the proposed Longshoring standard.
For example, the first aid kits and stretchers used for workers aboard vessels are the same ones used in marine terminals.
Also, Kearney/Centaur concluded, based on interviews with industry representatives, that many of the proposed
requirements reflect current practices. For example, current industry practice prohibits riding the load and hoisting
workers by hooks. In addition, industry officials indicated that lowering the 8-hour time-weighted average exposure
limit of carbon monoxide from 50 ppm to 35 ppm would not be a problem.
Compliance with most of the proposed revisions to the Marine Terminals standard can be met through workplace analysis
and general training. Specific compliance costs are expected to be generated from the proposed requirement for seat
belts in high speed container gantry cranes.



First-Year Costs



Costs for workplace analysis and general training are based on the assumption that 1,928 establishments and 70,140
workers (see Industry Profile), would be affected by proposed revisions to the Marine Terminals standard [1]. The
total first-year cost for these activities is estimated at $515,485.


Workplace Analysis


Approximately one hour, on average, is estimated to be required for a safety consultant, familiar with the proposed
rule, to evaluate an establishment. At an average fee of $87.50 per hour, the total estimated first-year cost for workplace
analysis is $168,700 [1].


General Training


One supervisor per every 10 workers (7,014 supervisors) would receive supplementary general training in the proposed
new requirements. General training in the proposed requirements is estimated to take about 0.5 hour. Using an average
supervisor wage rate of $50.78, the total first-year cost of supervisor time for additional training is estimated
at $178,085. The cost per establishment to provide instruction, using an average fee of $175 per hour of training,
is estimated at $168,700.
Thus, the total first-year cost of general training is estimated at $346,785, and will most likely be borne by stevedoring
firms.
Seat Belts



The proposed rule requires that seat belts be placed in the operators' seats of high-speed container gantry cranes.
Kearney/Centaur estimated that 40 percent of the 411 container gantry cranes in U.S. ports are already equipped with
chest harnesses. Based on interviews, the cost to retrofit one crane is estimated at $500. The total capital cost to
retrofit 247 container cranes is estimated to be $123,500.
Summary
Proposed revisions to the Marine Terminals standard are estimated to result in first-year costs totalling $535,585
and annualized costs totalling $20,099 (Table C3).




<TABLE>


Table C-3_Preliminary Cost Estimates of Proposed Revisions to 29 CFR Part 1917 (Marine Terminals) (1993 Dollars)


1
1First-Year Cost
1Capital Cost
1Annualized Capital Cost*
1Total First-Year Cost
1Total Annualized Cost




Workplace Analysis
168,700


168,700

 
General Training 


lSupervisor Time 
178,085


178,085 
lInstructor 
168,700


168,700



Seatbelts

123,500 
20,099
20,099
20,099

s,s,s,s,s,s TOTAL
$515,485
$123,500
$20,099
$535,585
$20,099 

Source: U.S. Department of Labor OSHA, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 4]. 



* Annualized over 10 years using a 10% interest rate.
</TABLE>



D. Benefits


Introduction


The proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards are expected to reduce the numbers of injuries
and fatalities in the marine cargo handling industry. Since affected workers are involved in both off-the-dock (covered
under 29 CFR part 1918) and on-the-dock activities (covered under 29 CFR part 1917), separate analyses are presented
on accidents that occur in each area of operation.


Injuries and Fatalities


As presented in the Industry Profile, approximately 87,951 full-time equivalent (FTE) longshore workers, based
on a 1,436 hour work-year, are affected by the Longshoring standard. Approximately 67,974 of these workers are also
covered by the Marine Terminals standard. About 54,617 of affected workers are employed in SIC 4491, while the others
are employed in establishments classified under other industry sectors. A summary of injuries occurring among affected
workers in the marine cargo handling industry is shown in Table D-1. As shown, a total of 18 fatalities and 7,593 injuries
occurred among workers affected by the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards.





<TABLE>


Table D-1_Estimated Annual Number of Fatalities and Injuries Occurring Among Affected Workers

1Type of Incident

1Total Cases

1Off-the-Dock 

1On-the-Dock



Fatalities
18
10
8
Injuries
7,593
4,208
3,385 


Non-Lost Workday Cases
2,903
1,609
1,294 
Lost Workday Cases 
4,690
2,599
2,091
Lost Workdays
182,442
 101,109
81,332

Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis, based on Kearney/Centaur [1, Chapter 5].

</TABLE>




Injuries


The Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) provided the 1991 injury rate for SIC 4491. This rate was 13.6 for every 100 FTE
workers, based on a 2000 hour work-year [1]. The lost workday and non-lost workday injury rates per 100 FTE workers
were 8.4 and 5.2, respectively. An average of 38.9 lost workdays occurred per lost workday injury.
BLS also conducted a study of longshore-related injuries processed under the Federal Longshoremen's and Harbor
Workers' Compensation Act [9]. According to this study, 49 percent of longshore-related injuries occurred off the
dock, while 51 percent occurred on the dock.
Since BLS injury rates are per 100 FTE workers based on a 2,000 hour work-year, the number of FTE workers based on a 1,436
hour work-year must be converted to FTEs based on a 2,000-hour work-year. The conversion results in 63,148 FTE off-the-dock
workers and 48,805 FTE on-the-dock workers.



Off-the-Dock
The number of off-the-dock injuries was estimated by applying 49 percent of the BLS injury rate to the 63,148 FTE off-the-dock
workers (based on a 2,000 hour work-year). As a result, 4,208 annual injuries are estimated to occur off the dock. Of
these, 2,599 are lost workday cases resulting in 101,109 lost workdays, and 1,609 are non-lost workday cases.



On-the-Dock
The number of FTE workers affected by the Marine Terminals standard, based on a 2,000 hour work-year, is 48,805. Applying
51 percent of the BLS injury rate to the 48,805 FTE workers on the dock yields 3,385 annual injuries occurring on the
dock. Of these, 1,294 are non-lost workday cases and 2,091 are lost workday cases resulting in 81,332 lost workdays.



Fatalities


Although BLS did not provide a fatality rate for SIC 4491, data were available on the total of number of 1992 fatalities
that occurred in SIC 4491. BLS indicated that 13 fatalities occurred among SIC 4491 workers [1]. Since 54,617 FTE workers
(based on a 1,436 hour work-year) are estimated to be employed in SIC 4491, a fatality rate of 0.0238 per 100 FTE workers
(based on a 1,436 hour work-year) was derived.
Off-the-Dock



To determine the number of off-the-dock fatalities occurring annually, 49 percent of the fatality rate was applied
to the 87,951 FTE longshore workers (based on a 1,436 hour work-year). This results in 10 fatalities occurring, annually,
off the dock. On-the-Dock



To estimate the number of fatalities occurring among the population covered by the Marine Terminals standard, OSHA
used 51 percent of the fatality rate estimated above. As a result, approximately eight fatalities are estimated to
occur on the dock, annually.


BENEFITS


The proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards are expected to reduce many of the risks
involved in marine cargo handling operations. Reductions in fatalities and injuries are expected as a result of proposed
revisions to the two standards.
In reviewing OSHA's first reports of serious accidents in the marine cargo handling industry, Kearney/Centaur estimated
the percent of fatalities that would have been prevented by proposed revisions to the existing standards. Approximately
30 percent of off-the-dock fatalities and injuries could have been prevented through compliance with proposed requirements.
Thus, an estimated 3 fatalities are expected to be prevented, annually, by the proposed requirements. In addition,
an estimated 1,262 injuries would be prevented annually through compliance with proposed new requirements. Many
additional fatalities and injuries would be prevented through full compliance with existing requirements retained
in the proposed standards.



Summary of Benefits



All of the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards are likely to reduce the risk of injuries
occurring in the marine cargo handling industry. The proposed new requirements are expected to prevent approximately
3 of the 18 fatalities and 1,262 of the 7,593 injuries occurring annually among affected workers. Approximately 779
lost workday injuries involving 30,303 lost workdays are expected to be prevented, annually. An additional 483 non-lost
workday cases are also expected to be avoided. Many additional fatalities and injuries would likely be prevented
through full compliance with existing requirements retained in the proposed standards.


E. Economic Impacts


Compliance with the requirements of the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards are
not expected to produce any significant adverse economic impacts.
The costs that are imposed by the regulation should be a minimal burden on all affected establishments.
The total annual revenues and profits associated with longshoring operations are approximately $7.8 billion and
$388.9 million, respectively [1]. The total estimated costs of compliance with the proposed revisions to the Longshoring
and Marine Terminals standards rules are less than $4.7 million for the first year after promulgation of the final
rules and less than $1.8 million annually, thereafter. Thus, the total first-year costs of compliance with the proposed
revisions represent less than 0.06 percent of the revenues and 1.19 percent of the profits of the industry. Compliance
costs for subsequent years represent less than 0.03 percent of revenues and less than 0.46 percent of profits.
Current practices in the marine cargo handling industry indicate that the requirements of the proposed standard
can generally be met without significant hardship. Many employers already comply with the proposed requirements
and presumably are not imposing substantial disadvantages on themselves.
Since stevedoring establishments engaging in similar cargo handling operations in the United States would be subject
to the same regulations, no competitive disadvantages between industries or with regard to international trade
are projected. Costs are expected to be passed through as an increase in the costs of cargo handling and shipping, and
the effect on profits and prices should be negligible. The estimated compliance costs would represent an average
increase in cost of less than 25 cents for shipping a loaded container in or out of U.S. ports, which costs an average
of about $3000. On the whole, the costs of marine cargo handling operations for society would actually decrease as
fewer accidents would mean less lost time and wages and fewer medical and legal resources necessary for a given amount
of cargo shipping and handling.
The estimated savings to society attributable to the prevention of injuries and fatalities would far outweigh the
costs of preventing these incidents. According to the National Safety Council, the total costs associated with occupational
injuries and deaths in 1992 were $115.9 billion, or an average cost of over $15,000 per case. This estimate includes
wage and productivity losses, medical costs, administrative expenses, and other costs associated with accidents.
The estimated benefits anticipated from proposed requirements include unquantifiable reductions in pain and suffering,
plus estimated savings of over $18 million annually.


REGULATORY FLEXIBILITY ANALYSIS


Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act (P.L. 96-353, 94 Stat. 1164 (5 U.S.C. 601 et seq.

)), OSHA has made an assessment of the impact of the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards,
and has concluded that they would not have a significant impact upon a substantial number of small entities.
The important criterion that governs a Regulatory Flexibility Analysis is whether the proposed standards would
impose significant costs upon small entities. ``Significance'' is determined by the effect upon profits, market
share, and the entity's financial viability. In particular, the effect of the proposed revisions upon small entities
relative to their effect upon large entities needs to be specifically evaluated. That is, OSHA must determine whether
the proposed requirements would have a relatively greater negative effect upon small entities than they would have
upon large entities, thereby putting small entities at a competitive disadvantage, and if so, whether there are ways
to minimize any differentially adverse effects without increasing the risk to employees.
If the costs of compliance are proportional to firm size and are insignificant to small firms, then there is no significant
differential burden on small firms relative to that on large firms. In those cases involving large absolute costs
(typically capital equipment costs), financing may be more difficult to obtain for small entities than for larger
entities and in such cases of economies of scale in compliance, the burden on small firms will be greater than the burden
on large firms. The proposed changes to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards, however, require minimal
capital expenditures and generally impose costs that are proportional to firm size and the amount of business done.
In addition, these costs would be a minimal component of the overall costs of operations. As a result, small entities
would not be put at a competitive disadvantage to large entities due to these compliance costs.
Thus, OSHA concluded that the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards would not have
a significant adverse impact upon a substantial number of small entities.


F. Other Impacts




Impact Upon International Trade



OSHA determined that compliance with the proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards would
not have any measurable impact upon international trade. The compliance costs are minimal and are not expected to
affect exports, imports, or international competitiveness. To the extent that compliance with the proposed rule
would increase cargo handling efficiency and reduce the number of injuries and fatalities associated with these
operations, shipping costs may be reduced and result in a general increase in the competitiveness of U.S. firms.


References


1. Kearney/Centaur, Division of A.T. Kearney, Inc., Economic Assessment of OSHA's Proposed Longshoring Standard

, prepared for the U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of Regulatory
Analysis, Contract No. J9F10015.
2. U.S. Department of Transportation, Maritime Administration, ``The U.S. Stevedoring and Marine Terminal Industry,''
January 1993.
3. U.S. Department of Transportation, Maritime Administration, ``Merchant Fleets of the World: Oceangoing Steam
and Motor Ships of 1,000 Gross Tons and Over as of January 1, 1992.''
4. U.S. Department of Transportation, Maritime Administration, ``A Report to Congress on the Status of the United
States 19901991,'' December 1992.
5. U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, Foreign Trade Division, computer printout on the number of vessels
calling at U.S. ports in 1992, May 4, 1993.
6. U.S. Department of Transportation, Maritime Administration, ``Inventory of American Intermodal Equipment
1990,'' April 1991.
7. U.S. Department of Commerce, Economics and Statistics Administration, Bureau of the Census, County Business
Patterns 1990_United States.
8. SAFECO, Inc. Occupational Health and Safety Products Supply Catalog.
9. U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, ``Injuries Involving Longshore Operations,'' Bulletin
2326, May 1989.


IX. Environmental Impact


The proposed revisions to the Longshoring and Marine Terminals standards have been reviewed in accordance with the
requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.), the regulations of
the Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and DOL NEPA Procedures (29 CFR Part 11). No significant
negative impact is foreseen on air, water or soil quality, plant or animal life, the use of land or sea, or other aspects
of the environment.


X. Recordkeeping Requirements


Part 1320 of title 5 of the CFR sets forth procedures for agencies to follow in obtaining OMB clearance for information
collection requirements under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501 

et seq.

 The proposed Longshoring standard requires the employer to allow OSHA access to records. In accordance with the provisions
of the Paperwork Reduction Act and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, OSHA certifies that it has submitted
the information collection to OMB for review under section 3504(h) of that Act.
Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimated to average five minutes per response to allow
OSHA compliance officers access to the employer's records. Send comments regarding this burden estimate, or any
other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Office of
Information Management, Department of Labor, Room N1301, 200 Constitution Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C.
20210; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs Management and Budget, Washington, D.C. 20503.


XI. State Plan Requirements


Those of the 25 states with their own OSHA-approved occupational safety and health plans whose plans cover the issues
of maritime safety and health must revise their existing standard within six months of the publication date of the
final standard or show OSHA why there is no need for action, e.g., because an existing state standard covering this
area is already ``at least as effective'' as the revised Federal standard. Currently five states (California, Minnesota,
Oregon, Vermont and Washington) with their own state plans cover private sector on-shore maritime activities. Federal
OSHA enforces maritime standards offshore in all states and provides onshore coverage of maritime activities in
Federal OSHA states and in the following state Plan States: Alaska, Arizona, Connecticut
<FOOTCITE>3</FOOTCITE>
, Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Nevada, New Mexico, New York
<FOOTCITE>4</FOOTCITE>
, North Carolina, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah, Virginia, Virgin Islands, and Wyoming (all states
with state plans must also extend coverage to state and local government employees engaged in maritime activities.)


<FOOTNOTE>
<FOOTNAME>
3

</FOOTNAME>
Plan covers only state and local government employees.

</FOOTNOTE>

<FOOTNOTE>
<FOOTNAME>
4

</FOOTNAME>
Plan covers only state and local government employees.

</FOOTNOTE>


XII. Federalism


The standard has been reviewed in accordance with Executive Order 12612 (52 FR 41685; October 30, 1987) regarding
Federalism. This Order requires that agencies, to the extent possible, refrain from limiting State policy options,
consult with States prior to taking any actions that would restrict State policy options, and take such actions only
when there is clear constitutional authority and the presence of a problem of national scope. The Order provides for
preemption of State law only if there is a clear constitutional authority and the presence of a problem of national
scope. Additionally, the Order provides for preemption of State law only if there is a clear Congressional intent
for the agency to do so. Any such preemption is to be limited to the extent possible.
Section 18 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act), expresses Congress' clear intent to preempt State
laws relating to issues with respect to which Federal OSHA has promulgated occupational safety or health standards.
Under the OSH Act a State can avoid preemption only if it submits, and obtains Federal approval of, a plan for the development
of such standards and their enforcement. Occupational safety and health standards developed by such Plan-States
must, among other things, be at least as effective in providing safe and healthful employment and places of employment
as the Federal standards.
The Federal standards on longshoring and marine terminal operations address hazards which are not unique to any one
state or region of the country. Nonetheless, those States which have elected to participate under section 18 of the
OSHA Act would not be preempted by this final regulation and would be able to deal with special, local conditions within
the framework provided by this performance-oriented standard while ensuring that their standards are at least as
effective as the Federal standard.


XIII. Public Participation


Interested persons are requested to submit written data, views and arguments concerning this proposal. Responses
to the questions raised at various places in the proposal are particularly encouraged. These comments must be postmarked
by September 30, 1994. Comments are to be submitted in quadruplicate or 1 original (hard-copy) and 1 disk (51/4 or 31/2)
in WP 5.0, 5.1, 6.0 or Ascii. Note: Any information not contained on disk, e.g., studies, articles, etc., must be submitted
in quadruplicate to: The Docket Office, Docket No. S025, Room N2625, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution
Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20210, Telephone No. (202) 2197894.
All written comments received within the specified comment period will be made a part of the record and will be available
for public inspection and copying at the above Docket Office address.


Notice of Intention to Appear at the Informal Hearing


Pursuant to section 6(b)(3) of the OSH Act, informal public hearings will be held on this proposal in:


Charleston, South Carolina

 on September 30, 1994.


Seattle, Washington

 on October 31, 1994.


New Orleans, Louisiana

 on November 29, 1994. Actual addresses for the locations of the regional hearings in Charleston, South Carolina,
Seattle, Washington, and New Orleans, Louisiana will be announced in a later Federal Register notice.
Persons desiring to participate at the informal public hearing must file a notice of intention to appear by August
31, 1994. The notice of intention to appear must contain the following information: 1. The name, address, and telephone
number of each person to appear;
2. The capacity in which the person will appear;
3. The approximate amount of time required for the presentation;
4. The issues that will be addressed;
5. A brief statement of the position that will be taken with respect to each issue; and
6. Whether the party intends to submit documentary evidence and, if so, a brief summary of it.
The notice of intention to appear shall be mailed to Mr. Thomas Hall, OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs, Docket No.
S025, U.S. Department of Labor, Room N3647, 200 Constitution Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20210,
Telephone (202) 2198615.
A notice of intention to appear also may be transmitted by facsimile to (202) 2195986, by the same date, provided
the original and 3 copies are sent to the same address and postmarked no later than 3 days later.
Individuals with disabilities wishing to attend the hearings should contact the hearing management officer, Mr.
Tom Hall, to obtain appropriate accommodations at the hearing.


Filing of Testimony and Evidence Before the Hearing


Any party requesting more than ten (10) minutes for presentation at the informal public hearing, or who intends to
submit documentary evidence, must provide in quadruplicate the testimony and evidence to be presented at the informal
public hearing. One copy shall not be stapled or bound and be suitable for copying. These materials must be provided
to Mr. Thomas Hall, OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs at the address above and be postmarked no later than 21 days prior
to the date of the hearing.
Each submission will be reviewed in light of the amount of time requested in the notice of intention to appear. In instances
where the information contained in the submission does not justify the amount of time requested, a more appropriate
amount of time will be allocated and the participant will be notified of that fact prior to the informal hearing.
Any party who has not substantially complied with the above requirement may be limited to a ten-minute presentation
and may be requested to return for questioning at a later time.
Any party who has not filed a notice of intention to appear may be allowed to testify for no more than 10 minutes as time
permits, at the discretion of the Administrative Law Judge, but will not be allowed to question witnesses.
Notice of intention to appear, testimony and evidence will be available for inspection and copying at the Docket Office
at the address above.


Conduct and Nature of Hearing


The hearing will commence at 9:30 a.m. on the first day. At that time, any procedural matters relating to the proceeding
will be resolved. The nature of an informal rulemaking hearing is established in the legislative history of section
6 of the OSH Act and is reflected by OSHA's rules of procedure for hearings (29 CFR 1911.15(a)). Although the presiding
officer is an Administrative Law Judge and questioning by interested persons is allowed on crucial issues, the proceeding
is informal and legislative in type. The Agency's intent, in essence, is to provide interested persons with an opportunity
to make effective oral presentations which can proceed expeditiously in the absence of procedural restraints which
impede or protract the rulemaking process.
Additionally, since the hearing is primarily for information gathering and clarification, it is an informal administrative
proceeding rather than an adjudicative one. The technical rules of evidence, for example do not apply. The regulations
that govern hearings and the pre-hearing guidelines to be issued for this hearing will ensure fairness and due process
and also facilitate the development of a clear, accurate and complete record. Those rules and guidelines will be interpreted
in a manner that furthers that development. Thus, questions of relevance, procedure and participation generally
will be decided so as to favor development of the record.
The hearing will be conducted in accordance with 29 CFR part 1911. It should be noted that 1911.4 specifies the Assistant
Secretary may upon reasonable notice issue alternative procedures to expedite proceedings or for other good cause.
The hearing will be presided over by an Administrative Law Judge who makes no decision or recommendation on the merits
of OSHA's proposal. The responsibility of the Administrative Law Judge is to ensure that the hearing proceeds at a
reasonable pace and in an orderly manner. The Administrative Law Judge, therefore, will have all the powers necessary
and appropriate to conduct a full and fair informal hearing as provided in 29 CFR part 1911 including the powers:
1. To regulate the course of the proceedings;
2. To dispose of procedural requests, objections and comparable matters;
3. To confine the presentations to the matters pertinent to the issues raised;
4. To regulate the conduct of those present at the hearing by appropriate means;
5. In the Judge's discretion, to question and permit the questioning of any witnesses and to limit the time for questioning;
and 
6. In the Judge's discretion, to keep the record open for a reasonable, stated time (known as the post-hearing comment
period) to receive written information and additional data, views and arguments from any person who has participated
in the oral proceedings.
OSHA recognizes that there may be interested persons or organizations who, through their knowledge of the subject
matter or their experience in the field, would wish to endorse or support the whole proposal or certain provisions
of the proposal. OSHA welcomes such supportive comments, including any pertinent data and cost information which
may be available, in order that the record of this rulemaking will present a balanced picture of public response on
the issues involved.


List of Subjects in 29 CFR parts 1910, 1917, and 1918


Cargo, Cargo gear certification, Intermodal container, Longshoring, Maritime, Marine terminal, Hazardous materials,
Labeling, Occupational safety and health, Protective equipment, Respiratory protection, Signs and symbols.


XIV. Authority and Signature


This document was prepared under the direction of Joseph A. Dear, Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety
and Health, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW, Washington, D.C. 20210.
Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6(b), 8(c), and 8(g) of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C.
653, 655, 657); Sec. 107, Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Act (Construction Safety Act) (40 U.S.C. 333);
Sec. 41, Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 941); and 29 CFR part 1911 and Secretary of Labor's
Order No. 190 (55 FR 8033), OSHA proposes to amend 29 CFR parts 1910, 1917 and 1918 as set forth below.



Signed at Washington, D.C. this 12th day of May, 1994.

</SUPPLEM>
<SIGNER>
Joseph A. Dear,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
Assistant Secretary of Labor



For the reasons set out in the preamble 29 CFR Chapter XVII would be amended as follows:


PART 1910_[AMENDED]


1. The authority for part 1910 would continue to read as follows:





Authority

: Secs. 4, 6 and 8 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act, 29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657; Walsh-Healey Act, 41 U.S.C. 35 et
seq; Service Contract Act of 1965, 41 U.S.C. 351 et seq; sec. 107, Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Acts (Construction
Safety Act), 40 U.S.C. 333; Sec. 41, Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act 33 U.S.C. 941; National Foundation
of Arts and Humanities Act, 20 U.S.C. 951 et seq.; Secretary of Labor's Order No. 1271 (36 FR 8754), 876
(41 FR 1911, 983 (48 FR 35736), or 190 (55 FR 9033) as applicable.



2. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of 1910.16 would be revised to read as follows:


1910.16

Longshoring and marine terminals.


(a) 

Safety and health standards for longshoring

. (1) Part 1918 of this chapter shall apply exclusively, according to the provisions thereof, to all employment of
every employee engaged in longshoring operations or related employment aboard any vessel. All cargo transfer accomplished
with the use of shore-based material handling devices shall be regulated by part 1917 of this chapter.
(2) Part 1910 does not apply to longshoring operations except for the following provisions: (i) 

Toxic and hazardous substances

. Subpart Z applies except that the requirements of subpart Z of this part do not apply when a substance or cargo is contained
within a sealed, intact means of packaging or containment complying with Department of Transportation or International
Maritime Organization requirements.
<FOOTCITE>1</FOOTCITE>



<FOOTNOTE>
<FOOTNAME>
1

</FOOTNAME>
The International Maritime Organization publishes the International Maritime Dangerous Goods Code to aid compliance
with Interational legal requirements of the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea, 1960.
</FOOTNOTE>


(ii) 

Access to employee exposure and medical records

. Subpart C, 1910.20;
(iii) 

Commercial diving operations

. Subpart T of this part;
(iv) 

Electrical

. Subpart S of this part; when shorebased electrical installations provide power for use aboard vessels;
(v) 

Hand and Portable Powered Tools and Other Hand-Held Equipment

. Subpart P of this part;
(vi) 

Hazard Communication

. Subpart Z, 1910.1200;
(vii) 

Hazardous waste operations and emergency response

. Subpart H, 1910.120(q).
(viii) 

Ionizing radiation

. Subpart G, 1910.96;
(ix) 

Machinery and Machine Guarding

. Subpart O, 1910.211;
(x) 

Noise

. Subpart G, 1910.95;
(xi) 

Nonionizing radiation

. Subpart G, 1910.97; and 
(xii) 

Respiratory protection

. Subpart I, 1910.134.
(b) 

Safety and health standards for Marine Terminals

. Part 1917 of this chapter shall apply exclusively, according to the provisions thereof, to employment within a marine
terminal, except as follows:
(1) The provisions of part 1917 of this chapter do not apply to the following:
(i) Facilities used solely for the bulk storage, handling and transfer of flammable and combustible liquids and gases.
(ii) Facilities subject to the regulations of the Office of Pipeline Safety Regulation of the Materials Transportation
Bureau, Department of Transportation, to the extent such regulations apply to specific working conditions.
(iii) Fully automated bulk coal handling facilities contiguous to electrical power generating plants.
(2) Part 1910 does not apply to Marine Terminals except for the following:
(i) 

Abrasive blasting

. Subpart G, 1910.94(a);
(ii) 

Access to employee exposure and medical records

. Subpart C, 1910.20;
(iii) 

Commercial diving operations

. Subpart T of this part;
(iv) The control of hazardous energy (lockout/tagout). Subpart J, 1910.147;
(v) 

Electrical

. Subpart S of this part; (vi) 

Grain handling facilities

. Subpart R, 1910.272;
(vii) 

Hand and Portable Powered Tools and Other Hand-Held Equipment

. Subpart P of this part;
(viii) 

Hazard Communication

. Subpart Z, 1910.1200;
(ix) 

Machinery and Machine Guarding

. Subpart O;
(x) 

Noise

. Subpart G, 1910.95;
(xi) 

Respiratory protection

. Subpart I, 1910.143;
(xii) 

Safety requirements for scaffolding

. Subpart D, 1910.28;
(xiii) 

Servicing multi-piece and single piece rim wheels

. Subpart N, 1910.177; and
(xiv) 

Toxic and hazardous substances

. Subpart Z applies except that the requirements of Subpart Z of this part do not apply when a substance or cargo is contained
within a sealed, intact means of packaging or containment complying with Department of Transportation or International
Maritime Organization requirements.
<FOOTCITE>1</FOOTCITE>



<FOOTNOTE>
<FOOTNAME>
1

</FOOTNAME>
The International Maritime Organization publishes the International Maritime Dangerous Goods Code to aid compliance
with Interational legal requirements of the International Convention for the Safety of Life at Sea, 1960.



</FOOTNOTE>
</SIGNJOB>
<BILLING>
BILLING CODE 451026F
</BILLING>



